~abort	Abort the currently executing command.

This special command causes a currently executing command to stop, if
possible.  It cancels any executing macros, and discards any
characters you may have typed that Epsilon hasn't read.  Under DOS,
the <Scroll Lock> key also aborts, while under OS/2, the
Control-<Scroll Lock> key serves the same purpose.  Use the
set-abort-key command to change the abort key.

~about-epsilon	Show Epsilon's version number and operating system.

~alt-prefix	Interpret the next key as an Alt key.

This command reads a character from the keyboard, then runs the
command bound to the Alt version of that key.

~ansi-to-oem	Convert buffer's Windows character set to DOS.

Windows programs typically use a different character set than do DOS
programs.  The DOS character set is known as the DOS/OEM character
set, and includes various line drawing characters and miscellaneous
characters not in the Windows/ANSI set.  The Windows/ANSI character
set includes many accented characters not in the DOS/OEM character
set.  Epsilon for Windows uses the Windows/ANSI character set (with
most fonts).

The ansi-to-oem command converts the current buffer from the
Windows/ANSI character set to the DOS/OEM character set.  If any
character in the buffer doesn't have a unique translation, the
command warns first, and moves to the first character without a
unique translation.

This command ignores any narrowing established by the
narrow-to-region command.  It's only available in Epsilon for
Windows.

~append-next-kill	Don't discard a kill buffer.

Normally, kill commands select a new kill buffer before inserting
their own text there, unless immediately preceded by another kill
command.  This command causes an immediately following kill command
to append to the current kill buffer.  However, if the current region
is rectangular, this command instead deletes it by invoking
delete-rectangle.

~apropos	List commands pertaining to a topic.

This command asks for a string, then displays a list of commands and
variables and their one-line descriptions that contain the string.
You can get more information on any of these by following the links:
double-click or use <Tab> and <Enter>.

~argument	Set the numeric argument or multiply it by four.

Followed by digits (or the Alt versions of digits), this command uses
them to specify the numeric argument for the next command.  If not
followed by digits, this command sets the numeric argument to four,
or multiplies an existing numeric argument by four.  If bound to a
digit or Alt digit, argument acts as if you typed that digit
after invoking it.

Most commands use a numeric argument as a repeat count.  For example,
Ctrl-U 7 Alt-F moves forward seven words, and Ctrl-U Ctrl-U Ctrl-F
moves forward sixteen (four times four) characters.

Some other commands interpret the numeric argument in their own way.
See also auto-fill-mode, query-replace, and kill-line.

~asm-mode	Set up for editing Assembly Language files.

This command puts the current buffer in Asm mode, suitable for
assembly files.

~auto-fill-mode	Toggle automatic line breaking.

Epsilon can automatically break lines when you type text.  With auto
filling enabled, Epsilon will break the line when necessary by
turning some previous space into a newline, breaking the line at that
point.  You can set the maximum line length for breaking purposes
with the set-fill-column command.

Use this command to enable or disable auto filling for the current
buffer.  A nonzero numeric argument turns auto filling on.  A numeric
argument of zero turns it off.  With no numeric argument, the command
toggles the state of auto filling.  In any case, the command reports
the new status of auto filling in the echo area.

To set auto-fill on by default in new buffers you create, use the
set-variable command on F8 to set the default value of the
fill-mode variable to 1.

In C mode buffers, this command simply sets the variable
c-auto-fill-mode.

~back-to-tab-stop	Move back to the previous tab stop.

This command moves point to the left until it reaches a tab stop, a
column that is a multiple of the tab size.

If a region is highlighted, Epsilon unindents the region by one tab
stop.  With a numeric prefix argument, Epsilon unindents by that
amount.

~backward-character	Move point back.

Point moves back one character.  Nothing happens if you run this
command with point at the beginning of the buffer.

~backward-delete-character	Delete the character before point.

This command deletes the character before point.  When given a
numeric argument, the command deletes that many characters, and saves
them in a kill buffer.

~backward-delete-word	Delete the word before point.

The command moves point as in backward-word, deleting the
characters it passes over.  See backward-kill-word for a similar
command that cuts the text to a kill buffer.

~backward-ifdef	Find matching preprocessor line.

This command moves to the previous #if/#else/#endif (or similar)
preprocessor line.  When starting from such a line, Epsilon finds the
previous matching one, skipping over inner nested preprocessor lines.

~backward-kill-level	Kill a bracketed expression backwards.

The command moves point as in backward-level, killing the
characters it passes over.

~backward-kill-word	Kill the word before point.

The command moves point as in backward-word, killing the
characters it passes over.

~backward-level	Move point before a bracketed expression.

Point moves backward searching for one of ), }, or ].  Then point
moves back past the nested expression and positions point before the
corresponding left delimiter.

~backward-paragraph	Go back one paragraph.

Point travels backward through the buffer until positioned at the
beginning of a paragraph.  Lines that start with whitespace
(including blank lines) always separate paragraphs.  For information
on changing Epsilon's notion of a paragraph, see the
forward-paragraph command.

~backward-sentence	Go back one sentence.

Point travels backwards through the buffer until positioned at the
beginning of a sentence.  A sentence ends with a period, exclamation
point, or question mark, followed by two spaces or a newline, with
any number of closing characters ", ', ), ], between.  A sentence
also ends at the end of a paragraph.  See forward-paragraph.

~backward-word	Go back one word.

Point travels backward until positioned before the first character in
some word.

~beginning-of-line	Go to the start of the line.

This command positions point at the beginning of the current line,
before the first character.

~beginning-of-window	Go to the upper left corner.

Position point before the first character in the window.

~bind-to-key	Put a named command on a key.

This command prompts you for the name of a command, then for a key.
Thereafter, pressing that key runs that command.  This key binding
persists only until you exit Epsilon, unless you save the binding in
a command file or save Epsilon's entire state with the
write-state command.

~brief-copy-region	Copy a highlighted region, saving it.

This command saves a copy of the highlighted region to a kill buffer
so you can insert it somewhere else.  If no region is highlighted,
the command copies the current line.

~brief-cut-region	Delete a highlighted region, saving it.

This command kills the highlighted region, saving a copy of the
region to a kill buffer so you can insert it somewhere else.  If no
region is highlighted, the command kills the current line.

~brief-delete-region	Delete a highlighted region without saving.

This command deletes the highlighted region without saving it in a
kill buffer.  If no region is highlighted, the command deletes the
next character in the buffer.

~brief-delete-window	Remove one of a window's borders.

This command prompts you to indicate which of the current window's
borders you wish to delete.  Press an arrow key and Epsilon will
delete other windows as needed to remove that window border.

~brief-drop-bookmark	Remember this location.

This command remembers the current buffer and position, so that you
can easily return to it later with brief-jump-to-bookmark.
Normally, the command looks at the key you pressed to invoke it, to
determine which of the ten Brief bookmarks to set.  For example, if
you press Alt-3 to invoke it, it sets bookmark 3.  If you press Alt-0
to invoke it, it sets bookmark 10.  When you invoke the command by
pressing some other key, it prompts for the bookmark to set.

Brief bookmarks 1-10 are really synonyms for Epsilon bookmarks A-M.
You can use Epsilon commands like list-bookmarks to see all the
bookmarks and select one.

~brief-end-key	Go to the end of the line/window/buffer.

This command goes to the end of the current line.  When you press it
twice in succession, it goes to the end of the current window.  When
you press it three times in succession, it goes to the end of the
current buffer.

~brief-home-key	Go to the start of the line/window/buffer.

This command goes to the start of the current line.  When you press
it twice in succession, it goes to the start of the current window.
When you press it three times in succession, it goes to the start of
the current buffer.

~brief-jump-to-bookmark	Jump to a bookmark.

This command returns to a bookmark previously set with
brief-drop-bookmark.  It prompts for the number of the bookmark
you wish to return to.

Brief bookmarks 1-10 are really synonyms for Epsilon bookmarks A-M.
You can use Epsilon commands like list-bookmarks to see all the
bookmarks and select one.

~brief-keyboard	Load the Brief-style keyboard layout.

This command redefines the keyboard to resemble the key arrangement
used by the Brief editor.  Use the command epsilon-keyboard to
return to Epsilon's default keyboard arrangement.

~brief-open-line	Make a new line below this one.

This command adds a new line after the current one and moves to it.

~brief-resize-window	Move the window's border.

This command prompts you to indicate which of the current window's
borders you would like to move.  Press an arrow key to select one.
Then press arrow keys to move the window's border around.  Press
<Enter> when you are satisfied with the window's size.  Epsilon will
resize other windows as necessary.

~brief-split-window	Put a new border inside this window.

This command prompts you to indicate where you would like to create a
new window border.  Press an arrow key and Epsilon will split off a
new window from the current one, with the border between the two in
the indicated direction.

~bufed	Manipulate a list of buffers.

This command makes a list of buffers, puts the list in the bufed
buffer, and lets you edit it.  Alphabetic keys run special bufed
commands.  The N and P commands go to the next and previous buffers
in the list, respectively.  The D command deletes the buffer on the
current line immediately.  It warns you if the buffer has unsaved
changes.  The <Space> or E key selects the buffer on the current
line, and the S key writes the buffer named on the current line to
its file.  Typing 1 makes the window occupy the whole screen, then
selects the buffer like E.  Typing 2 or 5 splits the window
horizontally or vertically, then selects the indicated buffer.
Shift-P prints the buffer on the current line.

In a bufed listing, the A, B, F, and I keys make bufed sort the
buffer list by last access time, buffer name, file name, or size,
respectively.  Use the shifted versions of these keys to sort in
reverse.  Pressing U requests an unsorted buffer list: the newest
buffers appear first in the list.

This command does not normally list special buffers such as the kill
buffers whose names begin with the "-" character.  To list even these
buffers, give the bufed command (or a sorting command) a numeric
argument.

~c-close	Self-insert, then fix this line's indentation for C.

~c-colon	Self-insert, then fix this line's indentation for C.

~c-hash-mark	Self-insert, then fix this line's indentation for C.

~c-mode	Do automatic indentation for C-like languages.

This command puts the current buffer in C mode, appropriate for
editing programs written in any language with a syntax similar to C
(such as EEL).  In C mode, <Enter> indents each new line by scanning
previous lines to determine the proper indentation.  <Tab> reindents
the current line when you invoke it with point inside a line's
indentation.  With point outside a line's indentation, or when
repeated, this command adds more indentation.

By default, the find-file command automatically turns on C mode
for files that end with .c, .cpp, .hpp, .cxx, .hxx, .y, .h. or .e.

~c-open	Self-insert, then fix this line's indentation for C.

~capitalize-word	Upper case beginning character.

Point travels forward through the buffer as with forward-word.
Each time it encounters a run of alpha characters, it converts the
first character to upper case, and the remainder to lower case.

For example, if you execute this command with point positioned just
before "wORd", it becomes "Word".  Similarly, "wORd_wORd" becomes
"Word_Word".

If the current buffer contains a highlighted region, Epsilon instead
capitalizes all the words in the region, leaving point unchanged.

~case-indirect	Do the reverse-case binding of the invoking key.

Upper case Alt keys and upper case Control-X keys normally run this
command.  The command invokes the alternate case version of the key
that invoked it.  If you happen to type Ctrl-x E (which runs the
command case-indirect) instead of Ctrl-x e (which runs
last-kbd-macro), the case-indirect command would invoke
last-kbd-macro for you.

~cd	Change the current directory.

The cd command prompts for the name of a directory, then sets
Epsilon's current directory.  If you press Alt-E when prompted for
the directory name, Epsilon will type in the name of the directory
portion of the current file name.

When Epsilon displays a file name (for example, in a buffer's mode
line), it usually describes the file relative to this current
directory.

Epsilon uses its notion of the current directory when it prompts for
a file name and the current buffer has no specific directory
associated with it.  (This typically happens when the buffer has no
associated file name.)

Also, if you remove any pre-typed directory name and type a relative
pathname to such a command, Epsilon will interpret what you type
relative to the directory set by the cd command.

See the prompt-with-buffer-directory variable for more
information.

~center-line	Center line horizontally.

This command centers the current line between the first column and
the right margin, by changing the line's indentation if necessary.
You can set the right margin with the set-fill-column command.

~center-window	Vertically center the current window.

This command makes the line containing point appear in the center of
the window.  With a numeric argument n, it makes the line appear on
line n of the window.  Line 0 refers to the top line.

~change-code-coloring	Toggle code coloring on or off in this buffer.

This command toggles between coloring and not coloring the program
text in the current buffer by setting the want-code-coloring
variable.  The command has no effect in buffers Epsilon doesn't know
how to color.

~change-file-read-only	Change the read-only status of a file.

This command prompts for a file name (default: the current file) and
toggles its read-only attribute.  Under Unix, it either makes the
file unwritable to all, or writable to all (to the extent permitted
by the current umask).  Use Alt-o ! chmod for finer control.

~change-font-size	Set the font's width and height.

This command supplements the set-font command by providing
additional font choices.  Some Windows fonts include a variety of
character cell widths for a given character cell height.  (For
example, many of the font selections available in windowed DOS
sessions use multiple widths.)  Commands like set-font utilize
the standard Windows font dialog, which doesn't provide any way to
select these alternate widths.  This command lets you choose these
fonts.

The change-font-size command doesn't change the font name, or
toggle bold or italic.  You'll need to use the set-font command
to do that.

Instead, change-font-size lets you adjust the height and width of
the current font using the arrow keys.  You can abort to restore the
old font settings, or press <Enter> or <Space> to keep them.  This is
a handy way to shrink or expand the font size.  A width or height of
0 means use a suitable default.

~change-line-wrapping	Change whether this window wraps or scrolls long lines.

This command toggles whether the current window displays long lines
by wrapping them onto succeeding screen lines, rather than truncating
them at the right edge of the screen.  With a negative numeric
argument, it forces wrapping.  With a non-negative argument, it
forces truncation, and tries to set the display column to the value
of the numeric argument.

~change-modified	Change the modified status of the buffer.

This command causes Epsilon to change its opinion as to the modified
status of the buffer.  Epsilon uses this modified status to warn you
of unsaved buffers when you exit.  Epsilon indicates modified buffers
by displaying a star at the end of the mode line.

~change-name	Rename a variable or command.

You can change the name of a command, keyboard macro, or EEL variable
with this command.

~change-read-only	Change the read-only status of the buffer.

This command changes the read-only status of the buffer.  Attempting
to modify a read-only buffer results in an error message.  If a
window contains a read-only buffer, the modeline contains the letters
"RO".  With no numeric argument, the command toggles the read-only
status of the buffer.  With a non-zero numeric argument, the buffer
becomes read-only; otherwise, the buffer becomes changeable.

~change-show-spaces	Toggle whether or not Epsilon makes whitespace visible.

Epsilon can display the nonprinting characters space, tab, or newline
using special graphic characters to indicate the position of each
character in the buffer.  This command switches between displaying
markers for these characters and making them invisible, by setting
the current value of the buffer-specific variable show-spaces.

~clear-tags	Forget all the tags in the current tag file.

See also the commands select-tag-file and tag-files.

~compare-sorted-windows	Find lines missing from the current or next windows.

This command copies all lines that appear in both the current
window's buffer, and the next window's buffer, into a buffer named
"inboth".  It copies other lines to buffers named "only1" and
"only2".  It assumes that you already sorted the original buffers.

~compare-windows	Find the next difference between the current and next windows.

This command moves forward from point in the buffers displayed in the
current window and the next window.  It compares the text in the
buffers, stopping when it finds a difference or reaches the end of a
buffer, then reports the result.

If repeated, it alternates between finding the next difference and
finding the next match (by resynchronizing the buffers).

~compile-buffer	Compile the current buffer as appropriate.

This command tries to compile the current buffer.  It uses the
compiling command appropriate for the current buffer.  For .c files,
this is contained in the compile-c-cmd variable.  For .cpp or
.cxx files, this is contained in the compile-cpp-cmd variable.
For .e files, this is contained in the compile-eel-cmd variable.
When you compile an EEL file successfully, Epsilon automatically
loads the resulting bytecode file.

If the current buffer has no compilation command associated with it,
Epsilon will prompt for the appropriate command and record it in the
buffer-specific variable compile-buffer-cmd.  For C, C++, and EEL
files, Epsilon automatically sets this to refer to the variables
listed above.

Before and after running the compilation command, Epsilon does any
mode-specific operations needed, by calling the buffer-specific
function pointer variables pre_compile_hook and post_compile_hook,
respectively.  An EEL programmer can use these hooks to make Epsilon
perform additional actions each time you compile buffers.  Epsilon
uses the post_compile_hook to automatically load an EEL file
after it's been successfully compiled.

The function pointed to by post_compile_hook receives one
parameter, a status code returned by the do_compile() subroutine.
See that function's definition in proc.e for details.  The function
pointed to by pre_compile_hook receives no parameters.  If either
variable holds a null pointer, Epsilon doesn't call it.

~conf-mode	Set up for editing configuration files.

This command sets up generic syntax highlighting suitable for
miscellaneous Unix configuration files.

~context-menu	Display a right-mouse-button menu.

This command displays a context menu in Epsilon for Windows.  The
right mouse button runs this command.

~copy-rectangle	Copy the current rectangle to a kill buffer.

This command copies the rectangular block between point and mark to a
kill buffer, without changing the current buffer.  (Actually, the
command may insert spaces at the ends of lines, or convert tabs to
spaces, if that's necessary to reach the starting or ending column on
one of the lines in the region.  But the buffer won't look any
different as a result of these changes.)

~copy-region	Copy the region to a temporary buffer.

This command copies the region of the buffer between point and mark
to a kill buffer, without changing the current buffer.

~copy-to-clipboard	Copy the current region to the clipboard.

When running under MS-Windows or as an X program in Unix, this
command copies the current region onto the clipboard so other
applications can access it.  Under DOS, the region must have fewer
than 65,500 characters.

~copy-to-file	Copy buffer contents to a file.

This command prompts you for a file name, then writes the buffer to
that file.  The file associated with the current buffer remains the
same.  See also write-file.

~copy-to-scratch	Copy the region to a permanent buffer.

This command copies the text in the region between point and mark.
It asks for a letter (or number), then associates that character with
the text.  Subsequently, you can insert the text by invoking the
insert-scratch command.  See also the commands kill-region
and copy-region.

~count-lines	Show the number of lines in the buffer.

A message showing the number of lines in the buffer appears in the
echo area.  The message also gives the line number of the current
line, and the length of the file when written to disk.  If there is a
highlighted region, its line count is displayed as well.

~create-file-associations	Make Windows run Epsilon to launch certain file types.

You can set up Windows file associations for Epsilon using the
create-file-associations command.  It lets you modify a list of
common extensions, then sets up Windows to invoke Epsilon to edit
files with those extensions.  The files will be sent to an existing
copy of Epsilon, if one is running.  If not, a new instance of
Epsilon will be started.

~create-prefix-command	Define a new prefix key.

This command asks for a key and then turns that key into a prefix
key, like Ctrl-X.

~create-variable	Define a new EEL variable.

This command lets you define a new variable without using the
extension language.  It prompts for the name, the type, and the
initial value.

~ctrl-prefix	Interpret the next key as a Control key.

This command reads a character from the keyboard, then executes the
command bound to the Control version of that key.

~cua-keyboard	Load the CUA-style keyboard layout.

This command redefines the keyboard to resemble the key arrangement
used by typical MS-Windows programs.  Use the command
epsilon-keyboard to return to Epsilon's default keyboard
arrangement.

~delete-blank-lines	Remove blank lines around point.

This command deletes empty lines adjacent to point, or lines that
contain only spaces and tabs, turning two or more such blank lines
into a single blank line.  The command deletes a lone blank line.  If
you prefix a numeric argument of n, exactly n blank lines appear
regardless of the number of blank lines present originally.

~delete-character	Delete the character after point.

If you prefix a numeric argument, the command deletes that many
characters, and saves them in a kill buffer.  If invoked immediately
after a kill command, delete-character will store the deleted
character(s) in the same kill buffer that the kill command used.

~delete-current-line	Delete the current line.

This command deletes the entire current line, including any newline
at its end.

~delete-horizontal-space	Delete whitespace near point.

This command deletes spaces and tabs surrounding point.

~delete-matching-lines	Delete lines containing a regex pattern.

This command prompts for a regular expression pattern.  It then
deletes all lines below point in the current buffer that contain the
pattern.  While you type the pattern, Ctrl-W enables or disables word
searching, restricting matches to complete words.  Ctrl-T enables or
disables regular expression searching, in which the search string
specifies a pattern (see regex-search for rules).  Ctrl-C enables
or disables case-folding.

~delete-name	Delete a function, variable, etc.

This command prompts you for the name of a command, subroutine or
variable, with completion, and then tries to delete the item.

~delete-rectangle	Delete the characters in the current rectangle.

This command removes from the current buffer the characters in the
rectangular area between point and mark.  Unlike the
kill-rectangle command, this command does not copy the characters
to a kill buffer.

~delete-to-end-of-line	Delete the remaining characters on this line.

~describe-command	Give help on the named command.

This command prompts you for a command name, then displays a
description of that command along with its current bindings (if any).

~describe-key	Give help on the key.

This command prompts you for a key, then displays a description of
the command bound to that key (if any).

~describe-variable	Display help on a variable.

This command prompts for the name of variable.  Then it displays the
documentation for that variable.

~dialog-regex-replace	Replace using a dialog.

This command displays the Replace dialog, which you can use to find
and replace text in the buffer.  The dialog is initialized so that
the Regular Expression box is checked.

~dialog-replace	Replace using a dialog.

This command displays the Replace dialog, which you can use to find
and replace text in the buffer.

~dialog-reverse-search	Search backwards using dialog.

This command displays a Find dialog initialized to search backwards.

~dialog-search	Search using the Find dialog.

This command displays a Find dialog, which you can use to search for
text in the buffer.

~diff	List differences between current and next windows.

Make a list of all differences between the buffers in the current and
next windows.  The command prompts you for the name of the buffer to
put the list in.  The list shows what lines you would have to remove
from or add to the first buffer to make it identical to the second
buffer.

~dired	Edit the contents of a directory.

The command dired (for directory edit) allows you to conveniently
peruse the contents of a directory, examining the contents of files
and, if you wish, selecting some for deletion, copying, or moving.

The command prompts for the name of a directory or a file pattern.
By default, it uses the current directory.  It then displays a buffer
in the current window, with contents similar to what the operating
system command "dir" would display.  Each line of the dired buffer
contains the name of a file and information about it.

In dired mode, alphabetic keys run special dired commands.  See the
description of the dired-mode command for details.  Typing H or
'?' in dired mode gives help on dired subcommands.

~dired-mode	Edit a directory of file names.

A dired (directory edit) buffer lists the contents of a directory.
In a dired buffer, you can use these keys:

N moves to the next entry in the list.

P moves to the previous entry.

D flags a file (or empty directory) that you wish to delete by
placing a 'D' before its name.

C marks a file for copying.

M marks a file for moving (renaming).

U removes any flags from the file listed on the current line.

X actually deletes, copies, or moves the files.  Epsilon will ask for
the destination directory into which the files are to be copied or
moved, if any files are so marked.  If there is only one file to copy
or move, you can also specify a file name destination, so you can use
the command for renaming files.  Epsilon prompts for a single
destination for all files to be copied, and another for all files to
be moved.  If any files are marked for deletion, Epsilon will ask you
to confirm that you want to delete the files.

E or <Space> or <Enter> lets you examine the contents of a file.  It
invokes the find-file command on the file, making the current
window display this file instead of the dired buffer.  After
examining a file, you can use the select-buffer command (Ctrl-X
B) to return to the dired buffer.  Press <Enter> when prompted for
the buffer name and the previous buffer shown in the current window
will reappear (in this case, the dired buffer).  Applied to a
directory, the E command does a dired of that directory.

V runs the "viewer" for that file; the program assigned to it
according to Windows file association.  For executable files, it runs
the program.  For document files, it typically runs the Windows
program assigned to that file extension.  (Epsilon for Windows only.)

T displays the MS-Windows properties dialog for that file or
directory.  For a directory, this lets you view the size of its
contents.

R refreshes the current listing.  Epsilon will use the original file
pattern to rebuild the file listing.  If you've marked files for
copying, moving, or deleting, the markings will be discarded if you
refresh the listing, so Epsilon will prompt first to confirm that you
want to do this.

S controls sorting.  It prompts you to enter another letter to change
the sorting method.  Type '?' at that prompt to see the sorting
options available.

+ creates a subdirectory.  It asks for the new subdirectory's name.

. or ^ invokes a dired on the parent directory of the current
dired.

1 makes the window occupy the whole screen, then acts like E.

2 or 5 splits the window horizontally or vertically, then acts like E
in the new window.

O switches to the next window, then acts like E.

Z zooms the current window like the zoom-window command, then
acts like E.

! prompts for a command line, then runs the specified program, adding
the name of the current line's file after it.

Shift-U or Shift-L marks a file for uppercasing or lowercasing its
file name, respectively.  Press X to rename the marked files, as with
other renaming keys.  (Note that Epsilon for Windows displays
all-uppercase file names in lowercase by default, so Shift-U's effect
may not be visible within Epsilon.  See preserve-filename-case.)

Shift-R marks a file for a regular-expression replacement on its
name.  When you press X to execute operations on marked files,
Epsilon will ask for a pattern and replacement text.  Then for each
marked file, it will perform the indicated replacement on its name to
create a new file name, then rename the file to the new name.  For
instance, to rename a group of files like dir\file1.cxx,
dir\file2.cxx, etc. to dir2\file1.cpp, dir2\file2.cpp, use Shift-R
and specify dir\(.*).cxx as the search text and dir2\#1.cpp as the
replacement text.  To rename some .htm files to .html, specify .* as
the search text and #0l as the replacement text.

H or ? gives this help.

~dired-sort	Sort a directory listing differently.

In a dired buffer, this subcommand controls sorting.  It prompts you
to enter another letter to change the sorting method.  Press N, E, S,
or D to select sorting by file name, file extension, size, or time
and date of modification, respectively.  Press U to turn off sorting
the next time Epsilon makes a dired listing, and display the file
names in the same order they come from the operating system.  (You
can have Epsilon rebuild the current listing using the R dired
subcommand.)

Press + or - at the sorting prompt to sort in ascending or descending
order, respectively, or R to reverse the current sorting order.
Press <Enter> to sort again using the currently selected sorting
order.

Press G at the sorting prompt to toggle directory grouping.  With
directory grouping, Epsilon puts all subdirectories first in the
list, then all files, and sorts each part individually.  Without
directory grouping, it mixes the two together (although it still puts
. and .. first).

~display-buffer-info	Display the name of the current file.

This command displays the name of the file associated with the
current buffer, and the mode of the current buffer.  It displays an
asterisk after the file name if the file has unsaved changes.  This
command can be useful if you've set Epsilon so it doesn't display
these things continuously.

~do-c-indent	Indent this line for C.

In a line's indentation, reindent the line correctly for C code.
Inside the text of a line, or when repeated, insert a tab.

If a region is highlighted, Epsilon indents all lines in the region
by one tab stop.  With a numeric prefix argument, Epsilon indents by
that amount.

~down-line	Move point to the next line.

This command keeps point near the same horizontal position as it
occupied on the previous line, if possible.

~edit-variables	Interactively set variables from a list.

This command displays a list of all variables and lets you set them.
You can use the arrow keys or the normal movement keys to move around
the list, or begin typing a variable name to have Epsilon jump to
that portion of the list.  Press <Enter> to set the highlighted
variable, then edit the value shown using normal Epsilon commands.

To exit from edit-variables, press <Esc> or Ctrl-G.

With a numeric argument, the command includes system variables in its
list.

In Epsilon for Windows, this command displays a list of variables.
You can choose one, see its description and its current value, and
modify it.  The command will only list those variables included in
the help file.

~end-kbd-macro	Stop defining a keyboard macro.

This command completes the keyboard macro started by the
start-kbd-macro command.  You may then execute the macro with the
command last-kbd-macro, or you may give the macro a name with the
command name-kbd-macro.

~end-of-line	Go to the end of the line.

This command positions point at the end of the current line, just
before the newline character.

~end-of-window	Go to last character in window.

Position point before the last character in the current window.

~enlarge-window	Enlarge window by one line.

If possible, the mode line of the window on top of the current window
moves up.  Otherwise, the current window's mode line moves down.
This command has no effect if it would make any window smaller than
two lines, counting the mode line.

~enlarge-window-horizontally	Enlarge window by one column.

If possible, the left boundary of the current window moves to the
left by one character.  Otherwise, the current window's right
boundary moves to the right.  This command has no effect if it would
make any window smaller than one character wide.

~enlarge-window-interactively	Use arrow keys to resize a window.

This command lets you interactively change the size of the current
window.  After you invoke the command, use the arrow keys to point to
a window border.  The indicated border moves in a direction so as to
make the current window larger.  Keep pressing arrow keys to move
window borders.  To switch from enlarging to shrinking, press the
minus key.  Thereafter, the arrow keys cause the window border to
move in a direction so as to shrink the window.  When the window
looks right, press <Enter> to leave the command.

~enter-key	Insert a newline character.

This command acts like normal-character but inserts a newline
character regardless of the key that invoked it.  In overwrite mode,
the <Enter> key simply moves to the beginning of the next line.

~epsilon-html-look-up	Look up a topic in the HTML Epsilon manual.

This command prompts for a topic, then displays a section of the
Epsilon manual that refers to that topic, using a web browser.

~epsilon-info-look-up	Look up a topic in the Epsilon manual.

This command prompts for a topic, then displays a section of the
Epsilon manual that refers to that topic, using Info mode.  It's like
using the epsilon-manual-info command followed by the
info-index command.  In EEL source code, the identifier at point
becomes the default topic.

~epsilon-keyboard	Load a default keyboard, undoing keyboard changes.

This command restores Epsilon's original keyboard arrangement after
running the brief-keyboard or cua-keyboard commands, which
see.  It restores a "canned" keyboard arrangement from the file
epsilon.kbd, which must be on the path.

~epsilon-manual-html	Display the HTML-format version of the Epsilon manual.

This command displays the Epsilon manual's table of contents using a
web browser.

~epsilon-manual-info	Display the Info-format version of the Epsilon manual.

This command enters Info mode and jumps to the top node of Epsilon's
manual.

~epsilon-manual	Display Epsilon's manual.

This command makes Epsilon for Windows display its on-line manual in
WinHelp.  If you highlight a keyword first, Epsilon will look for
help on the highlighted text.  Otherwise, Epsilon will display the
manual's table of contents.  Also see epsilon-manual-info.

~eval	Compute and display the value of an expression.

This command prompts for an expression, then computes and displays
its value using the integrated EEL compiler in Epsilon for Windows
95/98/NT.  The expression may have a numeric or string type.  Also
see the execute-eel command.

~exchange-point-and-mark	Swap point and mark.

Some commands such as kill-region and copy-region operate on
the text between the point and the mark.

~execute-eel	Execute a line of EEL code.

This command prompts for an EEL statement, then executes it using the
integrated EEL compiler in Epsilon for Windows 95/98/NT.  Also see
the eval command.

~exit	Exit the editor.

If you haven't saved all your files, Epsilon will display a list
using bufed and ask if you really want to exit.  If you prefix
this command with a numeric argument, however, Epsilon will simply
exit and not ask you about any unsaved buffers.

~exit-level	Exit the current recursive edit.

If you have entered a recursive edit (typically from
query-replace), this command exits the recursive edit (bringing
you back to the replace), otherwise it invokes exit.

~exit-process	Type "exit" to the concurrent process.

This command tries to make the currently executing concurrent process
stop, by typing "exit" to it.  A standard command processor exits
when it receives this command.

~export-colors	Save color settings to an EEL source file.

The export-colors command constructs an EEL source file of color
settings based on the current color settings.  Use it to transfer
color changes to a different version of Epsilon, or to get a
human-readable version of your color selections.

~file-query-replace	Replace text in many files.

This command prompts for the text to search for and the replacement
text.  Then it prompts for a file name which may contain wildcards.
The command then performs a query-replace on each file that
matches the pattern, going to each occurrence of the search text, and
asking whether or not to replace it.

With a numeric argument, the command instead cycles through all
buffers.  The buffer name pattern must be a simple prefix if you use
it, like "a" to search all buffers whose names start with "a"; no
wildcards are permitted.

At each occurrence of the search text, you have these choices:

Y or <Space> replaces and goes to the next match.

N or <Backspace> doesn't replace, but goes to the next match.

<Esc> exits immediately.

. replaces and then exits.

^ backs up to the previous match, as long as it's within the same
file.

! replaces all remaining occurrences in the current file without
prompting, then asks if you want to replace all occurrences without
prompting in all remaining files.

, replaces the current match but doesn't go to the next match.

Ctrl-R enters a recursive edit, allowing you to modify the buffer
arbitrarily.  When you exit the recursive edit with exit-level, the
query-replace continues.

Ctrl-G exits and returns point to its original location in the
current buffer, then asks if you want to look for possible
replacements in the remaining files.

Ctrl-W toggles the state of word mode.

Ctrl-T toggles the state of regular expression mode (see the
description of regex-replace).

Ctrl-C toggles the state of case-folding.

Any other key causes query-replace to exit and any command bound
to that key to execute.

~fill-c-comment	Reformat the current paragraph in a comment.

This command fills the current paragraph in a C/C++/Java comment, so
that each line but the last becomes as long as possible without going
past the fill column.  It tries to preserve any prefix before each
line.

~fill-paragraph	Fill the current paragraph.

This command fills the current paragraph, so that each line but the
last becomes as long as possible without going past the fill column.
This command does not right-justify the paragraph with respect to the
fill column.

With a numeric argument greater than 5, the paragraph is filled using
that value as a temporary right margin.  With a smaller numeric
argument, the paragraph is filled using an infinite right margin, so
all text goes on one long line.

~fill-region	Fill the current region between point and mark.

This command fills each paragraph in the region between point and
mark as in fill-paragraph.  For this command, only completely
empty lines separate one paragraph from another.

With a numeric argument greater than 5, the paragraph is filled using
that value as a temporary right margin.  With a smaller numeric
argument, the paragraph is filled using an infinite right margin, so
all text goes on one long line.

~filter-region	Send the current region through an external program.

This command prompts for the name of a program and runs it, passing
the current region to it as its standard input.  It then displays any
output from the program in a separate buffer.  With a prefix
argument, it replaces the current region with the program's output.
This command is only available under Unix and in Epsilon for Windows
95/98/NT.

~find-delimiter	Show the matching left delimiter.

This command shows the left parenthesis, square bracket, or brace in
a balanced expression.  It invokes backward-level, displays this
location, pauses, and then returns point to its original location.
Note that the cursor must appear after a right delimiter, not on it,
to show the match for that delimiter.

You may change the length of time that this command pauses at the
left delimiter by setting the variables near-pause and
far-pause.  The former specifies how long to pause (in hundredths
of a second) if the left delimiter appeared in the window originally.
The latter specifies how long to pause otherwise.

Regardless of the length of the pause, the pausing stops when you
press a key.

~find-file	Put a file in the current window.

You would normally use this command to specify a file to edit.  This
command prompts you for a file name, then scans the buffers to see if
any of them contain that file.  If so, the command displays that
buffer in the current window.

Otherwise, the command creates a buffer with the same name as the
file, possibly modified to make it different from the names of
nonempty buffers, then reads the file into this buffer, then displays
that buffer in the current window.  With a numeric argument, the
command reads the file in untranslated mode and sets the buffer to
this mode (see set-line-translate).

If you simply type <Enter> for a file name, the command invokes
dired with the current directory for the file pattern.
Similarly, if you specify a directory or a file name with wild card
characters, the command invokes dired with that pattern.

See the descriptions of the prompt-with-buffer-directory and
want-common-file-dialog variables for more information on this
command.

~find-linked-file	Grab the file name on this line and edit it.

Look on the current line for a file name, and edit that file like the
find-file command.  Epsilon uses special rules for certain modes.
For HTML mode it looks for "<a href=...>" links.  For C/C++/Java mode
it follows #include references via the include-directories
variable.  In Java files it understands the package and import
keywords, and looks along the CLASSPATH for packages.  For files with
a .lst extension, it assumes the current line holds a file name,
instead of searching for a pattern that matches a typical file name.
You can highlight a file name first if Epsilon has trouble picking it
out.

~find-oem-file	Read a file that uses the DOS character set.

Windows programs typically use a different character set than do DOS
programs.  The DOS character set is known as the DOS/OEM character
set, and includes various line drawing characters and miscellaneous
characters not in the Windows/ANSI set.  The Windows/ANSI character
set includes many accented characters not in the DOS/OEM character
set.  Epsilon for Windows uses the Windows/ANSI character set (with
most fonts).

The find-oem-file command reads a file using the DOS/OEM
character set, translating it into the Windows/ANSI character set,
and arranges things so when you save the file, the reverse
translation automatically occurs.  This command is only available in
Epsilon for Windows.  See the default-character-set variable.

~find-read-only-file	Edit a file preventing changes to it.

Prompt for a file name and edit the specified file, like the
find-file command.  Set the buffer read-only, and mark it so
attempts to save the file prompt for a different name.

~find-unconverted-file	Read a file without changing its character set.

If you've configured Epsilon for Windows to convert from the DOS/OEM
character set to the ANSI character set upon reading a file, and to
perform the opposite conversion when writing (by setting the
default-character-set variable), use this command to bypass the
conversion for a particular file.

~finger	Show info on a user of a computer.

The finger command prompts for a string like "user@host.com",
then uses the finger protocol to query the specified computer on the
Internet for information about the given user.  You may omit the user
name to get a list of users logged onto the machine.  Not all
computers support this protocol.  The output appears in an
appropriately named buffer.

~forward-character	Go forward one character.

Nothing happens if you run this command with point at the end of the
buffer.

~forward-ifdef	Find matching preprocessor line.

This command moves to the next #if/#else/#endif (or similar)
preprocessor line.  When starting from such a line, Epsilon finds the
next matching one, skipping over inner nested preprocessor lines.

~forward-level	Move point past a bracketed expression.

Point moves forward searching for one of (, {, or [.  Then point
moves past the nested expression.  Point appears after the
corresponding right delimiter.

~forward-paragraph	Go to the next paragraph.

Point travels forward through the buffer until it appears at the
beginning of a paragraph.  Blank lines (containing only spaces and
tabs) always separate paragraphs.

You can control what Epsilon considers a paragraph using two
variables.

If the buffer-specific variable indents-separate-paragraphs has a
nonzero value, then a paragraph also begins with a nonblank line that
starts with a tab or a space.

If the buffer-specific variable tex-paragraphs has a nonzero
value, then Epsilon will not consider as part of a paragraph any
sequence of lines that each start with at sign or period, if that
sequence appears next to a blank line.  And lines starting with
\begin or \end or % will also delimit paragraphs.

~forward-search-again	Search forward for the same search string.

~forward-sentence	Go to the end of the sentence.

Point travels forward through the buffer until positioned at the end
of a sentence.  A sentence ends with a period, exclamation point, or
question mark, followed by two spaces or a newline, with any number
of closing characters ", ', ), ], between.  A sentence also ends at
the end of a paragraph.

~forward-word	Move past the next word.

By default, a word consists of a sequence of letters or underscores.
The buffer-specific variable word-pattern contains a regular
expression that defines Epsilon's notion of a word for the current
buffer.

~fundamental-mode	Turn off any special key definitions.

This command removes changes to key bindings made by modes such as C
mode or Dired mode.

Every buffer has a major mode, and whenever you type keys in that
buffer, Epsilon interprets them according to the buffer's mode.  Each
of Epsilon's various modes is suitable for editing a particular kind
of text.  Some modes only change the meanings of a few keys.  For
instance, C mode makes the <Tab> key indent the current line of C
code.  Other modes provide a group of new commands, usually on the
letter keys.  For example, in Dired mode the D key deletes a file.
Each major mode is also the name of a command which puts the current
buffer in that mode.  For example, Alt-X c-mode puts the current
buffer in C mode.

The default mode for new buffers is Fundamental Mode.  This command
returns the current buffer to Fundamental Mode, removing any changes
to key bindings installed by another mode.

~gams-mode	Set up for editing GAMS files.

This command sets up syntax highlighting suitable for files in the
GAMS language used for mathematical programming.

~goto-beginning	Go to the beginning of the buffer.

~goto-end	Go to the end of the buffer.

~goto-line	Go to a certain line by number.

This command moves point to the start of the n'th line in the file,
where n denotes the command's numeric argument.  With no numeric
argument, Epsilon will ask for the line number.  You may add :col
after the line number (or in place of it) to specify a column.

~goto-tag	Ask for the name of a function, then go there.

The command prompts you for the name of a tagged function, with
completion.  Epsilon then goes to the file and line where the
function definition appears.  If you give no name, Epsilon goes to
the next tag in the alphabetical tag list.  With a numeric argument,
it goes to the next tag without asking for a tag name.  Before moving
to the tag, it sets a bookmark at the current position like
set-bookmark.

~grep	Search multiple files for a pattern.

This command lets you search a set of files for a pattern.  It
prompts for the search string and the file pattern.  Then it scans
the files, accumulating matching lines in the grep buffer.  The grep
buffer appears in the current window.  By default, the grep command
interprets the search string as a regular expression.  Press Ctrl-T
at the search string prompt to toggle regular expression mode.  You
can also type Ctrl-W or Ctrl-C to toggle word-mode or case-folding
searches, respectively.

At the file pattern prompt, you can press <Enter> if you want Epsilon
to search the same set of files as before.  Type Ctrl-S and Epsilon
will type in the directory part of the current buffer's file name;
this is convenient when you want to search other files in the same
directory as the current file.  As at other prompts, you can also
press Alt-<Up> key or Alt-Ctrl-P to show a list of your previous
responses to the prompt.  Use the arrow keys or the mouse to choose a
previous response to repeat, and press <Enter>.  If you want to edit
the response first, press Alt-E.

You can use extended file patterns to search in multiple directories
using a pattern like **\*.{c,cpp,h} (which searches in the current
directory tree for .c, .cpp, and .h files).  With a numeric argument,
grep instead searches through all buffers.  The buffer name
pattern must be a simple prefix if you use it, like "a" to search all
buffers whose names start with "a"; no wildcards are permitted.

In grep mode, alphabetic keys run special grep commands.  See the
description of the grep-mode command for details.  Typing H or
'?' in grep mode gives help on grep subcommands.

~grep-mode	Edit a list of lines containing a search string.

In a grep buffer, you can move around by using the normal movement
commands.  Most alphabetic keys run special grep commands.  The 'N'
and 'P' keys move to the next and previous entries.  You can easily
go from the grep buffer to the corresponding locations in the
original files.  To do this, simply position point on the copy of the
line, then press <Space>, <Enter>, or 'E'.  The file appears in the
current window, with point positioned at the beginning of the
matching line.  Typing '1' brings up the file in a window that
occupies the entire screen.  Typing '2' splits the window
horizontally, then brings up the file in the lower window.  Typing
'5' splits the window vertically, then brings up the file.  Typing
'Z' runs the zoom-window command, then brings up the file.

~help	Get documentation on commands.

If executed during another command, help simply pops up the
description of that command.  Otherwise, you press another key to
specify one of the following options:

? prints out this message.

k runs describe-key, which asks for the key, then gives full help
on the command bound to that key.

c runs describe-command, which asks for the command name, then
gives full help on that command, along with its bindings.

r runs describe-variable, which asks for the variable name, then
shows the full help on that variable.

i runs the info command, which starts Info mode.  Info mode lets
you read the entire Epsilon manual, as well as any other
documentation you may have in Info format.

Ctrl-C runs the info-goto-epsilon-command command, which prompts
for the name of an Epsilon command, then displays an Info page from
Epsilon's online manual that describes the command.

Ctrl-K runs the info-goto-epsilon-key command, which prompts for
a key, then displays an Info page from Epsilon's online manual that
describes the command it runs.

Ctrl-V runs the info-goto-epsilon-variable command, which prompts
for an Epsilon variable's name, then displays an Info page from
Epsilon's online manual that describes that variable.

f runs the epsilon-info-look-up command, which prompts for a
topic, then starts Info mode and looks up that topic in the Epsilon
manual.

h displays Epsilon's manual in HTML format, by running a web browser.
It prompts for a topic, which can be a command or variable name, or
any other text.  (The browser will try to find an exact match for
what you type; if not, it will search for web pages containing that
word.)  When you're looking at Epsilon's manual in Info mode, using
one of the previous commands, this command will default to showing
the same topic in a browser.

w runs the WinHelp program to display Epsilon's online manual, in
Epsilon for Windows.

a runs apropos which asks for a string, then lists commands and
variables apropos that string.

b runs show-bindings, which asks for a command name, then gives
you its bindings.

q runs what-is, which asks for a key, then tells you what command
runs when you type that key.

l runs show-last-keys, which pops up a window that contains the
last 60 keystrokes you typed.

v runs about-epsilon, which displays the current Epsilon version
number and similar information.

m shows documentation on the current buffer's major mode.

~highlight-region	Highlight area between point and mark.

This command toggles highlighting of the region of the buffer between
point and mark.  If you prefix a nonzero numeric argument, the
command highlights the region; a numeric argument of zero turns
highlighting off.

~html-mode	Set up for editing Hypertext Markup Language files.

This command puts the current buffer in HTML mode.  Epsilon will do
syntax-highlighting for HTML and brace-matching.

~import-colors	Load color choices from earlier versions.

Use this command to import your color choices from Epsilon version 7
or earlier.  It uses the same "changes" file as the load-changes
command.  The end result will be a mycolors.e file, which you can
compile and load into Epsilon with the compile-buffer command on
Alt-F3.  When you receive a new version of Epsilon, you'll be able to
easily import your color changes by recompiling this file.

Once you've loaded your color choices, you may need to use the
set-color command to select the particular color scheme you
modified.  The import-colors command doesn't change which color
scheme Epsilon uses, only the color choices making up the scheme.

~incremental-search	Search for a string as you type it.

Ctrl-Q quotes the next character.  Backspace cancels the last
character.  Ctrl-S repeats a forward search, and Ctrl-R repeats a
backward search, or they change its direction.  Ctrl-R or Ctrl-S with
an empty search string brings back the search string from the
previous search.  Ctrl-O enables or disables incremental mode.
Incremental mode searches as you type; non-incremental mode lets you
edit the search string.

Ctrl-W enables or disables word searching, restricting matches to
complete words.  Ctrl-T enables or disables regular expression
searching, in which the search string specifies a pattern (see
regex-search for rules).  Ctrl-C enables or disables
case-folding.  <Enter> or <Esc> exits the search, leaving point alone.

If Epsilon cannot find all the input string, it doesn't discard the
portion it cannot find.  You can delete it, discard it all with
Ctrl-G, use Ctrl-R or Ctrl-S to search the other way, change modes,
or exit from the search.

During incremental searching, if you type Control or Alt keys not
mentioned above, Epsilon exits the search and executes the command
bound to the key.  During a non-incremental search, most Control and
Alt keys edit the search string itself.

Quitting (with Ctrl-G) a successful search aborts the search and
moves point back; quitting a failing search just discards the portion
of the search string that Epsilon could not find.

~indent-for-comment	Indent and insert a comment.

This command creates a comment on the current line, using the
commenting style of the current language mode.  The comment begins at
the column specified by the comment-column variable (by default
40).  (However, if the comment is the first thing on the line and
indent-comment-as-code is nonzero, it indents to the column
specified by the buffer's language-specific indentation function.)
If the line already has a comment, this command reindents the comment
to the comment column.

With a numeric argument, this command doesn't insert a comment, but
instead searches for one.  With a negative numeric argument, it
searches backwards for a comment.

~indent-previous	Indent based on the previous line.

This command makes the current line start at the same column as the
previous non-blank line.  Specifically, if you invoke this command
with point in or adjacent to a line's indentation,
indent-previous replaces that indentation with the indentation of
the previous non-blank line.  If point's indentation exceeds that of
the previous non-blank line, or if you invoke this command with point
outside of the line's indentation, this command simply inserts a tab
character.

If a region is highlighted, Epsilon indents all lines in the region
by one tab stop.  With a numeric prefix argument, Epsilon indents by
that amount.

~indent-region	Indent from point to mark using the function on <Tab>.

This command goes to the start of each line in the region and does
what the <Tab> key would do if pressed.  It then deletes any
resulting lines that contain only spaces and tabs, replacing them
with newline characters.

~indent-rigidly	Move all lines in the region left or right by a fixed amount.

This command finds the indentation of each line in the region, and
augments it by the value of the numeric argument.  With a negative
numeric argument, -n, the command removes n columns from each line's
indentation.

~indent-under	Indent to the next text on the previous line.

This function starts at the current column on the previous non-blank
line, and moves right until it reaches the column where a run of
non-spaces starts.  It then replaces the indentation at point with
indentation that reaches to this column by inserting tabs and spaces.
If the previous non-blank line has no such pattern, it inserts a tab.

If a region is highlighted, Epsilon indents all lines in the region
by one tab stop.  With a numeric prefix argument, Epsilon indents by
that amount.

~info	Read documentation in Info format.

This command starts Epsilon's Info mode for reading Info-format
documentation.  Use 'q' to switch back to the previous buffer.
Commands like <Space> and <Backspace>, N and P, navigate through the
tree-structured Info hierarchy.  See info-mode for details.

~info-backward-node	Walk the leaves of the Info hierarchy in reverse.

This command goes to the previous node in the sequence of Info nodes
formed by walking the leaves of the hierarchy within the current Info
file.

In detail, it goes to the previous node, then as long as it's on a
node with a menu, goes to the last menu item.  However, if there's no
previous node (or it's the same as the current node's parent), it
goes up to the parent node as long as it's in the same file.

~info-directory-node	Go to the Directory node.

Info nodes are arranged in a hierarchy.  At the top of the hierarchy
is one special node that contains links to each of the other Info
files in the tree.  This command goes to that topmost node.

~info-follow-nearest-reference	Follow the link near point.

After navigating among the cross references or menu items in an Info
node with <Tab> or <Backtab> (or in any other way), use this key to
follow the selected link.

~info-follow-reference	Prompt for a cross-reference in this node, then go there.

This command prompts for the name of a cross-reference in this node,
with completion, then goes to the selected node.

~info-forward-node	Walk the leaves of the Info hierarchy.

This command goes to the next node in the sequence of Info nodes
formed by walking the leaves of the hierarchy within the current Info
file.

In detail, if a menu is visible in the window, go to its next item
after point.  Otherwise, go to this node's next node.  (If there is
no next node, go up until reaching a node with a next node first, but
never to the Top node.)

~info-goto	Ask for a node's name, then go there.

This command prompts for the name of a node, then goes to it.  It
offers completion on the names of all the nodes in the current file,
but you may also refer to a different file using a node name like
(FileName)NodeName.

~info-goto-epsilon-command	Prompt for a command, look up Info.

This command prompts for the name of an Epsilon command, then
displays an Info page from Epsilon's online manual that describes the
command.

~info-goto-epsilon-key	Prompt for a key, look up Info.

This command prompts for a key, then displays an Info page from
Epsilon's online manual that describes the command it runs.

~info-goto-epsilon-variable	Prompt for a variable, look up Info.

This command prompts for an Epsilon variable's name, then displays an
Info page from Epsilon's online manual that describes that variable.

~info-index	Prompt for an index entry; then go to its first reference.

This command prompts for some text, then goes to the destination of
the first index entry containing that text.  Use the
info-index-next command on <Comma> to see other entries.  If you
just press <Enter> at the prompt, Epsilon goes to the first index
node in the current Info file, and you can peruse the index entries
yourself.

~info-index-next	Go to the next matching index entry.

This command goes to the next index entry that matches the text
specified by the most recent info-index command.  Upon reaching
the last item, it wraps and goes to the first matching item again.

~info-last	Return to the most recently visited node.

Info remembers the history of all nodes you've visited.  This command
goes to the last node on that list.  Repeat it to revisit older and
older nodes.

~info-last-node	Go to the last node in this file.

This command goes to the last node in this Info file.  In detail,
Epsilon goes to the top node of the file, goes to the last node in
its menu, then follows Next nodes until there are no more, then moves
like info-forward-node until it can move no further.

~info-menu	Prompt for a menu item, then go there.

This command prompts for the name of a menu item in this node's menu,
with completion, then goes to the selected node.

~info-mode	Put this buffer in Info mode.

This command sets up keys for browsing an Info file.  Normally you
would run the info command, not this one.

These are the commands in Info mode:

H shows detailed documentation on using Info mode.

? displays this list of available Info commands.

<Space> pages through the entire Info file one screenful at a time,
scrolling either or moving to a different node as appropriate.

<Backspace> pages backwards through the Info file.

<Tab> moves to the next reference or menu item in this node.

<Backtab> moves to the previous reference or menu item in this node.

<Enter> follows the current reference or menu item to another node.
You can also double-click one of these with the mouse to follow it.

B moves to the beginning of the current node.

L goes to the most recently visited node before this one in the
history list.

N goes to the next node after this one, as designated in the heading
at the top of this node.

P goes to the previous node before this one, as designated in the
heading at the top of this node.

U goes up to the parent of this node, as designated in the heading at
the top of this node.

M prompts for the name of an entry in this node's menu, then goes to
it.

1, 2, 3, ... 0 goes to the first, second, third, ... entry in this
node's menu.  0 goes to the last entry in this node's menu.

F prompts for the name of a cross-reference in this node, then goes
to it.

T goes to the top node in the current Info file, which is always
named Top.

D goes to the directory node, a node that refers to all known Info
files.  From here you can navigate to any other Info file.

G prompts for the name of a node, then goes to it.

] goes to the next node in the sequence of Info nodes formed by
walking the leaves of the hierarchy within the current Info file,
much like <Space> but without paging.

[ goes to the previous node in the sequence of Info nodes formed by
walking the leaves of the hierarchy within the current Info file,
much like <Backspace> but without paging.

> goes to the last node in the file, viewed as a hierarchy (the node
a repeated ] would eventually reach).

S prompts for a search string, then searches for the next match,
switching nodes if necessary.  Keys like Ctrl-T to toggle regular
expression mode work as usual.  Use Ctrl-S or Ctrl-R instead of S to
search only within the current node.

I prompts for text, then looks it up in this Info file's indexes, and
goes to the first node with an index entry containing that text.
Press <Enter> without typing any text to just go to the first index.

, goes to the next entry in the set of index entries set by the last
I command.

Q quits Info mode by switching this window to the buffer it displayed
before you entered Info mode.

~info-mouse-double	Follow the selected link.

Double-clicking a link (a menu item in an Info node, a
cross-reference, or the Next, Prev, or Up links at the top of a node)
runs this command, which simply follows the link.

~info-next	Go to the next node after this one.

This command goes to the next node after this one, named in the
current node's header line.

~info-next-page	Page down, then move to the next node.

Use this command to page through the entire Info file one screenful
at a time.

In detail, if a menu is visible in the window, this command goes to
its next item after point.  Otherwise, it tries to scroll down.
Otherwise, it goes to this node's next node, going up the tree if
necessary to find a node with a next node.

~info-next-reference	Move to the next reference or menu item.

This command moves forward to the next link in this node: either a
reference or a menu item.  Use <Tab> and <Backtab> to select a link,
then <Enter> to follow it.

~info-nth-menu-item	Follow that menu entry.

This command goes to a menu entry without prompting as M does.  1
goes to the first item in the menu, 2 to the second and so forth.  0
goes to the last item in the menu.

~info-previous	Go to the previous node before this one.

This command goes to the previous node before this one, named in the
current node's header line.

~info-previous-page	Page up, or move to a previous node.

Use this command to page backward through the entire Info file one
screenful at a time.

In detail, if a menu is above point, go to its closest item and then
keep following the last item in the current node's menu until
reaching one without a menu.  Otherwise (if the current node has no
menu above point), page up if possible.  Otherwise move to this
node's previous node, and then keep following the last item in the
current node's menu until reaching one without a menu.  Otherwise (if
the original node had no previous node, or its previous node was the
same as its up node), move to the original node's up node (but never
to a different file).

~info-previous-reference	Move to the previous reference or menu item.

This command moves backward to the previous link in this node: either
a reference or a menu item.  Use <Tab> and <Backtab> to select a
link, then <Enter> to follow it.

~info-quit	Exit Info mode.

This command leaves Info mode by switching this window to the buffer
it displayed before you entered Info mode.

~info-search	Search for text in many nodes.

This command prompts for search text, then searches for the text,
switching nodes if necessary.  Keys like Ctrl-T to toggle regular
expression mode work as usual.  Use Ctrl-S or Ctrl-R instead of S to
search only within the current node.

~info-tagify	Rebuild the tag table for this Info file.

Epsilon can more quickly navigate between the nodes of a big Info
file if it has an up-to-date tag table.  This command builds (or
rebuilds) a tag table for the current Info file, and is useful after
you edit an Info file.  The tag table is stored in a special hidden
node.

~info-top	Go to the top node in the current file.

This command goes to the top node in the current Info file, which is
always named Top.

~info-up	Go to parent of this node.

This command goes to the parent of the current node, indicated with
"Up:" in this node's header line.

~info-validate	Check an Info file for errors.

This command checks an Info file for certain common errors.  It
reports on menu items or cross-references that refer to non-existent
nodes.

~ini-mode	A mode for editing .ini files.

This mode provides syntax highlighting suitable for MS-Windows .ini
files.

~insert-ascii	Insert an ASCII character into the buffer.

The command prompts for a numeric value, then inserts the ASCII
character with that value into the buffer.  By default, it interprets
the number as a decimal value.  To specify a hex value, prefix the
number with the characters "0x".  To specify an octal value, prefix
the number with the characters "0o".  To specify a binary value,
prefix the number with the characters "0b".

~insert-binding	Make a command to re-establish a key's current binding.

The command prompts you for a key whose binding you want to save in
command file format.  Epsilon constructs a bind-to-key command which
will re-establish the current binding of the key when executed, and
inserts this command into the current buffer.  You may subsequently
execute the buffer using the load-buffer command.

~insert-clipboard	Insert a copy of the clipboard at point.

When running under MS-Windows or X, this command inserts the contents
of the clipboard into the buffer at point.  Under DOS, the clipboard
must have fewer than 65,500 characters.

~insert-file	Insert the specified file before point.

The command prompts for a file name, then inserts the contents of the
file into the current buffer before point, then sets mark to the
other end of the inserted region.

~insert-macro	Construct a define-macro command.

The command prompts for the name of a macro.  Epsilon constructs a
define-macro command which will redefine the macro when executed, and
inserts this command in the current buffer.  You may subsequently
execute the buffer using the load-buffer command.

~insert-scratch	Insert previously copied text.

This command asks for a letter (or number) that specifies text that
you previously copied with the copy-to-scratch command.  Then it
inserts that text before point.  See also the commands yank and
yank-pop.

~invoke-windows-menu	Display a system menu.

The invoke-windows-menu command brings up the Windows system
menu.  If you bind it to an alphabetic key like Alt-S, it will bring
up the corresponding menu (in this case, the Search menu).

~jump-to-column	Go to the specified column.

This command prompts for a number, then moves to the specified column
on the current line.  In horizontal scrolling mode, it then
horizontally centers the window on that column (or, if possible,
positions the window so that the start of the line is also visible).
You can specify the column with a numeric prefix argument and avoid
the prompt.

~jump-to-dvi	Show the DVI output from this TeX material.

In a TeX buffer, this command tells a running MS-Windows DVI
previewer to display the DVI output resulting from the text near
point.

The DVI viewer must understand Epsilon's messages.  Y&Y's "DVIWindo"
previewer, version 2.1.4 and later, understands them.  And your TeX
(or LaTeX) file must input srctex.sty (or srcltx.sty) to include file
name and line number information in your DVI file.  Your TeX vendor
can supply these.

For documents made from multiple TeX files, Epsilon can't determine
the ultimate DVI file name by examining one of the component TeX
files.  So the appropriate DVI file must already be open in the
viewer.  (Epsilon builds a DVI file name by replacing the current TeX
file's extension with .dvi.  If a file with that name exists, Epsilon
tells the previewer to load it.  Otherwise Epsilon assumes the DVI
file is already loaded in the previewer.)

~jump-to-last-bookmark	Go to a previously recorded place.

Use this command to jump to a location that you previously set with
the set-bookmark command.  If you repeatedly press this key, you
will cycle through the last 10 temporary bookmarks.

~jump-to-named-bookmark	Go to a named bookmark.

Use this command to jump to a location that you previously saved with
the set-named-bookmark command.  The command prompts for a
bookmark name (a letter), then jumps to that bookmark.

If you specify a digit instead of a letter, the command jumps to the
corresponding temporary bookmark (set with set-bookmark).  Zero
refers to the last such temporary bookmark, one to the previous one,
and so one.

You can press '?' to get a list of the currently defined bookmarks,
along with the text that contains the bookmarks.  To select one,
simply move to the desired bookmark and press <Enter>.

~keep-duplicate-lines	Remove unduplicated lines.

This command deletes all lines that only occur once, and leaves one
copy of each duplicated line.  Also see the uniq and
keep-unique-lines command.

~keep-matching-lines	Delete all lines but those containing a regex pattern.

This command prompts for a regular expression pattern.  It then
deletes all lines below point in the current buffer except those that
contain the pattern.  While you type the pattern, Ctrl-W enables or
disables word searching, restricting matches to complete words.
Ctrl-T enables or disables regular expression searching, in which the
search string specifies a pattern (see regex-search for rules).
Ctrl-C enables or disables case-folding.

~keep-unique-lines	Entirely remove duplicate lines.

This command deletes all copies of any duplicated lines.  Also see
the uniq and keep-duplicate-lines command.

~kill-all-buffers	Delete all user buffers.

This command discards all of Epsilon's buffers (except hidden system
buffers).

~kill-buffer	Make a specified buffer not exist.

This command asks for a buffer name and then deletes that buffer.
The command warns you before deleting a buffer that contains unsaved
changes.

~kill-comment	Kill the next comment.

This command searches forward for a comment, as defined by the
current mode, then kills it.  The set-comment-column command
invokes this command if given a negative numeric argument.

~kill-current-buffer	Make the current buffer not exist.

This command deletes the current buffer and switches to another,
creating a new buffer if necessary.  The command warns you first if
the current buffer contains unsaved changes.

~kill-current-line	Kill the current line.

This command kills the entire current line, including any newline at
its end.  The killed text goes to a kill buffer for possible later
retrieval.

~kill-level	Kill a bracketed expression.

The command moves point as in forward-level, killing the
characters it passes over.

~kill-line	Kill to end of line.

If invoked with point at the end of a line, this command kills the
newline.  Otherwise, it kills the rest of the line but not the
newline.  If you give kill-line a numeric argument, it kills that
many lines and newlines.  The killed text goes to a kill buffer for
possible later retrieval.

~kill-process	Get rid of the concurrent process.

Under Epsilon for Windows or Unix, this command disconnects Epsilon
from a concurrent process and makes it exit.

~kill-rectangle	Kill the rectangular area between point and mark.

This command removes the characters in the rectangular area between
point and mark, and puts them in a kill buffer.

~kill-region	Kill the text between point and mark.

This command removes the characters between point and mark from the
buffer, and puts them in a kill buffer.

~kill-sentence	Kill to the end of the sentence.

The command moves point as in forward-sentence, killing the
characters it passes over.

~kill-to-end-of-line	Kill the remainder of the current line.

This command kills the remainder of the current line, not including
any newline at its end.  If point is at the end of the line, the
command does nothing.  The killed text goes to a kill buffer for
possible later retrieval.

~kill-window	Delete the current window.

This command gets rid of the current window, and gives the space to
some other window.  This command does not delete the buffer displayed
in the window.

~kill-word	Kill the word after point.

The command moves point forward through the buffer as with
forward-word, then kills the region it traversed.

~last-kbd-macro	Execute the last keyboard macro defined from the keyboard.

This command runs the last keyboard macro you defined with the
start-kbd-macro and end-kbd-macro commands.

~latex-mode	Set up for editing LaTeX documents.

This command sets up Epsilon for editing LaTeX documents.  Keys in
LaTeX mode include Alt-i for italic text, Alt-Shift-I for slanted
text, Alt-Shift-T for typewriter, Alt-Shift-B for boldface,
Alt-Shift-C for small caps, Alt-Shift-F for a footnote, and Alt-s for
a centered line.  Alt-Shift-E prompts for the name of a LaTeX
environment, then inserts \begin{env} and \end{env} lines.

For all these commands, you can highlight a block of text first and
Epsilon will make the text italic, slanted, etc. or you can use the
command and then type the text to be italic, slanted, etc.

The keys '{' and '$' insert matched pairs of characters (either {} or
$$), the keys <Comma> and <Period> remove a preceding italic
correction \/, the " key inserts the appropriate kind of doublequote
sequence like `` or '', and Alt-" inserts an actual " character.

~line-to-bottom	Scroll window to move this line to bottom.

This command tries to scroll the current window so that the line
containing point becomes the last line in the window.

~line-to-top	Scroll the window to move this line to the top.

This command tries to scroll the current window so that the line
containing point becomes the first line in the window.

~list-all	Describe Epsilon's state in text form.

This command puts a description of Epsilon's state, including
bindings, macros, variables, and commands, in a buffer named
list-all.  It provides complete descriptions for bindings, macros,
and simple variables, but for commands and subroutines, it only
records the fact that a function with that name exists.  You would
use this command when updating to a new version of Epsilon.

~list-bookmarks	Pop up a list of all the bookmarks.

This command works like jump-to-named-bookmark, but pops up a
list of bookmarks, as if you had typed '?' to that command.  If you
always want the pop up list, you can bind this command to a key
(perhaps replacing the default binding of jump-to-named-bookmark
on Ctrl-X J).

~list-changes	List variables added or changed when updating.

You would use this command when updating to a new version of Epsilon.
It asks for the names of two files, then makes a list of all lines
from the second that don't appear in the first.  It sorts the second
file, but not the first.

~list-colors	Make a list of all color settings.

This command constructs a buffer with all of Epsilon's current color
settings, one to a line.  The export-colors command is usually a
better way to save color selections in human-readable form.

~list-definitions	List functions defined in this file.

This command displays a list of all functions and global variables
defined in the current file.  It uses Epsilon's tagging facility, so
it works for any file type where tagging works.

You can move to a definition in the list and press <Enter> and
Epsilon will go to that definition.  Or press Ctrl-G to remain at the
starting point.

By default, it skips over external declarations.  With a prefix
numeric argument, it includes those too.  (If the buffer contains
only external declarations and no definitions, a prefix argument is
unnecessary; Epsilon will automatically include them.)

~list-files	Create a buffer listing all files matching a pattern.

This command prompts for a file name pattern containing wildcards,
then creates a list of all the files matching the pattern in a buffer
named "file-list".  Use this command when you need a plain list of
file names, without any of the extra information that the similar
dired command provides.

With a numeric argument, the command lists matching directory names,
as well as file names.

~list-make-preprocessor-conditionals	Show conditionals in effect for this line.

In makefile mode buffers, this command displays a list of all
preprocessor conditionals that affect the current line.

~list-preprocessor-conditionals	Show conditionals in effect for this line.

In C mode buffers, this command displays a list of all preprocessor
conditionals that affect the current line.

~list-svga-modes	List or load additional SVGA video modes.

Under DOS, this command lists any Super VGA video modes available,
putting the result in a buffer named "svga-list".  You must set the
extra-video-modes variable and restart for this command to work.

Under OS/2, this command works differently.  You must run this
command before you can access the additional video modes.  (Under
DOS, the modes are available immediately, and this command is purely
informational.)  The command scans the file SVGADATA.PMI for new
Super VGA video modes and adds them to Epsilon.  SVGADATA.PMI is a
text file describing all the available modes for your video board.
It normally resides in your main \OS2 directory, and is built by the
SVGA program which comes with OS/2.  See your OS/2 documentation for
information on this program.

~list-undefined	Which EEL functions are not defined anywhere?

This command makes a list of all EEL functions that are called from
some other EEL function, but have not been defined.  Epsilon doesn't
report any error when you load an EEL function that refers to an
undefined function, but you'll get an error message when the function
runs.  This command helps to prevent such errors.  The list also
includes any variables or functions that have been deleted.

~load-buffer	Interpret a buffer as a command file.

This command prompts you for the name of a buffer containing macro
definitions and key bindings in command file format, then executes
the commands contained in that buffer.  For information on command
file format, see the section of the manual entitled "Command Files".

~load-bytes	Load compiled EEL commands and variables.

This command prompts you for the name of a file produced by the EEL
compiler, then loads that file.  You may omit the file name's
extension.  The command changes any file name extension you provide
to ".b".

~load-changes	Load the changes into Epsilon.

The load-changes command prompts for a file name, then loads the
changes described in that file.  Use this command when updating to a
new version of Epsilon, to load the output of the list-changes
command.

~load-file	Read in a command file.

This command prompts you for the name of a command file containing
macro definitions and key bindings, then executes the commands
contained in that file.  For information on command file format, see
the section of the manual entitled "Command Files".

~locate-file	Search for a file.

This command prompts you for a file name and then searches for that
file.  In Windows, DOS, and OS/2, it searches for the file on all
local hard drives, skipping over removable drives, CD-ROM drives, and
network drives.  On Unix, it searches through particular parts of the
directory hierarchy specified by the locate-path-unix variable.

~lowercase-word	Make the current word lower case.

Point travels forward through the buffer as with forward-word.
It turns all the letters it encounters to lower case.  If the current
buffer contains a highlighted region, Epsilon instead changes all the
letters in the region to lower case, leaving point unchanged.

~make	Run a program, then look for errors.

Execute a program (by default "make") as the push command does.
With a numeric argument, the command prompts for the program to
execute and sets the default for next time.  Epsilon captures the
program's output and parses it for error messages using the
next-error command.

~makefile-mode	Set up for editing makefiles.

This command sets up syntax highlighting suitable for makefiles.

~man	Read Unix man pages.

This command prompts for a line of text, then runs the Unix "man"
command, passing that text as its command line argument, and displays
the result in a buffer.

If you don't use any flags or section names, Epsilon will provide
completion on available topics.  For example, type "?" to see all man
page topics available.  Within man page output, you can double-click
on a reference to another man page, such as echo(1), or press <Enter>
to follow it, or press m to be prompted for another man page topic.

~mark-c-paragraph	Set point and mark around a paragraph.

This command sets point and mark around the current paragraph in a
block comment in C mode.

~mark-inclusive-region	Begin marking a Brief-style inclusive region.

This command begins marking and highlighting a region of text,
defining it as an inclusive region.  An inclusive region includes all
the characters between point and mark, plus one additional character
at the end of the region.  When you run this command, it sets the
mark equal to the value of point, so initially the highlighted region
has one character, the character just after point.  This is Brief's
normal region type.

If Epsilon is already highlighting a region of another type, this
command redefines the region as an inclusive region.  If
mark-unhighlights is nonzero and Epsilon is already highlighting
an inclusive region, this command turns off the highlighting.

~mark-line-region	Begin marking a line region.

This command begins marking and highlighting a region of text,
defining it as a line region.  A line region includes complete lines
of the buffer: the line containing point, the line containing the
mark and all the lines between them.  When you run this command, it
sets the mark equal to the value of point, so initially the
highlighted region contains just the current line.

If Epsilon is already highlighting a region of another type, this
command redefines the region as a line region.  If
mark-unhighlights is nonzero and Epsilon is already highlighting
a line region, this command turns off the highlighting.

~mark-normal-region	Begin marking a normal region.

This command begins marking and highlighting a region of text,
defining it as a normal (non-inclusive) region.  A normal region
includes all the characters between point and mark.  When you run
this command, it sets the mark equal to the value of point, so
initially the highlighted region is empty.

If Epsilon is already highlighting a region of another type, this
command redefines the region as a normal region.  If
mark-unhighlights is nonzero and Epsilon is already highlighting
a normal region, this command turns off the highlighting.  See
set-mark for a command that always begins defining a new region,
even when a region has already been highlighted.

~mark-paragraph	Put point and mark around the paragraph.

This command positions mark before the first character in the current
paragraph, and positions point after the last character in the
paragraph.  You can use this command in conjunction with the
kill-region command to kill paragraphs and move them around.

For information on Epsilon's notion of a paragraph, see the help
entry for the forward-paragraph command.

~mark-rectangle	Begin marking a rectangular region.

This command begins marking and highlighting a rectangular region of
text, setting mark equal to the value of point.  A rectangular region
consists of all columns between those of point and mark, on all lines
in the buffer between point and mark.

If Epsilon is already highlighting a region of another type, this
command redefines the region as a rectangular region.  If
mark-unhighlights is nonzero and Epsilon is already highlighting
a rectangular region, this command turns off the highlighting.

~mark-whole-buffer	Highlight the entire buffer.

This command sets point at the start of the current and mark at its
end, and turns on highlighting.

~merge-diff	Use #ifdef to mark buffer changes.

This command is another variation on diff that's useful with
buffers in C mode.  It marks differences by surrounding them with
#ifdef preprocessor lines, first prompting for the #ifdef variable
name to use.  The resulting buffer receives the mode and settings of
the first of the original buffers.

~mouse-center	Pan or yank, as appropriate.

This command runs mouse-yank under Unix, and mouse-pan
otherwise.  See the variable mouse-center-yanks to customize this
behavior.

~mouse-move	Pop up a scroll bar or menu bar as needed.

Epsilon runs this command when you move the mouse.  It pops up a
scroll bar or menu bar, or changes the mouse cursor's shape, based on
the mouse's current position on the screen.

~mouse-pan	Autoscroll or pan the current buffer.

This command is bound to the middle mouse button on three button (or
wheeled) mice.  It provides autoscrolling and panning when you click
that button.

~mouse-select	Select text, move borders, or run menu command.

Press and release this mouse button to position point to wherever the
mouse cursor indicates, switching windows if needed.  Hold down the
mouse button and drag to select and highlight text.  Double-clicking
selects full words.  (When a pop-up list of choices appears on the
screen, double-clicking on a choice selects it.)  Shift-clicking
extends the current selection.  Holding down the Alt key while
selecting produces a rectangle selection.

Drag selected text to move it someplace else.  Hold down the Control
key to copy the text someplace else.

On scroll bars, this button scrolls the window.  You can drag the
central scroll box up and down, click on the arrows at the top and
bottom of the scroll bar to scroll by lines, or click between the
arrows and the box to scroll by pages.

On other window borders and corners, dragging resizes windows.  For
pop-up windows only, dragging the title bar moves the window.

~mouse-to-tag	Go to the definition of the indicated function.

In Epsilon for Windows, display the context menu by calling the
context-menu command.  In other versions, behave like the left
mouse button, with one exception:

In C files, double-clicking on the name of a subroutine jumps to that
routine's definition using the tags system.  Before jumping, it sets
a bookmark at the current position like the set-bookmark command.

~mouse-yank	Yank from the clipboard or kill buffer.

This command yanks text from the clipboard or a kill buffer, like the
yank command, at the mouse's current location.

~move-to-window	Move to a different window.

This command changes the current window to the window in the
direction of the arrow key from the cursor.  For example, typing
Ctrl-X <Right> moves to the window to the right of the cursor; Ctrl-X
<Left> moves to the left.  Ctrl-X <Up> and Ctrl-X <Down> move up and
down, respectively.

~name-kbd-macro	Name the last keyboard macro defined.

Use this command to give a name to a keyboard macro that you defined
with start-kbd-macro and end-kbd-macro.  The command prompts
you for the name.  Thereafter, you may invoke that macro by name
using named-command, or bind it to a key using bind-to-key.

~named-command	Invoke the given command by name.

This command prompts for the name of a command or keyboard macro,
with completion, then executes it.

~narrow-to-region	Temporarily restrict editing to between point and mark.

This command temporarily restricts your access to the current buffer.
Point can only vary between the values point and mark had when you
invoked narrow-to-region.  The commands that go to the beginning
and end of the buffer will instead go to the beginning and end of
this region.  Searches will only operate within the region.  However,
the commands that write the buffer to a file will write the entire
buffer, not just the constricted region.  See also the
widen-buffer command.

~new-file	Create an empty buffer.

This command creates a new, empty buffer and marks it so that Epsilon
will prompt for a file name when you try to save it.  You can
customize the behavior of the new-file command by setting the
variables new-file-mode and new-file-ext.

~next-buffer	Select the next buffer.

This command selects the next buffer and connects it to the current
window.  You can cycle through all the buffers by repeating this
command.  To cycle in the other direction, use the
previous-buffer command.

~next-difference	Move to the next change.

Use this command in a buffer created by the visual-diff command
to move to the next group of changed lines, or the next group of
common lines.  Added lines are shown in yellow, deleted lines in red,
and common lines are colored as in the original buffers.

~next-error	Find a compiler error message, then jump to the offending line.

This command searches in the process buffer for a line containing a
compiler error message.  Epsilon uses a regular expression search to
recognize these messages.

If a window displays the file containing the error, Epsilon switches
to that window.  Otherwise, it uses the find-file command to
display the file in the current window.  It then goes to the
indicated line of the file using the goto-line command, then
displays the error message in the echo area.  A positive numeric
argument of n moves to the nth next error message.  A negative
numeric argument of -n moves to the nth previous error message.  A
numeric argument of zero repeats the last message.

~next-match	Go to the next matching line.

This command moves to the next match that the last grep command found.

If a window displays the file containing the match, Epsilon switches
to that window.  Otherwise, it uses the find-file command to
display the file in the current window.  It then goes to the matching
line.  A positive numeric argument of n moves to the nth next match.
A negative numeric argument of -n moves to the nth previous match.  A
numeric argument of zero goes to the same match as last time.

~next-page	Display the next window full of text.

This command scrolls the current window up so that the last few lines
appear at the top of the window.  It moves point so that it appears
centered vertically in the window.

~next-position	Go to the next matching line.

This command moves to the next compiler error message by calling
next-error, or to the next match found by the grep command by
calling next-match, depending on whether you've run a process or
compilation command, or a grep command, most recently.

If a window displays the file containing the match, Epsilon switches
to that window.  Otherwise, it uses the find-file command to
display the file in the current window.  It then goes to the
appropriate line of the file.  A positive numeric argument of n moves
to the nth next match.  A negative numeric argument of -n moves to
the nth previous match.  A numeric argument of zero goes to the same
place as last time.

~next-tag	Go to the next tag with this name.

After you use the goto-tag or pluck-tag commands to go to a
tag that occurs in multiple places, you can use this command to go to
the next instance of the tag.

~next-video	Change the number of lines or columns.

This command tries to put the display device in a mode that displays
a different number of lines or columns.  This command cycles through
all the modes that Epsilon knows about.  See also the set-video
command.  (DOS, OS/2 only)

~next-window	Move to the next window.

This command moves to the next window, wrapping around to the first
window if invoked from the last window.

You can think of the window order as the position of a window in a
list of windows.  Initially only one window appears in the list.
When you split a window, the two child windows replace it in the
list.  The top or left window comes before the bottom or right
window.  When you delete a window, that window leaves the list.

~normal-character	Insert the invoking key into the buffer.

When you type a character bound to the normal-character command,
Epsilon inserts the character into the buffer, generally before
point.  See also the overwrite-mode command.

Nothing happens if the key that invokes normal-character does not
represent a valid 8-bit ASCII character.

During auto fill mode, when you type a key bound to this command, the
line breaks if appropriate.  In particular, if point's column equals
the fill column, the command breaks the line.  If the value of
point's column exceeds the fill column, the command breaks the line
at the closest whitespace to the left of the fill column, and uses
the normal-character command to insert a space.  Otherwise, this
command just invokes the normal-character command to insert the
key into the buffer.  See the auto-fill-mode command.

~oem-to-ansi	Convert buffer's DOS character set to Windows.

Windows programs typically use a different character set than do DOS
programs.  The DOS character set is known as the DOS/OEM character
set, and includes various line drawing characters and miscellaneous
characters not in the Windows/ANSI set.  The Windows/ANSI character
set includes many accented characters not in the DOS/OEM character
set.  Epsilon for Windows uses the Windows/ANSI character set (with
most fonts).

The oem-to-ansi command converts the current buffer from the
DOS/OEM character set to the Windows/ANSI character set.  If any
character in the buffer doesn't have a unique translation, the
command warns first, and moves to the first character without a
unique translation.

This command ignores any narrowing established by the
narrow-to-region command.  It's only available in Epsilon for
Windows.

~one-window	Display only one window.

The current window becomes the only window displayed.  The buffers
associated with other windows, if any, remain unaffected.  See also
the zoom-window command.

~open-line	Open up some vertical space.

This command inserts a newline after point, instead of before point
as the other inserting commands do.  Use this command to open up some
vertical space in the file.

~overwrite-mode	Enter/Exit overwrite mode.

This command changes the behavior of the normal-character
command, causing it to insert characters into the buffer
destructively, replacing the character after point.  However, Epsilon
will never overwrite a newline character, or overwrite another
character with a newline character.  This ensures proper behavior
with respect to the ends of lines.

Without a numeric argument, the command toggles the state of
overwrite mode.  With a numeric argument of zero, the command
disables overwrite mode.  With a nonzero numeric argument, it turns
overwrite mode on.

~page-left	Show more text to the left.

This command moves left on the current line by half the window's
width.  In horizontal scrolling mode, it then horizontally centers
the window on that column (or, if possible, positions the window so
that the start of the line is also visible).

~page-right	Show more text to the right.

This command moves right on the current line by half the window's
width.  In horizontal scrolling mode, it then horizontally centers
the window on that column (or, if possible, positions the window so
that the start of the line is also visible).

~pause-macro	Suspend/resume recording or running a macro.

When defining a keyboard macro, pressing this key temporarily stops
recording the macro.  Press the same key again to resume recording.
Epsilon won't record any of your keystrokes while recording is
suspended.

When Epsilon runs the resulting keyboard macro, it will pause at the
same place in the macro and let you enter commands.  To resume the
macro, press this same key.

Use this command to write macros that pause in the middle for a file
name, or to let you do some custom editing, before continuing their
work.

~perl-mode	Set up for editing Perl.

This command puts the current buffer in a mode suitable for editing
Perl.

~pluck-tag	Go to the definition of the function at point.

This command first retrieves the routine name adjacent to or to the
right of point, then jumps to that routine's definition.  Before
jumping, it sets a bookmark at the current position like
set-bookmark.

~postscript-mode	Set up for editing PostScript files.

This command sets up syntax highlighting suitable for PostScript
documents.

~previous-buffer	Select the previous buffer.

This command selects the previous buffer and connects it to the
current window.  You can cycle through all the buffers by repeating
this command.  To cycle in the other direction, use the
next-buffer command.

~previous-difference	Move to the previous change.

Use this command in a buffer created by the visual-diff command
to move to the start of the previous group of changed lines, or the
previous group of common lines.  Added lines are shown in yellow,
deleted lines in red, and common lines are colored as in the original
buffers.

~previous-error	Find a compiler error message, then jump to the offending line.

This command works like next-error, except that it searches
backwards instead of forwards.

~previous-match	Go to the previous matching line.

This command moves to the previous match from the last grep command.

If a window displays the file containing the match, Epsilon switches
to that window.  Otherwise, it uses the find-file command to
display the file in the current window.  It then goes to the matching
line.  A positive numeric argument of n moves to the nth previous
match.  A negative numeric argument of -n moves to the nth next
match.  A numeric argument of zero goes to the same match as last
time.

~previous-page	Display the previous window full of text.

This command scrolls the contents of the current window down so that
the first few lines appear at the bottom of the window.  It moves
point so that it appears centered vertically in the window.

~previous-position	Go to the previous matching line.

This command moves to the previous compiler error message by calling
previous-error, or to the previous match found by the grep
command by calling previous-match, depending on whether you've
run a process or compilation command, or a grep command, most
recently.

If a window displays the file containing the match, Epsilon switches
to that window.  Otherwise, it uses the find-file command to
display the file in the current window.  It then goes to the
appropriate line of the file.  A positive numeric argument of n moves
to the nth previous match.  A negative numeric argument of -n moves
to the nth next match.  A numeric argument of zero goes to the same
place as last time.

~previous-tag	Go to the previous tag with this name.

After you use the goto-tag or pluck-tag commands to go to a
tag that occurs in multiple places, you can use this command to go to
the previous instance of the tag.

~previous-window	Move to the previous window.

This command moves to the previous window, wrapping around to the
last window if invoked from the first window.

You can think of the window order as the position of a window in a
list of windows.  Initially only one window appears in the list.
When you split a window, the two child windows replace it in the
list.  The top or left window comes before the bottom or right
window.  When you delete a window, that window leaves the list.

~print-buffer	Print the current buffer.

This command prints the current buffer.  Under Windows, it displays
the standard Windows printing dialog.  You can choose to print the
current selection, the entire buffer, or just certain pages.

Under other environments, this command prints the current highlighted
region.  If no region in the buffer is highlighted, the command
prints the entire buffer.  It prompts for the device name of your
printer, storing your response in the variable print-destination
(or, under Unix, print-destination-unix), and then writes a copy
of the buffer to that device.  For DOS or OS/2, the printer device
name is typically something like LPT1 or COM2.

If the printer name begins with the ! character, Epsilon interprets
the remainder of the name as a command line to execute in order to
print a file.  Epsilon substitutes the file to be printed for any %f
sequence in the command line.  For example, if your system requires
you to type "netprint filename" to print a file, enter !netprint %f
as the device name and Epsilon will run that command, passing it the
file name of the temporary file it generates holding the text to
print.  The device name can include any of the file name template
sequences, such as %p for the path to the file to print.

If the variable print-tabs is zero, Epsilon will make a copy of
the text to print and convert any tabs into spaces before sending it
to the printer.

~print-buffer-no-prompt	Print the current buffer without prompting.

This command prints the current buffer, exactly like
print-buffer, but doesn't prompt.  It uses default settings.

~print-region	Print the current region.

Under Windows, this command displays the standard Windows printing
dialog.  You can choose to print the current selection, the entire
buffer, or just certain pages.

Under other environments, this command always prints the current
region.  It prompts for the device name of your printer, storing your
response in the variable print-destination (or, under Unix,
print-destination-unix), and then writes a copy of the region to
that device.  For DOS or OS/2, the printer device name is typically
something like LPT1 or COM2.

If the printer name begins with the ! character, Epsilon interprets
the remainder of the name as a command line to execute in order to
print a file.  Epsilon substitutes the file to be printed for any %f
sequence in the command line.  For example, if your system requires
you to type "netprint filename" to print a file, enter !netprint %f
as the device name and Epsilon will run that command, passing it the
file name of the temporary file it generates holding the text to
print.  The device name can include any of the file name template
sequences, such as %p for the path to the file to print.

If the variable print-tabs is zero, Epsilon will make a copy of
the text to print and convert any tabs into spaces before sending it
to the printer.

~print-setup	Display the Print Setup dialog.

Under Windows, this command displays the standard Print Setup dialog.
You can choose a printer and select other options.  In other
environments, this command does nothing.

~process-enter	Send a line to the concurrent process.

Pressing the <Enter> key in process mode moves the error spot
backwards to point, so that Epsilon searches for error messages from
this new location.  If the process-enter-whole-line variable is
nonzero, Epsilon moves to the end of the current line before sending
it to the process, but only when in a line that has not yet been sent
to the process.  If the process-enter-whole-line variable is two,
Epsilon copies the current line to the end of the buffer, making it
easier to repeat a command.

~process-mode	Interact with a concurrent process.

Epsilon puts its process buffer in this mode.  Pressing the <Enter>
key in process mode moves the error spot backwards to point, so that
Epsilon searches for error messages from this new location.

~process-next-cmd	Retrieve the next command from the history list.

Epsilon's concurrent process buffer maintains a command history.
This command retrieves the next command from the history.  Use it
following a process-previous-cmd command.

~process-previous-cmd	Retrieve the previous command from the history list.

Epsilon's concurrent process buffer maintains a command history.
This command retrieves the previous command from the history.  Also
see process-next-cmd command.

~profile	Collect timing information on EEL commands.

This command starts a recursive edit and begins collecting timing
data.  Many times per second, Epsilon makes a note of the currently
executing EEL source line.  When you exit with exit-level, it
fills a buffer named "profile" with this timing data.  Epsilon
doesn't collect any profiling information on commands or subroutines
that you compile with the -s option.  This command isn't available in
Epsilon for Windows 3.1.

~program-keys	Change low-level key mapping.

This command presents a menu of choices that make changes to the keys
Epsilon can use (useful mainly under DOS).

~push	Invoke an inferior command processor.

This command invokes a command processor, or shell.  While in the
command processor, you can do whatever you normally do outside of
Epsilon.  If you prefix a numeric argument, the command prompts you
for a line to pass to the command processor.  After the command
finishes, a message telling you to type any key to continue appears.
This allows you to look at your output before Epsilon again claims
the screen.  After you have passed a command to the command
processor, that command becomes the default command until you type in
another one.

Unlike start-process, this command will work with all but the
most extremely misbehaved programs.

~query-replace	Interactively replace strings.

This command behaves like replace-string.  Instead of replacing
everything automatically, it positions point after each occurrence of
the old string, and you may select whether or not to replace it.
With a numeric argument, the command will match only complete words.

Y or <Space> replaces and goes to the next match.

N or <Backspace> doesn't replace, but goes to the next match.

<Esc> exits immediately.

. replaces and then exits.

^ backs up to the previous match.

! replaces all remaining occurrences.

, replaces the current match but doesn't go to the next match.

Ctrl-R enters a recursive edit, allowing you to modify the buffer
arbitrarily.  When you exit the recursive edit with exit-level, the
query-replace continues.

Ctrl-G exits and returns point to its original location.

Ctrl-W toggles the state of word mode.

Ctrl-T toggles the state of regular expression mode (see the
description of regex-replace).

Ctrl-C toggles the state of case-folding.

Any other key causes query-replace to exit and any command bound
to that key to execute.

~quick-dired-command	Perform operations on the current file.

This command provides a convenient way to perform various operations
on the file associated with the current buffer.  It prompts for
another key, with choices as listed below.  Many of them are similar
to the corresponding commands in a dired buffer.

D deletes the file associated with the current buffer, after
prompting for confirmation.

C copies the file associated with the current buffer, prompting for a
destination.  If the buffer contains unsaved changes, they won't be
in the copy; this command affects the file on disk only.

M renames or moves the file associated with the current buffer,
prompting for a destination.  It doesn't change the file name
associated with the current buffer, which will still refer to the
original file.

<Period> runs the dired command on the current file.

G changes the current directory to the one containing the current
file.

+ prompts for a subdirectory name, then creates a new subdirectory in
the directory containing the current file.

! prompts for a command line, then runs that command, appending the
current file name to it.

V runs the "viewer" for the current file; the program assigned to it
according to Windows file association.  For executable files, it runs
the program.  For document files, it typically runs the Windows
program assigned to that file extension.  (Epsilon for Windows only.)

T displays the Windows property page for the file.  (Epsilon for
Windows only.)

F opens the folder containing this file in Explorer.  (Epsilon for
Windows only.)

? displays this list of subcommands.

~quoted-insert	Take the next character literally.

The command reads another key and inserts it into the buffer, even if
that key would not normally run normal-character.  Nothing
happens if the key does not represent an 8-bit ASCII character.  Use
this command to insert control characters, meta characters, or
graphics characters into the buffer.

~read-session	Restore files from the last session.

By default, Epsilon automatically restores the previous session (the
files you were editing, the window configuration, bookmarks, search
strings, and so forth) only when you start it without specifying a
file name on the command line.  This command restores the previous
session manually.  Reading in a session file rereads any files
mentioned in the session file, as well as replacing search strings,
all bookmarks, and the window configuration.  (If there are unsaved
files, Epsilon asks if you want to save them first.)  Any files not
mentioned in the session file will remain, as will keyboard macros,
key bindings, and most variable settings.

~rebuild-menu	Put modified bindings into menu.

This command makes Epsilon reconstruct its menus, adding current key
bindings.

~record-kbd-macro	Start or stop recording a macro.

This command begins recording a keyboard macro.  Keys you press
execute normally, but also become part of an accumulating keyboard
macro.  Run this command again to finish defining the macro.

~redisplay	Rewrite the entire screen.

Normally Epsilon does not write to the screen during the execution of
a keyboard macro.  This command forces a complete rewrite of the
screen.  Use it if you need to create a keyboard macro that updates
the screen in the middle of execution.

~redo	Redo the last buffer change or movement.

This command reverses the effect of the last undo command.  If
repeated, it restores earlier changes.  You may remove the changes
again with undo.

~redo-changes	Redo, skipping over movement redo's.

This command operates like redo, except that it will
automatically redo all changes to the buffer that involve only
movements of point, and stop just before a change of actual buffer
contents.  When you invoke redo-changes, it performs a redo,
then continues to redo changes that consist only of movements of
point.

~regex-replace	Substitute for replace expressions.

This command functions like query-replace, but starts in regular
expression mode.

pat1|pat2 matches either pat1 or pat2.

pat* matches zero or more matches of pat.

pat+ matches one or more matches of pat.

pat? matches zero or one matches of pat.

[abx] matches any of the characters a, b, or x.

[^abx] matches any but a, b, or x.

[a-z3] matches a, b, c, ... z, or 3.

. matches any character except newline.

( ) group patterns for +, *, ?, and |.

^ only matches at the beginning of a line.

$ only matches at the end of a line.

<#50> means the character with ASCII code 50.

% removes the special meaning from the following character, so that
%$ matches only $.

! marks the end of the match.  The command does not change any
characters that match the pattern after the exclamation point.

In the replacement text, #1 means substitute the part of the text
that matched the first parenthesized pattern piece.  For example,
using regex-replace to replace "([A-Z][a-z]+)([.!?])" with "#2
ends #1" changes the text "Howard!" to "! ends Howard".  #0 means to
substitute the whole match.

~regex-search	Search for a string after point.

The command prompts for a regular expression, then positions point
after the next match of that pattern.  If no such match exists, a
message appears in the echo area.

pat1|pat2 matches either pat1 or pat2.

pat* matches zero or more matches of pat.

pat+ matches one or more matches of pat.

pat? matches zero or one matches of pat.

[abx] matches any of the characters a, b, or x.

[^abx] matches any but a, b, or x.

[a-z3] matches a, b, c, ... z, or 3.

. matches any character except newline.

( ) group patterns for +, *, ?, and |.

^ only matches at the beginning of a line.

$ only matches at the end of a line.

<#50> means the character with ASCII code 50.

% removes the special meaning from the following character, so that
%$ matches only $.

! marks the end of the match.

~release-notes	Display the release notes.

Epsilon searches for the file readme.txt and loads it.

~rename-buffer	Change the name of the current buffer.

Epsilon prompts for a buffer name, then renames the current buffer.

~replace-again	Do the last replacement again.

This command repeats the last replace command you did, using the same
text to search for, and the same replacement text.

~replace-string	Replace one string with another.

The command asks you for the old and new strings.  From point to the
end of the buffer, it replaces occurrences of the old string with the
new string.  If you prefix a numeric argument, it will only replace
matches that consist of complete words.  See also query-replace.

~retag-files	Tag all files again.

This command retags all files in mentioned in the current tag file.

~reverse-incremental-search	Incremental search backwards.

This command starts incremental-search in reverse.

~reverse-regex-search	Search for a string before point.

This command prompts for a regular expression, then positions point
before the first match of that string before point.  If no such match
exists, a message appears in the echo area.

~reverse-replace	Interactively replace strings, moving backward.

This command behaves like query-replace, but searches backward
through the buffer for text to replace, instead of forward.  It
positions point before each occurrence of the old string, and you may
select whether or not to replace it.  With a numeric argument, the
command will match only complete words.

~reverse-search-again	Search backward for the same search string.

~reverse-sort-buffer	Reverse sort the current buffer.

This command asks for the name of a buffer and fills it with a copy
of the current buffer reverse sorted by lines.  If you specify a
numeric argument of n, the command will ignore the first n columns on
each line when comparing lines.

~reverse-sort-region	Reverse sort part of the buffer in place.

This command reverse sorts in place the lines of the current buffer
appearing between point and mark.  If you specify a numeric argument
of n, the command will ignore the first n columns on each line when
comparing lines.

~reverse-string-search	Reverse search in non-incremental mode.

This command starts a reverse search in non-incremental mode.  It
functions like starting a reverse-incremental-search, then
disabling incremental searching with Ctrl-O.

~revert-file	Read the current file into this buffer again.

Epsilon replaces the contents of the current buffer with the contents
of the current file on disk.  If the current buffer has unsaved
changes, Epsilon asks if you want to discard the changes by reading
the file.

~save-all-buffers	Save every buffer that contains a file.

This command will save all modified buffers except those that do not
have files associated with them.  If it encounters some sort of error
while saving the file, this command displays the error message, and
aborts any running keyboard macros.

~save-file	Save the buffer to its file.

This command writes the contents of the current buffer to its file.
If the current buffer does not have an associated file, Epsilon asks
for a file name.  If it encounters some sort of problem (like no more
disk space), an appropriate error message appears in the echo area.
Otherwise, Epsilon displays the file name in the echo area.  To
explicitly write the contents of the buffer to a file whose name you
specify, use the write-file command.

~scroll-down	Scroll the buffer contents down.

This command scrolls the contents of the current window down one
line, and adjusts point if necessary to keep it in the window.

~scroll-left	Stop wrapping, then scroll the buffer contents to the left.

This command first causes Epsilon to scroll long lines.
Subsequently, it scrolls the buffer contents to the left by one
column.  If you prefix the command with a numeric argument, the
command enables scrolling, then scrolls the buffer contents that many
columns to the left.  The command adjusts point if necessary to stay
within the displayed section of the buffer.

~scroll-right	Scroll the buffer contents to the right, or wrap lines.

This command scrolls the buffer contents to the right by one column,
if possible.  If not possible, this command causes Epsilon to switch
to wrapping long lines.  This command adjusts point if necessary to
stay within the displayed section of the buffer.

~scroll-up	Scroll the buffer contents up.

This command scrolls the contents of the current window up by one
line, then adjusts point if necessary to keep it in the window.

~search-again	Repeat the last search in the same direction.

This command searches again for the last text you searched for, in
the same direction as before.

~search-all-help-files	Look for a keyword in a list of help files.

This command searches for a keyword in any one of a list of help
files.  If you highlight a keyword first, Epsilon will look for help
on the highlighted text.  Otherwise, Epsilon will display a list of
possible keywords.

Before you can use this command, you should use the
select-help-files command to tell Epsilon which help files it
should search.  You can also edit the file epswhlp.cnt to modify the
list of help files.

This command is only available under Windows 95/98 and Windows NT
(3.51 and later).

~select-buffer	Display a buffer in the current window.

This command prompts for a buffer name.  If a buffer with that name
exists, the command connects it to the current window.  Otherwise, it
creates a buffer with the indicated name, and connects that to the
current window.  If you just press <Enter> to the prompt for a
buffer, it defaults to the last buffer associated with the current
window.  So, repeated Ctrl-X B's will generally switch back and forth
between two buffers.

~select-help-files	Add installed help files to Epsilon's menu.

You can set up Epsilon for Windows to search for help on a
programming language construct (like an API function or a C++
keyword) in a series of help files.  First use this command to look
for some common help files that may be on your disk.  It will prompt
for a list of drive letters, then show you the help files it found.

After you have an opportunity to edit the list of help files, the
command then adds the help files to Epsilon's Help menu, to the
context menu that the secondary mouse button displays, and to the
list of files searched by the search-all-help-files command on
the Help menu.  Edit the file gui.mnu to further modify the contents
of Epsilon's menus.

When you select a help file from the menu after running this command,
Epsilon will open that help file.  If you highlight a keyword first,
Epsilon will look for help on the highlighted text.  Otherwise,
Epsilon will display the help file's table of contents or a list of
keywords.  (See the winhelp-display-contents variable for
details.)

~select-tag-file	Change to a different tag file.

This command prompts for a file name, then starts using the tags in
that file instead of the ones in the current tag file.

~set-abort-key	Specify the key which interrupts commands.

You can set the abort key with the set-abort-key command.
Pressing the abort key cancels any currently executing keyboard
macros.  If you interrupt Epsilon while reading a file from disk or
writing a file to disk, it will ask you whether you want to abort or
continue.  You must set the abort key to an unprefixed key.

~set-any-variable	Set even dangerous variables.

Like set-variable, this command prompts for the name of a
variable, then for a new value.  Unlike set-variable, however,
this command lets you set even those internal variables that may
produce unexpected or undesired side-effects if you set them.

~set-bookmark	Remember the current editing position.

This command remembers the current buffer and position, so that you
can easily return to it later with jump-to-last-bookmark.
Epsilon stores the last 10 bookmarks that you set with this command.
See also set-named-bookmark and jump-to-named-bookmark.

~set-color	Select new screen colors.

This command displays a map of possible screen color combinations.
By moving the cursor, you may select a color for each element on the
screen, called a color class.  The N and P keys change from one color
class to the next (or previous), and the arrow keys change the color
of the currently-selected color class.

Epsilon has several pre-configured sets of color classes.  These are
known as color schemes.  Use the F and B keys to select a color
scheme.  You can then fine-tune it using the above commands.  Or you
can press D to define a brand-new color scheme based on the current
one.

Once you've selected colors, you can make them permanent for the
current editing session by pressing the S key.  (Use the
write-state command to save the changes for future editing
sessions.)  Or you can press T to try out the colors in a recursive
editing session.  Run the exit-level command on Ctrl-x Ctrl-z to
return to setting colors.  If you decide you don't like the colors,
you can cancel all your changes by pressing C.

You can use the mouse to select colors, too.  Click on a name to
select a color scheme or color class.  Click on a color to select it.
Click on the capital letters in the help window to run those commands
(like S to set).

In Epsilon for Unix, when running as an X window manager program, the
set-color command is not used for setting colors, only for
selecting a particular color scheme.  To set colors in this version,
edit an EEL file like mycolors.e.  Epsilon's default color schemes
are defined in the file stdcolor.e.

Epsilon lets you choose one color scheme for non-GUI color displays,
one for non-GUI mono displays, and one for the GUI version, and
remembers each choice separately.  Using set-color to pick a
different color scheme only affects one of the three.

~set-comment-column	Specify where comments go.

This command set the value of the comment-column variable to the
current column.  With a positive argument, it sets the variable based
on the indentation of the previous comment in the buffer.  In that
case, it also reindents any comment on the line.

With a negative argument, it doesn't change the comment column, but
runs the kill-comment command to remove the line's comment.

~set-debug	Enable or disable single-stepping for a command or subroutine.

This command prompts you for the name of a command or subroutine,
with completion.  With no numeric argument, this command toggles the
debugging status for that function.  With a non-zero numeric
argument, the command enables the debugging status.  With a zero
numeric argument, it disables the debugging status.

Whenever Epsilon calls a function with debugging enabled, the Epsilon
debugger starts, and displays the function's source code at the
bottom of the screen.  A <Space> executes the next line of the
function, a G turns off debugging until the function returns, and ?
shows all the debugger's commands.  If you compile a function with
the system switch (eel -s filename), you cannot use the debugger on
it.

~set-dialog-font	Select the font to use in Epsilon dialogs.

Use this command to select the font Epsilon uses in dialog windows
(like the one bufed displays).  It sets the variable
font-dialog.

~set-display-characters	Select new screen characters.

The set-display-characters command lets you alter the various
characters that Epsilon uses to construct its display.  The command
displays a matrix of possible characters, and guides you through the
selection process.

The first group specifies which graphic characters Epsilon should use
to draw window borders.  It defines all the line-drawing characters
needed for drawing four different styles of borders, and all possible
intersections of these.

The next group specifies which characters Epsilon uses to display
various special characters like <Tab> or Control-E.  For example,
Epsilon usually displays a control character with the ^ symbol.  Set
the appropriate character in this group to make Epsilon use a
different character.  You can also make Epsilon display a special
character at the end of each line, or change the continuation
character.

The following group defines the characters Epsilon uses to display
window scroll bars.  Epsilon replaces the window's selected border
characters with characters from this group.

Epsilon uses the last group for its graphical mouse cursor.  When
Epsilon for DOS uses a graphical mouse cursor, it must redefine the
appearance of nine characters.  By default, Epsilon uses nine
non-ASCII graphic characters, including some math symbols and some
block graphic characters.  Set the characters in this group to alter
the reserved characters Epsilon uses.  As you move the mouse around,
the appearance of these characters will change.  If you edit a binary
file with these characters in single-character graphic mode (where
Epsilon displays the IBM graphic characters for control and meta
characters), you may wish to use a block mouse cursor by setting
mouse-graphic-cursor to 0, or starting with the -kc1 flag.

~set-display-look	Make the screen look like another editor.

This command makes Epsilon's window decoration and screen appearance
resemble that of some other editor.  It displays a menu of choices.
You can select Epsilon's original look, Brief's look, the look of the
DOS Edit program (which is the same as the QBasic program), or the
look of Borland's IDE.

~set-file-name	Change the file name associated with this buffer.

This command prompts for a new file name for the current buffer, and
changes the file name associated with the buffer.  The next time you
save the file, Epsilon will save it under the new name.

~set-fill-column	Set the column at which filling occurs.

If you provide a numeric argument, the command sets the fill column
for the current buffer to that value.  Otherwise, the command prompts
you for a new fill column, with the point's column offered as a
default.  The fill column controls what auto fill mode and the
filling commands consider the right margin.

To set the default value for new buffers you create, use the
set-variable command on F8 to set the default value of the
margin-right variable.

~set-font	Select a different font.

This command changes the font Epsilon uses, by displaying a font
dialog box and letting you pick a new font.  It's available under
Windows and X.

~set-line-translate	Specify Epsilon's line translation scheme.

The operating system uses the sequence of characters Return Newline
to indicate the end of a line.  Epsilon normally changes this
sequence to a single Newline when it reads in a file (by removing all
the Return characters).  When it writes a file, it adds a Return
before each Newline character.

Epsilon automatically selects one of several other translation types
when appropriate, based on the contents of the file you edit (regular
text, binary, Unix, or Macintosh).  You can explicitly override this
if Epsilon guesses wrong by providing a numeric argument to a file
reading command like find-file.  Epsilon will then prompt for
which translation scheme to use.

This command sets the desired translation method for the current
buffer.  It prompts for the desired type of translation, and makes
future file reads and writes in this buffer use that translation.
Epsilon will display "Binary", "Unix", "DOS", or "Mac" in the mode
line to indicate any special translation in effect.

~set-mark	Set the mark to the current position.

Commands that operate on a region of the buffer use the mark and
point to delimit the region.  This command sets the mark to the
current value of point.

~set-named-bookmark	Name the current editing position.

This command prompts you for a letter, then associates that letter
with a bookmark at the current location.  Subsequently, you can
return to that location with the jump-to-named-bookmark command.
If you provide a digit instead of a letter, Epsilon sets the
appropriate temporary bookmark (0 refers to the last one, 1 to the
one before that, and so on).  You can press '?' to get a list of the
currently defined bookmarks, along with the text that contains the
bookmarks.  To select one, simply move to the desired bookmark and
press <Enter>.

See also set-bookmark and jump-to-last-bookmark.

~set-printer-font	Select the font to use when printing.

Use this command to select the font Epsilon uses when printing.  It
sets the variable font-printer.

~set-show-graphic	Enable or disable use of IBM graphic characters.

By default, Epsilon displays most control characters by prefixing to
them a caret, e.g., Control C appears as "^C".  It displays other
characters, including international characters, with their graphic
symbol.  Epsilon has four different modes for displaying all these
characters.

In mode 0, Epsilon displays Meta characters (characters with the 8th
bit on) by prefixing to them a "M-", e.g., Meta C appears as "M-C".
Epsilon display Control-meta characters by prefixing to them "M-^",
e.g., "M-^C".  Epsilon displays most control characters by prefixing
to them a caret, e.g., Control C appears as "^C".

In mode 1, all-graphic mode, Epsilon uses graphic characters to
display all control characters and meta characters (except for the
few that have a special meaning, like <Tab> or <Newline>).

In mode 2, hex mode, Epsilon displays control and meta characters by
their hexadecimal ASCII values, with an "x" before them to indicate
hex.

In mode 3, which is the default, Epsilon displays control characters
as "^C", and uses the graphic symbol for other characters, as
described above.

If you provide no numeric argument, this command cycles to the next
mode in the above list.  A numeric argument of 0, 1, 2, or 3 selects
the corresponding mode.

~set-tab-size	Set how many columns are between tab settings.

This command sets the number of spaces between tab stops for the
current buffer.  If given a numeric argument, Epsilon sets the tab
size to that number.  Otherwise the command prompts for the tab size.
By default, Epsilon puts tab settings every 8 columns.  Some language
modes like C mode default to a different setting; see
c-tab-override and similarly-named variables.

~set-variable	Set any EEL variable.

This command prompts for the name of a variable and a new value for
that variable.  This command cannot set variables with complicated
types involving structures or pointers.  After setting the variable,
Epsilon shows the new value using show-variable.

If you specify a buffer-specific or window-specific variable, Epsilon
uses the numeric argument to determine whether to set the value for
the current buffer or window (zero numeric argument), the default
value (negative numeric argument), or both (positive numeric
argument).  If you provide no numeric argument, Epsilon asks which of
these values to set.

~set-video	Change to a particular number of lines or columns.

This command asks for a screen mode of the form 80x25, then tries to
put the display in that mode.  Typing ? shows the available modes.
(DOS, OS/2 only)

~set-want-backup-file	Turn backup files on or off in this buffer.

This command toggles whether or not Epsilon makes a backup file each
time you save the current buffer.

~shell-mode	Set up for editing shell scripts.

This command puts the current buffer in a mode suitable for editing
Unix shell scripts and similar files.

~show-bindings	Find a key bound to a command.

The command prompts for a command name, then displays a message
telling which keys, if any, run that command.

~show-connections	Show all Internet connection buffers.

This command lists all active Telnet, FTP, and similar Internet
activities and buffers.  You can select a buffer and press <Enter> to
switch to it, or press <Escape> to remain in the current buffer.

~show-last-keys	Display recently typed keys.

This command pops up a window that displays the last 60 keystrokes
you typed.

~show-matching-delimiter	Insert character and show match.

This command first invokes normal-character to insert the key
that invoked it, then shows the delimiter character matching this one
using find-delimiter.  Some people like to bind this command to
keys such as ")" or "}".

~show-menu	Display a menu of commands.

This command displays a menu of commands and lets you choose one.
Use the arrow keys to navigate through the menu.  Letter keys move to
the next command in the current column beginning with that letter.
Press <Enter> to execute the highlighted command, or click on a
command with the mouse.  Press Ctrl-G or <Esc> to exit from the menu.

~show-point	Show information about point.

This command displays the column number, value of point, and size of
the buffer, as well as the ASCII, decimal, and hex codes of the
character after point.  The file will probably occupy more space on
disk than the buffer size indicates, due to the line translation
scheme that Epsilon uses when reading and writing files.  Use the
count-lines command, bound to Ctrl-X L, to get the exact number
of bytes the buffer would occupy on disk.

~show-standard-bitmaps	Display available icons for the tool bar.

You can use this function to see some of the icons that may appear on
Epsilon's tool bar (Windows 95/98, NT only).  It's useful when
modifying the contents of the tool bar.

~show-variable	Display the value of an EEL variable.

This command prompts for the name of a variable and displays its
value in the echo area.  This command cannot show variables with
complicated types involving structures or pointers.  If the variable
can have a different value for each buffer or window (buffer-specific
or window-specific), this command uses its numeric argument or asks
the user in the same fashion as set-variable.

~show-version	Display Epsilon's version number.

This command displays Epsilon's version number in the echo area.
Epsilon automatically invokes this command at startup.

~show-view-bitmaps	Display available icons for the tool bar.

You can use this function to see some of the icons that may appear on
Epsilon's tool bar (Windows 95/98, NT only).  It's useful when
modifying the contents of the tool bar.

~shrink-window	Shrink the current window by one line.

If possible, the mode line of the window on top of the current window
moves down.  Otherwise, the current window's mode line moves up.
This command has no effect if it would make the current window
smaller than two lines, counting the mode line.

~shrink-window-horizontally	Shrink the current window by one column.

If possible, the left boundary of the current window moves to the
right by one column.  Otherwise, the right boundary moves to the left
by one column.  This command has no effect if it would make the
window smaller than one character wide.

~shrink-window-interactively	Use arrow keys to resize a window.

This command lets you interactively change the size of the current
window.  After you invoke the command, use the arrow keys to point to
a window border.  The indicated border moves in a direction so as to
make the current window smaller.  Keep pressing arrow keys to move
window borders.  To switch from shrinking to enlarging, press the
minus key.  Thereafter, the arrow keys cause the window border to
move in a direction so as to enlarge the window.  When the window
looks right, press <Enter> to leave the command.

~sort-buffer	Sort the current buffer.

This command asks for the name of a buffer and fills it with a copy
of the current buffer sorted by lines.  If you specify a numeric
argument of n, the command will compare lines starting at column n.

~sort-region	Sort part of the buffer in place.

This command sorts in place the lines of the current buffer appearing
between point and mark.  If you specify a numeric argument of n, the
command will ignore the first n columns on each line when comparing
lines.

~sort-tags	Sort the list of tags manually.

By default, Epsilon sorts the tag list whenever it needs to display a
list of tag names for you to choose from.  Instead, you can set the
want-sorted-tags variable to 0, and sort the tags manually,
whenever you want, using this command.

~split-window	Split the current window in two.

This command splits the current window into two windows, one on top
of the other, occupying the same total space.  Nothing happens if
either resulting window would have fewer than two lines of height
(counting the mode line).

~split-window-vertically	Split the current window in two.

This command splits the current window into two windows, one beside
the other, occupying the same total space.  Nothing happens if either
resulting window would have fewer than one character of width.

~standard-toolbar	Display Epsilon's normal tool bar.

Epsilon calls this function to display its tool bar (Windows 95/98,
NT only).  By redefining the function, you can change what appears on
the tool bar.

~start-kbd-macro	Start defining a keyboard macro.

After you invoke this command, everything you type executes normally,
but it also becomes part of an accumulating keyboard macro.  The
macro definition ends when you invoke the end-kbd-macro command.

~start-process	Invoke a concurrent command processor.

You can create a concurrent subprocess with Epsilon.  The
start-process command shows the "Process" buffer in the current
window, and starts a command processor running in it.  Epsilon will
capture the output of commands that you run in the window, and insert
that output into the process buffer.  When the process reads input
from its standard input, Epsilon will give it the characters that you
insert at the end of the buffer.  You can move to other windows or
buffers and issue Epsilon commands during the execution of a
concurrent process.

With a numeric argument, the start-process command will prompt
for a command line, and will pass that line to the command processor
to do just that command.  The stop-process command will stop a
running program, just as Ctrl-C would outside of Epsilon.  Under DOS,
the stop-process command will not take effect until the program's
next DOS call, exclusive of console input or output.  You may
generate an end-of-file for a program reading from the standard input
by inserting a Control-Z (quoted with Ctrl-Q) on a line by itself, at
the end of the buffer.

Programs invoked with this command should not do any cursor
positioning or graphics.  We provide the concurrent process facility
primarily to let you run programs like compilers, linkers,
assemblers, filters, etc.

Epsilon will let you run only one other program at a time.  If you
exit Epsilon with a concurrent process running, Epsilon kills the
concurrent process, except under DOS.  In the DOS version, you cannot
have a program running concurrently when you exit Epsilon.  To stop a
command processor, use the command "exit".  Epsilon will then say
"Exited", and you can leave Epsilon, or start another process.

~stop-process	Abort the concurrent process.

For DOS, this command makes a concurrent process (see
start-process) believe that you typed Control-Break.  You cannot
stop in this manner programs which do no DOS calls other than console
input or output.  With a numeric argument, however, the command stops
the process in a different way, and can stop any program but causes
some (including early versions of the command processor) to crash the
system.  Use this command with a numeric argument only after you've
tried it without one.

In other environments, this command makes a concurrent process
believe you typed Control-Break (or, for Unix, the interrupt key), as
in DOS, but without the restrictions and complications described
above.

~string-search	Start a search in non-incremental mode.

This command starts a search in non-incremental mode.  It works like
starting an incremental search with the incremental-search
command, then disabling incremental mode with Ctrl-O.

~suspend-epsilon	Suspend or minimize Epsilon for Unix.

This command suspends Epsilon for Unix, returning control to the
shell that launched it.  Use the shell's fg command to resume
Epsilon.  When Epsilon runs as an X program, it instead minimizes
Epsilon's window.

~switch-windows	Switch to the next or previous window.

This command switches to the next window.  Hold down shift while
pressing its key, and it will switch to the previous window.

~tabify-buffer	Replace spaces in buffer with the right number of tabs.

This command removes all sequences of spaces and tabs throughout the
buffer.  In their place, it inserts a sequence of tabs followed by a
sequence of spaces to reach the same column that the prior whitespace
did.

~tabify-region	Convert whitespace to tabs.

Between point and mark, this command removes all sequences of spaces
and tabs.  In their place, it inserts a sequence of tabs followed by
a sequence of spaces to reach the same column that the prior
whitespace did.

~tag-files	Locate all tags in the given files.

This command prompts for a file name or file pattern.  In each file,
it locates each subroutine or function and makes a tag for it, so
commands like goto-tag can find it later.  You can use extended
file patterns to tag files in multiple directories.

With a prefix numeric argument, this command tags function
declarations as well as function definitions, and external variable
declarations as well as variable definitions.  Use a numeric argument
if you have an #include file for a package but no source file, and
you want tag references to a function in the package to go to the
#include file.

~telnet	Connect to a remote computer and run a shell.

The telnet command lets you connect to a command shell on a
remote computer.  It puts you in a buffer that works much like the
Epsilon process buffer, except the commands you type are executed on
the remote machine.  Provide a numeric prefix argument and telnet
will connect on the specified port instead of the default port.  You
can either use the telnet command directly, or specify a telnet:
URL to find-file.  (Epsilon ignores any username or password
included in the URL.)

~telnet-mode	Connect to a remote computer and send commands.

In Telnet mode, the key Ctrl-C immediately sends an interrupt signal
to the remote machine, and Ctrl-O immediately sends a Ctrl-O
character (which typically makes the remote machine discard pending
output).

~tex-boldface	Make boldface text in TeX mode.

This command inserts the TeX command to make a section of text bold.
You can highlight a block of text first and Epsilon will make the
text bold, or you can use the command and then type the text to be
bold.

~tex-center-line	Create a centered line of text in TeX mode.

This command inserts the TeX or LaTeX command to center a line of
text.  (See the variable tex-force-latex.)

~tex-display-math	Insert \] when you type \[.

When you type \[, this command inserts \] for you.

~tex-environment	Create the specified LaTeX environment.

This command prompts for the name of a LaTeX environment, then
inserts LaTeX \begin{env} and \end{env} commands for that
environment.  You can highlight a block of text first and Epsilon
will put the environment commands around it, or you can run this
command and then type the text to go in that environment.  Press ? to
select an environment from a list.  (The list of environments comes
from the file latex.env, which you can edit.)

~tex-footnote	Make a footnote in TeX mode.

This command inserts the TeX command to mark a section of text as a
footnote.  You can highlight a block of text first and Epsilon will
make it a footnote, or you can use the command and then type the
footnote.

~tex-force-quote	Insert a " character.

This command inserts a true " character.  Normally typing " itself
inserts either a `` or a '' sequence.

~tex-inline-math	Insert \) when you type \(.

When you type \(, this command inserts \) for you.

~tex-italic	Make italic text in TeX mode.

This command inserts the TeX command to make a section of text
italic.  You can highlight a block of text first and Epsilon will
make the text italic, or you can use the command and then type the
italic text.

~tex-left-brace	Insert } when you type {.

This command inserts a matched pair of braces.  After a \ character,
it inserts a \ before the closing brace.  But if you type this key
just before a non-whitespace character, it inserts only a {.  This
makes it easier to surround existing text with braces.

~tex-math-escape	Insert $ when you type $.

This command inserts a matched pair of $ characters (except after a \
character).

~tex-mode	Set up for editing TeX or LaTeX documents.

This command sets up Epsilon for editing TeX or LaTeX documents.
Keys in TeX mode include Alt-i for italic text, Alt-Shift-I for
slanted text, Alt-Shift-T for typewriter, Alt-Shift-B for boldface,
Alt-Shift-C for small caps, Alt-Shift-F for a footnote, and Alt-s for
a centered line.  Alt-Shift-E prompts for the name of a LaTeX
environment, then inserts \begin{env} and \end{env} lines.

For all these commands, you can highlight a block of text first and
Epsilon will make the text italic, slanted, etc. or you can use the
command and then type the text to be italic, slanted, etc.

The keys '{' and '$' insert matched pairs of characters (either {} or
$$), the keys <Comma> and <Period> remove a preceding italic
correction \/, the " key inserts the appropriate kind of doublequote
sequence like `` or '', and Alt-" inserts an actual " character.

~tex-quote	Insert the right TeX doublequote sequence.

This command inserts the appropriate doublequote sequence like `` or
'', based on the preceding characters.  Alt-" inserts an actual "
character.

~tex-rm-correction	Remove an italic correction.

This command removes any nearby italic correction \/ when appropriate.

~tex-slant	Make slanted text in TeX mode.

This command inserts the TeX command to make a section of text
slanted.  You can highlight a block of text first and Epsilon will
make the text slanted, or you can use the command and then type the
text to be slanted.

~tex-small-caps	Make small caps text in TeX mode.

This command inserts the TeX command to set a section of text in
small caps.  You can highlight a block of text first and Epsilon will
put the text in small caps, or you can use the command and then type
the text.

~tex-typewriter	Use a typewriter font in TeX mode.

This command inserts the TeX command to set a section of text in a
typewriter font.  You can highlight a block of text first and Epsilon
will set that text in a typewriter font, or you can use the command
and then type the text.

~to-indentation	Move point to the end of the indentation.

This command positions point before the first non-whitespace
character in the line.

~to-left-edge	Move to the left edge of the window.

This command moves point to the left edge of the current window.

~to-right-edge	Move to the right edge of the window.

This command moves point to the right edge of the current window.

~toggle-borders	Remove borders around windows, use color to distinguish them.

This command removes the borders around ordinary tiled windows,
letting the text regions occupy more of the screen.  If the windows
have no borders already, this command restores them.  When this
command reenables borders, it does so according to the settings of
the variables border-left, border-top, and so forth.  Epsilon
displays a border only if the appropriate variable has been set, and
toggle-borders hasn't disabled all borders.

When there are no window borders, Epsilon provides each window with
its own separate color scheme, in place of the single one selected by
set-color.  (You can still use set-color to set the
individual colors in a color scheme, but Epsilon doesn't care which
particular color scheme you select when it displays the contents of
individual windows.  It does use the selected color scheme for other
parts of the screen like the echo area or screen border.)

The color schemes Epsilon uses for borderless windows have names like
"window-black", "window-blue" and so forth.  Epsilon assigns them to
windows in the same order they appear in set-color.  You can
remove one from consideration using the delete-name command, or
create a new one using set-color (give it a name starting with
"window-").

~toggle-menu-bar	Toggle whether a permanent menu bar appears.

Add a menu bar at the top of the screen, moving windows down one
line.  If Epsilon already displays a menu bar, remove it.

~toggle-scroll-bar	Toggle whether tiled windows have permanent scroll bars.

Put a scroll bar on the right edge of all tiled windows.  If tiled
windows already have scroll bars, remove them.

~toggle-toolbar	Turn the tool bar on or off.

Under Windows 95/98 and Windows NT (3.51 or later), Epsilon for
Windows can display a tool bar.  Position the mouse over a tool bar
button for a moment and Epsilon will describe what it does.  This
command hides or displays the tool bar.

~transpose-characters	Swap the characters around point.

At the end of a line, the command switches the two previous
characters.  At the beginning of a line, it switches the following
two characters.  Otherwise, it switches the characters before and
after point.  If the current line has less than two characters,
however, nothing happens.  Point never changes.

~transpose-lines	Swap the current and previous lines.

After the exchange, the command positions point between the two lines.

~transpose-words	Swap the current and previous words.

The command leaves untouched the text between the words.  After the
exchange, the command positions point between the two words.

~tutorial	This command shows Epsilon's tutorial.

~unbind-key	Remove the binding from a key.

This command prompts for a key, then removes the binding of that key.

~undo	Undo the last buffer change or movement.

This command undoes the last change you made to the buffer.  If
repeated, it undoes earlier changes.  You may reinstate the changes
with redo.

~undo-changes	Undo, skipping over movement redo's.

This command operates like undo, except that it will
automatically undo all changes to the buffer that involve only
movements of point, and stop just before a change of actual buffer
contents.  When you invoke undo-changes, it performs an undo,
then continues to undo changes that consist only of movements to
point.

~uniq	Remove extra copies of duplicate lines.

The command goes through the current buffer and looks for adjacent
identical lines, deleting the duplicate copies of each repeated line
and leaving just one.  It doesn't modify any lines that only occur
once.  Also see the keep-unique-lines and
keep-duplicate-lines command.

~untabify-buffer	Replace tabs in the buffer with spaces.

This command replaces each tab in the buffer by the number of spaces
required to fill the same number of columns.

~untabify-region	Convert tabs to spaces between point and mark.

This command replaces each tab between point and mark by the number
of spaces required to fill the same number of columns.

~untag-files	Discard tags for one or more files.

This command constructs a list of all files represented in the
current tag file.  You can edit the list in a recursive edit. When
you exit the recursive edit with the exit-level command on Ctrl-X
Ctrl-Z, any files you've removed from the list will be untagged.

~up-line	Point moves to the previous line.

The command tries to keep point near the same horizontal position.

~uppercase-word	Make the current word upper case.

Point travels forward through the buffer as with forward-word,
changing all the letters it encounters to upper case.  If the current
buffer contains a highlighted region, Epsilon instead changes all the
letters in the region to upper case, leaving point unchanged.

~view-lugaru-web-site	Connect to Lugaru's web site.

This command starts your web browser and points it to Lugaru's web
site.  It only works under Epsilon for Windows, on systems with more
recent web browsers.

~view-process	Pop up a window of process output; pick an error msg.

This command pops up a window showing the process buffer, including
all compiler command lines and any resulting error messages.  You can
move to any line and press <Enter>, and Epsilon will immediately
locate the error message on the current line (or a following line)
and move to the file and line number in error.

~visit-file	Read a file into the current buffer.

This command prompts for a file name, then reads that file into the
current buffer, and positions point to the beginning.  If no file
with the given name exists, it creates a blank buffer.  In either
case, the command discards the old buffer contents.

Before discarding modified buffers, the command asks if you want to
save the current buffer contents.  With a numeric argument, it asks
no questions.  This comes in handy for reverting the buffer to the
contents of its file.

~visual-diff	Use color-coding to compare two buffers.

The visual-diff command is like the diff command but uses
colors to show differences.  It compares the current buffer with the
one shown in the next window on the screen, and constructs a new
buffer that contains all the lines of the two buffers.  Lines from
the first buffer that don't appear in the second are displayed with a
red background.  Lines in the second buffer that don't appear in the
first have a yellow background.  Lines that are the same in both
buffers are colored normally.

~visual-diff-mode	Use color-coding to compare two buffers.

The visual-diff command creates a buffer in visual diff mode that
shows the changes between one buffer and another.  Added lines are
shown with a yellow background, deleted lines are shown with a red
background, and common lines are colored as in the original buffers.

In a visual-diff buffer, the keys Alt-<Down> and Alt-] move to the
start of the next changed or common section.  The keys Alt-<Up> and
Alt-[ move to the previous one.

~wall-chart	Make a chart of the current key bindings.

This command creates a wall chart consisting of all bound keys and
their current bindings.  You can print it using the print-buffer
command.

~what-is	Find a command bound to a key.

The command prompts for a key, then displays a message telling what
command runs when you press that key.

~widen-buffer	Restore normal access to the current buffer.

This command gives you normal access to the buffer.  Use it after a
narrow-to-region command to cancel the effect of that command.

~write-file	Write the buffer to a file.

This command prompts for a file name, then writes the buffer to a
file with that name.  The file associated with the current buffer
becomes that file, so subsequent uses of the save-file command
will write the buffer to that file without asking for a file name.
See also copy-to-file and save-file.

~write-files-and-exit	Save modified files, then leave Epsilon.

This command saves all modified buffers except those that do not have
files associated with them.  If there are no errors, it then exits
Epsilon.

~write-region	Write the region to the specified file.

The command prompts for a file name, then writes the characters
between point and mark to that file.

~write-session	Record the current file & window configuration.

The new write-session command writes a session file, detailing
the files you're currently editing, the window configuration, default
search strings, and so forth.  By default, Epsilon writes a session
file automatically whenever you exit, but you can use this command if
you prefer to save and restore sessions manually.

~write-state	Save all commands and variables for later automatic loading.

This command prompts for a file name.  It alters any extension to
".sta", and then loads the documentation file and records the
position of each of the definitions in it (to speed up the help
system).  Epsilon then writes all its commands, variables, and
bindings to the named file.  Restarting Epsilon with the command
"epsilon -sfilename", where "filename" denotes the name of the state
file, makes Epsilon use the commands in that file.  Epsilon normally
uses the state file "epsilon.sta".

~yank	Insert the contents of a kill buffer.

This command inserts the contents of the last kill buffer at point,
then positions point after the insertion, and the mark before it.  In
some modes this command then reindents the inserted text.  See the
reindent-after-yank variable.  If another program has placed text
on the Windows clipboard, this command will use it instead of the
kill buffer, except in keyboard macros.  See the clipboard-access
variable for more information.

If the kill buffer contains a rectangle, the command inserts it at
the current column, on the current and successive lines.  It shifts
existing text to the right, unless you've enabled overwrite mode, in
which case the block replaces any existing text in those columns.

~yank-pop	Cycle through previous kill buffers.

This command replaces the just-yanked kill buffer with the contents
of the previous kill buffer.  It only works after a yank or
yank-pop command.

~zoom-window	Zoom in on the current window.

This command, like the one-window command, makes the current
window occupy the entire screen.  But it also saves away the old
window configuration.  Later, when you invoke zoom-window again,
it restores the old window configuration.

~abort-file-matching	

Epsilon's file matching primitives respond to the abort key based on
the value of this variable.  If 0, they ignore the abort key.  If 1,
they abort out of the calling function.  If 2, they return an error
code.  EEL functions that are prepared to handle aborting should set
this variable.

~abort-key	System

Epsilon aborts the current command when you press the key whose value
is abort-key.  To disable the abort key, set abort-key to -1.
By default, the abort-key variable is set to Control-G.  For
correct behavior, use the set-abort-key command to set this
variable.

~abort-searching	

If the user presses the abort key during searching, Epsilon's
behavior depends upon the value of the abort-searching variable.
If it's 0, the key is ignored and the search continues.  If it's
ABORT_JUMP (-1, the default), Epsilon aborts the search and jumps
by calling the check_abort() primitive.  If it's ABORT_ERROR
(-2), Epsilon aborts the search and returns the value
ABORT_ERROR.  The search(), re_search(), re_match(),
and buffer_sort() primitives all use the abort-searching
variable to control aborting.

~all-must-build-mode	

Epsilon "precomputes" most of the text of each mode line, so it
doesn't have to figure out what to write each time it updates the
screen.  Setting the all-must-build-mode variable nonzero warns
Epsilon that all mode lines must be rebuilt.  Epsilon resets the
variable to zero after every screen update.

~already-made-backup	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon sets this buffer-specific variable nonzero whenever it saves
a file and makes a backup.

~alt-invokes-menu	Preference

In a typical Windows program, pressing and releasing the Alt key
without pressing any other key moves to the menu bar, highlighting
its first entry.  Set this variable to 1 if you want Epsilon to do
this.  The variable has no effect on what happens when you press Alt
and then press another key before releasing Alt: this will run
whatever command is bound to that key.  If you want Alt-E, for
example, to display the Edit menu, you can bind the command
invoke-windows-menu to it.

~anon-ftp-password	Preference

When Epsilon uses FTP to read or write files to a computer on the
Internet, and logs in anonymously, it provides the contents of this
variable as a password.  (Anonymous FTP sites ask that you provide
your email address as a password when you log in anonymously.)  You
can set this to your email address.

~argc	System

The argc variable contains the number of words on Epsilon's
command line, after Epsilon removes several flags it processes
internally.  The count includes the command name "epsilon" at the
start of the command line.

~auto-fill-indents	Preference Buffer-specific

When Epsilon automatically inserts new lines for you in auto fill
mode, it indents new lines (by calling the indenter function for the
current buffer) only if the buffer-specific variable
auto-fill-indents has a nonzero value.

~auto-indent	Preference Buffer-specific

Epsilon can automatically indent for you when you press <Enter>.
Setting the buffer-specific variable auto-indent nonzero makes
Epsilon do this.  The way Epsilon indents depends on the current
mode.  For example, C mode knows how to indent for C programs.  In
Epsilon's default mode, fundamental mode, Epsilon indents like
indent-previous if you set auto-indent nonzero.

~auto-menu-bar	Preference

If nonzero, moving the mouse past the top edge of the screen makes
Epsilon display the menu bar.  (DOS, OS/2 only)

~auto-read-changed-file	Preference Buffer-specific

If nonzero, when Epsilon notices that a file on disk has a different
timestamp than the file in memory, it automatically reads the new
version of the file and displays a message to that effect.  Epsilon
won't do this if you've edited the copy of the file in memory, or if
the file's disk size is substantially smaller than it was.  In those
cases, Epsilon asks what to do.  Also see the variable want-warn.

~auto-save-count	Preference

When want-auto-save is nonzero, Epsilon automatically saves a
copy of each unsaved file every auto-save-count keystrokes.

~auto-save-name	Preference

When want-auto-save is nonzero, Epsilon regularly saves a copy of
each unsaved file.  This variable contains a template which
determines how Epsilon chooses the file name for the autosaved file.
Epsilon substitutes pieces of the original file name for codes in the
template, as follows (examples are for the file c:\dos\read.me):

%p The original file's path (c:\dos\).

%b The base part of the original file name (read).

%e The extension of the original file name (.me).

%f The full name of the original file (c:\dos\read.me).

%r The name of the file relative to the current directory.  (read.me
if the current directory is c:\dos, dos\read.me if the current
directory is c:\, otherwise c:\dos\read.me).

%x The full pathname of the directory containing the Epsilon
executable.

%X The full pathname of the directory containing the Epsilon
executable, after converting all Windows 95/98/NT long file names to
their equivalent short name aliases.

By default, Epsilon writes to a file with the same name and directory
but extension ".asv".

~auto-show-adjacent-delimiter	Preference

When the cursor is on a delimiter character in various language
modes, Epsilon highlights the character and its match.  Epsilon can
also highlight both characters when the cursor is adjacent.  If this
variable is 1, Epsilon highlights if the cursor is just past a
right-hand delimiter.  If 2, Epsilon highlights if the cursor is just
past a left-hand delimiter.  If 3, Epsilon does both, and if 0,
Epsilon does neither.

~auto-show-c-delimiters	Preference

When the cursor is on a brace, bracket, or parenthesis in C mode,
Epsilon will try to locate its matching brace, bracket, or
parenthesis, and highlight them both.  If the current character has
no match, Epsilon will not highlight it.  Set this variable to zero
to disable this feature.

~auto-show-delimiter-delay	System

Epsilon uses this variable internally to decide how long to wait
before searching and highlighting matching delimiters.

~auto-show-gams-delimiters	Preference

When the cursor is on a bracket or parenthesis in GAMS mode, Epsilon
will try to locate its matching bracket or parenthesis, and highlight
them both.  If the current character has no match, Epsilon will not
highlight it.  Set this variable to zero to disable this feature.

~auto-show-html-delimiters	Preference

When the cursor is on a < or > character in HTML mode, Epsilon will
try to locate its matching > or < and highlight them both.  If the
current character has no match, Epsilon will not highlight it.  Set
this variable to zero to disable this feature.

~auto-show-matching-characters	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature stores the set of delimiter
characters for the current mode in this variable.

~auto-show-perl-delimiters	Preference

When the cursor is on a brace, bracket, or parenthesis in Perl mode,
Epsilon will try to locate its matching brace, bracket, or
parenthesis, and highlight them both.  If the current character has
no match, Epsilon will not highlight it.  Set this variable to zero
to disable this feature.

~auto-show-postscript-delimiters	Preference

When the cursor is on a bracket or parenthesis in PostScript mode,
Epsilon will try to locate its matching brace, bracket or
parenthesis, and highlight them both.  If the current character has
no match, Epsilon will not highlight it.  Set this variable to zero
to disable this feature.

~auto-show-shell-delimiters	Preference

When the cursor is on a brace, bracket, or parenthesis in Shell mode,
Epsilon will try to locate its matching brace, bracket, or
parenthesis, and highlight them both.  If the current character has
no match, Epsilon will not highlight it.  Set this variable to zero
to disable this feature.

~auto-show-tex-delimiters	Preference

When the cursor is on a curly brace or square bracket character like
{, }, [, or ] in TeX mode, Epsilon will try to locate its matching
character and highlight them both.  If the current character has no
match, Epsilon will not highlight it.  Set this variable to zero to
disable this feature.

~availmem	

For DOS, this variable holds the total amount of memory available to
Epsilon.  This includes the space for a process.  Under other
operating systems, this value is simply a meaningless big number.

~avoid-bottom-lines	Preference

This variable tells Epsilon how many screen lines at the bottom of
the screen are reserved, and may not contain tiled windows.  By
default, this variable is one, to make room for the echo area.

~avoid-top-lines	Preference

This variable tells Epsilon how many screen lines at the top of the
screen are reserved, and may not contain tiled windows.  By default,
this variable is zero, indicating that tiled windows reach to the top
of the screen.  If you create a permanent menu bar, Epsilon sets this
variable to one.

~backup-name	Preference

If you've set want-backups nonzero, telling Epsilon to make a
backup whenever it saves a file, Epsilon uses this variable to
construct the name of the backup file.  The variable contains a
template, which Epsilon copies, substituting pieces of the original
file for codes in the template, as follows (examples are for the file
c:\dos\read.me):

%p The original file's path (c:\dos\).

%b The base part of the original file name (read).

%e The extension of the original file name (.me).

%f The full name of the original file (c:\dos\read.me).

%r The name of the file relative to the current directory.  (read.me
if the current directory is c:\dos, dos\read.me if the current
directory is c:\, otherwise c:\dos\read.me).

%x The full pathname of the directory containing the Epsilon
executable.

%X The full pathname of the directory containing the Epsilon
executable, after converting all Windows 95/98/NT long file names to
their equivalent short name aliases.

By default, Epsilon renames the old file so it has extension ".bak".

~beep-duration	Preference

This variable specifies the duration of Epsilon's warning beep, in
hundredths of a second.  If zero, Epsilon uses a default beeping
sound.  Under Windows and Unix, setting the variable has no effect.

~beep-frequency	Preference

This variable specifies the frequency of Epsilon's warning beep in
hertz.  If zero, Epsilon instead flashes the mode line of each window
for a moment.  Under Windows, setting the variable has no effect.
Under Unix, Epsilon will flash if the variable is zero, but won't
change the frequency.

~bell-on-abort	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when you abort a command or press an
unbound key.

~bell-on-autosave-error	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when it can't autosave a file.

~bell-on-bad-key	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when you press an illegal option at a
prompt.

~bell-on-completion	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when it's completing on command names,
file names, or similar things, and it can't find any matches.

~bell-on-date-warning	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when it puts up its warning that a file
has been changed on disk.

~bell-on-read-error	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when it gets an error reading a file.

~bell-on-search	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when it can't find the text you're
searching for.

~bell-on-write-error	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon will beep when it gets an error writing a file.

~border-bottom	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon puts a border on the bottom edges of tiled
windows that touch the bottom of the screen (or the echo area, if
it's at the bottom of the screen).  If Epsilon is set to display a
mode line below each tiled window, it puts a border there too,
regardless of this variable's setting.  If you've run the
toggle-borders command to suppress borders entirely, you must run
that command again to reenable the borders.

~border-inside	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon puts a vertical border between two side-by-side
tiled windows.  If you've run the toggle-borders command to
suppress borders entirely, you must run that command again to
reenable the borders.

~border-left	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon puts a border on the left edges of tiled windows
that touch the left edge of the screen.  If you've run the
toggle-borders command to suppress borders entirely, you must run
that command again to reenable the borders.

~border-right	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon puts a border on the right edges of tiled windows
that touch the right edge of the screen.  If you've run the
toggle-borders command to suppress borders entirely, you must run
that command again to reenable the borders.

~border-top	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon puts a border on the top edges of tiled windows
that touch the top edge of the screen.  If nonzero, Epsilon puts a
border on the top edges of tiled windows that touch the top of the
screen (or the echo area, if it's at the top of the screen).  If
Epsilon is set to display a mode line above each tiled window, it
puts a border there too, regardless of this variable's setting.  If
you've run the toggle-borders command to suppress borders
entirely, you must run that command again to reenable the borders.

~buf-accessed	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon uses this variable to remember which buffer was accessed most
recently.  Older buffers have lower values.  Each time you switch to
a new buffer, Epsilon increments buf-accessed-clock and stores it
as the new buffer's setting for buf-accessed.

~buf-accessed-clock	System

Epsilon uses this variable to remember which buffer was accessed most
recently.  See buf-accessed.

~bufed-grouping	Preference

Epsilon can subdivide the list of buffers displayed by the bufed
command, and sort each group separately.  This was Epsilon's behavior
prior to version 8.  First it listed buffers with associated files.
Then it listed buffers without files.  Finally (and only if you
invoked bufed with a numeric argument), Epsilon would list "system"
buffers.  Set this variable to 1 if you want Epsilon to sort each
group in the buffer list separately, as in previous versions.  By
default, Epsilon sorts all groups together.

~bufed-width	Preference

This variable contains the width of the pop-up window that the
bufed command creates.  (Epsilon for Windows doesn't use this
variable; instead drag a dialog's border to resize it.)

~buffer-not-saveable	Buffer-specific

Some buffers like Telnet buffers have an associated file name but
should never be saved to that file name.  This variable is set
nonzero in such buffers.

~bufname	System

This variable contains the name of the current buffer.  Setting it in
an EEL program switches to a different buffer.  If the indicated
buffer does not exist, nothing happens.  Use this method of switching
buffers only to temporarily switch to a new buffer; use the
to_buffer() or to_buffer_num() subroutines to change the
buffer a window will display.

~bufnum	System

This variable contains the number of the current buffer.  Setting it
in an EEL program switches to a different buffer.  If the indicated
buffer does not exist, nothing happens.  Use this method of switching
buffers only to temporarily switch to a new buffer; use the
to_buffer() or to_buffer_num() subroutines to change the
buffer a window will display.

~build-first	Window-specific

Epsilon normally displays each window line by line, omitting lines
that have not changed.  When a command has moved point out of the
window, Epsilon must reposition the display point (the buffer
position at which to start displaying text) to return point to the
window.  However, Epsilon sometimes does not know that repositioning
is required until it has displayed the entire window.  When it
discovers that point is not in the window, Epsilon moves the display
point to a new position and immediately displays the window again.
Certain commands which would often cause this annoying behavior set
the build-first variable nonzero to prevent it.

~byte-extension	

This variable holds the correct extension of bytecode files in this
version of Epsilon.

~c-align-contin-lines	Preference

By default, the C indenter tries to align continuation lines under
parentheses and other syntactic items on prior lines.  If Epsilon
can't find anything on prior lines to align with, or if aligning the
continuation line would make it start past column
c-align-contin-lines, Epsilon uses a fixed indentation: two
levels more than the original line, plus the value of the variable
c-contin-offset (normally zero).

Set this variable to zero if you don't want Epsilon to ever try to
align continuation lines under syntactic features in previous lines.
If zero, Epsilon indents continuation lines by one level (normally
one tab stop), plus the value of the variable c-contin-offset
(which may be negative).

~c-align-extra-space	Preference

When C mode indents a continuation line, it tries to line up text
under previous syntactic constructs.  For instance, it may position
text just after a ( character on the previous line.  Sometimes
(commonly with continued if statements) this causes the
continuation line to be indented to the same column as following
lines.  If Epsilon thinks this will happen, it adds the additional
indentation specified by this variable to the continuation line.

~c-auto-fill-mode	Preference

Epsilon can break long C/C++/Java/EEL comments as you type them,
using a variation of auto-fill mode.  Set this variable to 0 to
disable this feature.  Set it to 2 to let Epsilon break all comments.
The default value of 1 tells Epsilon not to break comments that
follow non-comment text on the same line, but permit Epsilon to break
comments on other lines.

~c-auto-show-delim-chars	

This variable holds the set of delimiter characters that should
trigger Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature in C mode.  Epsilon
will search for and highlight the match to this delimiter.

~c-brace-offset	Preference

In C mode, Epsilon offsets the indentation of a left brace on its own
line by the value of this variable.  The closeback variable also
helps to control this placement.

~c-case-offset	Preference

In C mode, Epsilon offsets the indentation of a case statement by the
value of this variable.

~c-contin-offset	Preference

In C mode, Epsilon offsets its usual indentation of continuation
lines by the value of this variable.  The variable only affects lines
that Epsilon can't line up under the text of previous lines.

~c-extra-keywords	System Buffer-specific

C mode automatically sets the buffer-specific c-extra-keywords
variable based on file name extensions, to indicate which identifiers
are considered keywords in the current buffer.  The value 1 tells
Epsilon to recognize C++ keywords when code coloring.  The value 2
tells Epsilon to recognize EEL keywords.  The values 4 and 8 indicate
Java and IDL keywords, respectively.  Epsilon always recognizes those
keywords common to C, C++, Java, and EEL.

~c-fill-column	Preference

This variable sets the default fill column for filling comments in
C/C++/Java buffers.  If positive, Epsilon uses it to initialize the
fill column whenever a buffer enters C mode.  (Otherwise Epsilon uses
the default value of the margin-right variable.)

~c-indent	Preference Buffer-specific

C mode indents each additional level of nesting by this many columns.
If the variable is less than or equal to zero, Epsilon uses the value
of tab-size instead.  Set this variable if you want Epsilon to
use one number for displaying tab characters, and a different number
for indenting C code.  (Epsilon will indent using a combination of
spaces and tabs, as necessary.)

~c-label-indent	Preference

This variable provides the indentation of lines starting with labels
in C mode.  Normally, Epsilon moves labels to the left margin.

~c-look-back	Preference

When C mode tries to determine the correct indentation of a line, it
looks back in the buffer at previous lines.  To prevent long delays,
Epsilon gives up if it finds itself looking back more than this many
characters, and uses its best indentation guess so far.

~c-mode-mouse-to-tag	Preference

If this variable is nonzero, double-clicking the right mouse button
on a function or variable name in a C mode buffer makes Epsilon for
DOS or Epsilon for OS/2 jump to that item's definition.  Epsilon uses
the pluck-tag command to do this.  (In Epsilon for Windows, use
the right mouse button's context menu to jump to a definition.)

~c-param-decl	Preference

Epsilon indents pre-ANSI K&R-style parameter declarations by the
number of characters specified by this variable.

~c-tab-always-indents	Preference

By default, if you press <Tab> when point is not in the current
line's indentation, C mode inserts a tab character instead of
recomputing the current line's indentation.  If this variable is
nonzero, the <Tab> key will reindent the current line, regardless of
your position on the line.  If you press the key again, it will
insert an additional tab.

~c-tab-override	Preference

If you want the width of a tab character in C mode buffers to be
different than in other buffers, set this variable to the desired
value.  C mode will change the buffer's tab size to the specified
number of columns.

~c-tagging-class	System

Epsilon uses this variable while tagging C++/Java files to record the
name of the current class.

~c-top-braces	Preference

Epsilon indents the braces of the top-level block of a function by
the number of characters specified by this variable.  By default,
Epsilon puts such braces at the left margin.

~c-top-contin	Preference

Epsilon indents continuation lines outside of any function body by
the number of characters specified by this variable, whenever it
cannot find any text on previous lines to align the continuation line
beneath.

~c-top-struct	Preference

When the definition of a top-level structure, union, or class appears
over several lines, Epsilon indents the later lines by the number of
characters specified in this variable, rather than the value of
c-top-contin.

~call-on-modify	Buffer-specific

If the buffer-specific call-on-modify variable has a nonzero
value in a particular buffer, whenever any primitive tries to modify
that buffer, Epsilon calls the EEL subroutine on_modify() first.

~can-get-process-directory	

Epsilon sets this variable nonzero to indicate that it is able to
retrieve current directory information from the concurrent process.
Unix versions of Epsilon will set this variable nonzero only after
the process has started and its first prompt has appeared.

~capture-output	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon makes a transcript of console input and output
when it runs another program via the push command.  Epsilon puts
the transcript in a buffer named "process".

~case-fold	Preference Buffer-specific

If nonzero, Epsilon considers upper case and lower case the same when
searching, so a search string of "Word" would match "word" and "WORD"
as well.  This variable sets the default for a search in each buffer,
but when searching you can change case-folding status for that
particular search by pressing Ctrl-C.

~catch-mouse	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon queues up mouse events.  If zero, Epsilon ignores
the mouse.

Under DOS, various values of catch_mouse correspond to settings
of the -km, -kc and -kw switches.  A setting of 1 gives default mouse
behavior.  A setting of 2 makes the mouse cursor invisible, like
-kc0.  A setting of 3 makes Epsilon uses absolute positioning, like
-km1.  A setting of 4 makes Epsilon use absolute positioning with an
invisible mouse cursor, like -kw, the correct setting for windowed
environments.

If you run Epsilon for DOS under Microsoft Windows full-screen, be
sure to set catch-mouse to 4 before you press Alt-Enter to switch
to a window.  You can set catch-mouse back to 1 when you return
Epsilon to full-screen.  The same comments apply when running the DOS
version under OS/2 PM.

~clear-process-buffer	Preference

If nonzero, the commands start-process, push, and make
will each begin by emptying the process buffer.  If zero, the
commands append to whatever text is already in the process buffer.

~clipboard-access	Preference

If this variable is non-zero, all commands that put text on the kill
ring will also try to copy the text to the MS-Windows or X clipboard.
Similarly, the yank command will retrieve any new text from the
clipboard before retrieving text from Epsilon's kill ring if this
variable is nonzero.

If you're not running the Windows, Unix or DOS versions of Epsilon,
not running under MS-Windows in enhanced mode or under the X window
system, or (for the DOS version) the text has more than 65,500
characters, Epsilon ignores the clipboard, just as if this variable
were zero.  During a keyboard macro Epsilon also ignores the
clipboard contents.  Use the insert-clipboard or
copy-to-clipboard commands if you want to access the clipboard
from a keyboard macro.

~clipboard-format	Preference

By default, when Epsilon for DOS puts characters on the MS-Windows
clipboard, it lets Windows translate the characters from OEM ANSI to
Windows ANSI.  Epsilon needs to do this so that international
characters display correctly.  When Epsilon retrieves characters from
the clipboard, it has Windows perform the reverse translation.

But each character set contains some characters that the other does
not, so that copying characters in one direction and then back can
change the characters.  Instead, you can tell Epsilon to copy
characters without translating them.  Then copying back and forth
will never change the characters, but Epsilon for DOS and Windows
won't display the same symbols for any character except the original
ASCII printable characters (32 to 127).

Setting this variable to 7 makes Epsilon tell Windows that all text
in Epsilon is in the OEM character set, and Windows must translate
between OEM ANSI and Windows ANSI.  Setting the variable to 1 makes
Epsilon tell Windows that all text in Epsilon uses the Windows ANSI
character set, so no translating is necessary.  The default value of
zero makes Epsilon for DOS always translate, and makes Epsilon for
Windows translate only when you've selected an OEM font.  (Epsilon
uses the value of this variable as the "clipboard format" to ask
Windows for; you can see the raw clipboard data Windows uses by
setting the variable to other values, if you like.  Epsilon for Unix
ignores this variable.)

~closeback	Preference

If nonzero, C mode aligns a right brace character that ends a block
with the line containing the matching left brace character.  If zero,
C mode aligns the right brace character with the first statement
inside the block.

~cmd-len	

This variable counts the number of keys in the current command.
Epsilon resets it to zero each time it goes through the main loop.

~cmd-line-session-file	System

If you use the -p flag to provide the name of a particular session
file, Epsilon puts the name in this variable.

~color-html-look-back	Preference

When Epsilon begins coloring HTML in the middle of a buffer, it has
to determine whether it's inside a script by searching back.  This
can be slow in very large HTML files, so Epsilon limits its search by
assuming that a script can be no longer than this many characters.

~color-look-back	Preference

When Epsilon begins coloring in the middle of a buffer, it has to
determine whether it's inside a comment by searching back for comment
characters.  If color-look-back is greater than zero, Epsilon
only looks back over that many characters for a block comment
delimiter like /* or */ before giving up and concluding that the
original text is not inside a comment.  If you edit extremely large C
files with few block comments, you can speed up Epsilon by setting
this variable.  Any block comments larger than this value may not be
colored correctly.  A value of zero (the default) lets Epsilon search
as far as it needs to, and correctly colors comments of any size.

~color-names	System

Epsilon recognizes various color names in command files.  It stores
the names in this variable.

~color-whole-buffer	Preference

Normally Epsilon colors buffers as needed.  You can set Epsilon to
instead color the entire buffer the first time it's displayed.  Set
this variable to the size of the largest buffer you want Epsilon to
entirely color at once.

~coloring-flags	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon's syntax highlighting functions use this variable to record
various types of status.  Bits in the variable are specified by
macros in colcode.h.

Epsilon uses some bits independently of any particular language mode.
COLOR_DO_COLORING indicates that Epsilon should perform coloring.
COLOR_IN_PROGRESS means Epsilon is in the middle of coloring; Epsilon
uses this bit to detect when a coloring function has aborted due to a
programming error; it then disables coloring for that buffer.
COLOR_MINIMAL records whether minimal coloring (an option in
C/C++/Java mode) is in use for that buffer; Epsilon uses it to notice
when this setting has changed.

The remaining bits are set by individual language modes.
COLOR_INVALIDATE_FORWARD indicates that after the user modifies a
buffer, any syntax highlighting information after the modified region
should be discarded.  COLOR_INVALIDATE_BACKWARD indicates that syntax
highlighting information before the modified region should be
discarded.  (Without these bits, Epsilon only discards syntax
highlighting information that's very close to the modified part of
the buffer.)  COLOR_INVALIDATE_RESETS tells Epsilon that whenever it
invalidates syntax highlighting in a region, it should also set the
color of all text in that region to the default of -1.

~column-in-window	

On each screen refresh, Epsilon sets this variable to the column of
point within the current window, counting from zero.  If you switch
windows or move point, Epsilon will not update this variable until
the next refresh.

~comment-begin	Buffer-specific

When Epsilon creates a comment, it inserts the contents of the
buffer-specific variables comment-begin and comment-end
around the new comment.

~comment-column	Buffer-specific

Epsilon creates and indents comments so they begin at this column, if
possible.

~comment-end	Buffer-specific

When Epsilon creates a comment, it inserts the contents of the
buffer-specific variables comment-begin and comment-end
around the new comment.

~comment-pattern	Buffer-specific

The comment commands look for comments using regular expression
patterns contained in the buffer-specific variables
comment-pattern (which should match the whole comment) and
comment-start (which should match the sequence that begins a
comment, like '/*').

~comment-repeat-indentation-lines	Preference

Modes that provide language-sensitive indenting, such as C mode (for
C, C++, Java, and EEL) and Perl mode, typically indent single-line
comments (such as C++'s // comments) to the same indentation level as
code.  Sometimes in the midst of a block of indented code, you may
wish to write a series of comment lines with some different
indentation.

When Epsilon notices that the 2 previous lines are comment lines, its
auto-indenter decides that a blank line that follows should be
indented like them, and not as if the line will contain code.  Set
this variable to change the number of comment lines Epsilon checks
for.  Set it to zero to make Epsilon always indent blank lines based
on language syntax rules.

~comment-start	Buffer-specific

The comment commands look for comments using regular expression
patterns contained in the buffer-specific variables
comment-pattern (which should match the whole comment) and
comment-start (which should match the sequence that begins a
comment, like '/*').

~common-open-curdir	System

In Windows, Epsilon uses this variable to maintain the current
directory used in the Common File Dialog that appears when you use
the File/Open, File/Save As, or similar menu or toolbar commands.

~compare-windows-ignores-space	Preference

This variable says whether the compare-windows command should
consider any run of one or more whitespace characters in one buffer
to match a run of one or more whitespace characters in the other.  If
0, it doesn't, and requires all characters to match.  If 1, it merges
runs of spaces, tabs and newlines.  If 2, it merges runs of spaces
and tabs only.

~compile-asm-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-asm-cmd
variable to compile Assembly files; those files ending with a .asm
extension.  See compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's
format.

~compile-buffer-cmd	Buffer-specific

The compile-buffer command retrieves the command to compile the
current buffer from this buffer-specific variable.  For C, C++, and
EEL files this variable normally just points to the
compile-c-cmd, compile-cpp-cmd, or compile-eel-cmd
variables, respectively.  To make all files with one of the above
extensions use a different compile command, set one of these other
variables.  To make only the current buffer begin to use a different
compile command, set this variable.

See compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's format.

~compile-c-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-c-cmd
variable to compile C files; those files ending with a .c extension.
(Epsilon for Unix uses the compile-c-cmd-unix variable instead.)

The command line works as a file name template, so you can substitute
parts of the file name into the command line.  The sequence %p
substitutes the path part of the file name, the sequence %b
substitutes the base name (without path or extension), the sequence
%e substitutes the extension (including the "."), the sequence %f
substitutes the full name as an absolute pathname, and the sequence
%r substitutes a pathname relative to the current directory.  The
sequence %x substitutes the full pathname of the directory containing
the Epsilon executable.  The sequence %X substitutes the same
pathname to the Epsilon executable, but converts all Windows 95/98/NT
long file names to their equivalent short name aliases.

~compile-c-cmd-unix	Preference

Epsilon for Unix uses the command line contained in this variable to
compile C files; those that end with a .c extension.  See
compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's format, or for the
equivalent variable in non-Unix versions.

~compile-cpp-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-cpp-cmd
variable to compile C++ files; those files ending with a .cpp or .cxx
extension.  See compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's
format.  (Epsilon for Unix uses the compile-cpp-cmd-unix variable
instead.)

~compile-cpp-cmd-unix	Preference

Epsilon for Unix uses the command line contained in this variable to
compile C files; those that end with a .cpp or .cxx extension.  See
compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's format.  See
compile-cpp-cmd for the equivalent variable in non-Unix versions.

~compile-eel-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-eel-cmd
variable to compile EEL files; those files ending with a .e
extension.  After an EEL file has been successfully compiled, Epsilon
will automatically load it.  Epsilon for Windows 95/98/NT generally
uses its built-in EEL compiler instead of this variable; see
compile-eel-dll-flags to set its flags.  See compile-c-cmd
for details on this variable's format.

~compile-eel-dll-flags	Preference

When Epsilon compiles EEL code using its internal EEL compiler, it
looks in this variable for EEL command line flags.

~compile-gams-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-gams-cmd
variable to compile GAMS files; those files ending with a .gms
extension (or others).  See compile-c-cmd for details on this
variable's format.

~compile-idl-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-idl-cmd
variable to compile IDL files; those files ending with a .idl
extension.  Epsilon normally edits such files using C mode.  See
compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's format.

~compile-in-separate-buffer	Preference

In some environments, the compile-buffer and make commands
can do their work in a separate compilation buffer.  This is the most
reliable way for them to work.  Set this variable to zero to force
them to share an existing process buffer.

~compile-java-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-java-cmd
variable to compile Java files; those files ending with a .java
extension.  See compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's
format.

~compile-makefile-cmd	Preference

The compile-buffer command uses the command line contained in the
compile-makefile-cmd variable to "compile" a makefile (those
files ending with a .mak extension or named makefile); in the case of
makefiles, this means to run make on it.  See compile-c-cmd for
details on this variable's format.  See compile-makefile-cmd-unix
for the Unix equivalent.

~compile-makefile-cmd-unix	Preference

The compile-buffer command uses the command line contained in the
compile-makefile-cmd variable to "compile" a makefile (those
files ending with a .mak extension or named makefile) under Unix; in
the case of makefiles, this means to run make on it.  See
compile-c-cmd for details on this variable's format.  See
compile-makefile-cmd for the non-Unix equivalent.

~compile-perl-cmd	Preference

The compile-buffer command uses the command line contained in the
compile-perl-cmd variable to "compile" a Perl file (those files
ending with a .perl extension or others); in the case of Perl files,
this means to execute it.  See compile-c-cmd for details on this
variable's format.

~compile-tex-cmd	Preference

Epsilon uses the command line contained in the compile-tex-cmd
variable to compile TeX or LaTeX files; those files ending with a
.tex or .ltx extension.  See compile-c-cmd for details on this
variable's format.

~completion-pops-up	Preference

If Epsilon cannot add any letters when you ask for completion on a
file name or similar item, it will pop up a list of items that match
what you've typed so far.  To disable automatic pop-ups on
completion, set the completion-pops-up variable to zero.

~concurrent-compile	Preference Buffer-specific

The buffer-specific concurrent-compile variable controls how the
compile-buffer command behaves.  If 0, compile-buffer always
runs the compiler or other program non-concurrently, exiting the
concurrent process if it needs to.  If 2, the compile-buffer
command always runs the compiler concurrently, creating a concurrent
process if it needs to.  If 1, the compile-buffer command runs
the compiler concurrently if a concurrent process is already running,
non-concurrently otherwise.  If 3 (the default), compile-buffer
uses the value of the concurrent-make variable instead.

~concurrent-make	Preference

The concurrent-make variable controls how the make command
behaves.  If 0, the make command always runs the compiler or
other program non-concurrently, exiting the concurrent process if it
needs to.  If 2, the make command always runs the compiler
concurrently, creating a concurrent process if it needs to.  If 1
(the default), the make command runs the compiler concurrently if
a concurrent process is already running, non-concurrently otherwise.

~current-video-mode	System

Under DOS and OS/2, Epsilon remembers the name of the current video
mode here.  This can be a value like "80x25", or "" if the video mode
has never been set.

~cursor-blink-period	Preference

This variable controls the rate at which the text cursor blinks.  It
specifies the period of the on/off cycle in hundredths of a second.
It only applies when Epsilon runs as an X program in Unix.  Set this
to -1 to disable blinking.

~cursor-shape	System

This variable holds the current cursor shape code.  Epsilon copies
values from overwrite-cursor, normal-cursor, or one of the
other cursor variables, as appropriate, into this variable whenever
you switch windows or buffers.  Set those variables instead of this
one.  Epsilon only uses this variable under DOS and OS/2.  See
gui-cursor-shape for the Windows or Unix equivalent.

~cursor-to-column	Window-specific

The window-specific cursor-to-column variable lets you position
the cursor in a part of a window where there are no characters.  It's
normally -1, and the cursor stays on the character after point.  If
it's non-negative in the current window, Epsilon puts the cursor at
the specified column in the window instead.  Epsilon resets
cursor-to-column to -1 whenever the buffer changes, or point
moves from where it was when you last set cursor-to-column.
(Epsilon only checks these conditions when it redisplays the window,
so you can safely move point temporarily.)

~default-character-set	Preference

Set this variable to 2 if you want Epsilon for Windows to translate
character sets by default, in the manner of the find-oem-file
command.  Set it to any other value to disable this behavior.

~default-oem-word	Preference

The word commands use a regular expression to define the current
notion of a word.  While a mode can provide its own regular
expression for words, most modes use the regular expression found in
this variable in versions of Epsilon for DOS and OS/2.

~default-state-file-name	System

Epsilon sets this variable to the name of the state file it will look
for when it starts.  Typically this is just "epsilon.sta", but
Epsilon for Unix uses a versioned name like "epsilon-v10.sta" so
users can more easily save customizations for multiple versions of
Epsilon.

~default-translation-type	Preference

When you read an existing file, Epsilon consults this variable to
determine what kind of line translation to perform.  If 5
(FILETYPE_AUTO), Epsilon examines the file's contents and selects
one of the following translations, setting the buffer's
translation-type variable to the selected translation.  If this
variable is set to any other value, Epsilon uses the specified
translation without examining the contents of the file.

A value of 0 (FILETYPE_BINARY) makes Epsilon do no line
translation, 1 (FILETYPE_MSDOS) makes Epsilon strip <Return>
characters when reading and insert them when writing, 2
(FILETYPE_UNIX) makes Epsilon do no line translation, but
indicates that the file contains text, 3 (FILETYPE_MAC) makes
Epsilon replace <Return> characters with <Newline> characters when
reading, and replace <Newline> characters with <Return> characters
when writing.

Also see new-buffer-translation-type to change the translation
rules for newly-created files and buffers.

~default-word	Preference

The word commands use a regular expression to define the current
notion of a word.  While a mode can provide its own regular
expression for words, most modes use the regular expression found in
this variable in versions of Epsilon for Windows and Unix.

~delete-hacking-tabs	Preference Buffer-specific

If nonzero, <Backspace> first turns a tab it wants to delete into the
number of spaces necessary to keep the cursor in the same column,
then deletes one of the spaces.

~diff-match-lines	Preference

When resynchronizing, diff believes it has found another match
when diff-match-lines lines in a row match.

~diff-mismatch-lines	Preference

When resynchronizing, diff gives up if it cannot find a match
within diff-mismatch-lines lines.

~directory-flags	

When you specify the -w flag on the command line, Epsilon puts its
numeric parameter in this variable.

~dired-buffer-pattern	System Buffer-specific

When dired wants to rebuild the file list in the current dired
buffer, it looks in this variable for the directory name or file
pattern to use.  If this variable is null, it uses the name of the
dired buffer as the pattern.

~dired-format	System Buffer-specific

Running dired on a remote directory of files uses this variable to
record the format of the directory listing.  The variable is zero for
local directories in Epsilon's standard format.

~dired-groups-dirs	System

The dired-sort command uses the dired-groups-dirs variable to
record whether or not to group subdirectories.  If nonzero, all
subdirectories appear in a dired listing before any of the files in
that directory.  If zero, the subdirectories are sorted in with the
files, except for the . and .. subdirectories, which always appear
first regardless of this setting.  Use the S key in a dired buffer to
set this variable.

~dired-sorts-files	System

The dired-sort command uses the dired-sorts-files variable to
record how sort dired buffers.  It contains a letter code to indicate
the type of sorting: N, E, S, or D to sort by file name, file
extension, size, or time and date of modification, respectively, or
the value 0 to leave the listing unsorted.  An upper case letter code
indicates a descending (reverse) sort, a lower case letter code
indicates the normal ascending sort.  Set this variable using dired's
S subcommand.

~discardable-buffer	Buffer-specific

Epsilon warns you before exiting if any "valuable" unsaved buffers
exist.  It considers a buffer valuable if it has a file name
associated with it and contains at least one character.  An EEL
program can set this buffer-specific variable to a nonzero value to
indicate that the current buffer doesn't require any such warning.

~display-column	Preference Window-specific

This variable determines how Epsilon displays long lines.  If
negative, Epsilon displays buffer lines too big to fit on one screen
line on multiple screen lines, with a special character to indicate
that the line has been wrapped.  If display-column is 0 or
positive, Epsilon only displays the part of a line that fits on the
screen.  Epsilon also skips over the initial display-column
columns of each line when displayed.  Horizontal scrolling works by
adjusting the display column.

~display-definition	Preference

In C/C++/Java/Perl buffers, Epsilon can display the name of the
current function, subroutine, class, or structure on a buffer's mode
line, or in the title bar of Epsilon's window.  Set this variable to
2 if you want Epsilon to use the title bar if possible.  Epsilon for
DOS, and other versions that can't set the title bar, will instead
use the mode line.  Set this variable to 1 if you want to use the
mode line regardless.  Or set this variable to 0 to disable this
feature.  You can modify the mode-end variable to position the
name within the mode line.

~display-func-name	System

Epsilon uses this variable to help display the name of the current
function on the mode line or window title bar.  It contains the most
recent function name Epsilon found.

~display-func-name-buf	System

Epsilon uses this variable to help display the name of the current
function on the mode line or window title bar.  It contains the
buffer number of the buffer where display-func-name is valid.

~display-func-name-win	System

Epsilon uses this variable to help display the name of the current
function on the mode line or window title bar.  It contains the
window number of the window where display-func-name is valid.

~display-scroll-bar	System Window-specific

This variable controls whether the current window's right border
contains a scroll bar.  Set it to zero to turn off the scroll bar, or
to any positive number to display the bar.  If a window has no right
border, or has room for fewer than two lines of text, Epsilon won't
display a scroll bar.  Although the EEL functions that come with
Epsilon don't support clicking on a scroll bar on the left border of
a window, Epsilon will display one if the variable is negative.  Any
positive value produces the usual right-border scroll bar.  Run the
toggle-scroll-bar command instead of setting this internal
variable directly.

~double-click-time	Preference

This variable specifies how long a delay to allow for mouse
double-clicks, in hundredths of a second.  If two consecutive mouse
clicks occur within the allotted time, Epsilon considers the second a
double-click.  Epsilon for Windows ignores this variable and uses
standard Windows settings to determine double-clicks.

~draw-column-marker	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon for Windows draws a vertical line in the current
window, at the column number specified by this variable.  This can be
helpful when editing fixed-width files.

~draw-focus-rectangle	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon for Windows draws a focus box around the current
line, to make it easier for a user to locate the caret.  A value of 1
produces a normal-sized focus rectangle.  You can customize its shape
by setting this variable to a four-digit number.  The four digits
represent the left, right, top and bottom sides of rectangle.  The
digit 5 represents the normal position of that side; lower values
constrict the box and higher values expand it.  For instance, 5555
represents the usual box size, while 1199 represents a box that's
extra narrow at its sides but extra tall.

~echo-line	Preference

This variable contains the number of the screen line on which to
display the echo area, counting from zero at the top.  When the
screen size changes, Epsilon automatically adjusts this variable if
necessary.

~eel-version	

This variable records the version number of the commands contained in
the state file.  Epsilon's -quickup flag sets this number.  Epsilon
compares this number to the version number stored in its executable
and warns of mismatches (indicating that the state file must be
updated by running -quickup).

~epsilon-manual-port	Preference

When Epsilon displays its online manual in HTML format, it runs a
documentation server program, and constructs a URL that tells the web
browser how to talk to the documentation server.  The URL includes a
port number, specified by this variable.  Set the variable to 0 and
Epsilon won't run a local documentation server, but will instead
connect to Lugaru's web site.  Note that the manual pages on Lugaru's
web site may be for a later version of Epsilon than local pages.

~errno	

Many Epsilon primitive functions that access operating system
features set this variable to the operating system's error code if an
error occurs.

~expand-wildcards	Preference

If nonzero, when you specify a file name with wild cards on Epsilon's
command line, Epsilon reads each individual file that matches the
pattern, as if you had listed them explicitly.  If zero, Epsilon
displays a list of the files that matched the pattern, in a dired
buffer.

~expire-message	System

An EEL function sometimes needs to display some text in the echo area
that is only valid until the user performs some action.  For
instance, a command that displays the number of characters in the
buffer might wish to clear that count if the user inserts or deletes
some characters.  After displaying text with primitives like
say(), note(), or error(), an EEL function may set this
variable 1 to tell Epsilon to clear that text on the next user key.

~explicit-session-file	System

If you use the read-session or write-session commands to use
a particular session file, Epsilon stores its name in this variable.

~extra-video-modes	Preference

Set the extra-video-modes variable to enable the additional video
modes Epsilon automatically provides under DOS.  Besides Epsilon's
built-in video modes, Epsilon can look for a VESA TSR or an
Ultravision TSR, and retrieve a list of additional video modes from
them.

Set this variable to 1 to disable Ultravision modes but look for VESA
modes.  Set it to 2 to disable VESA modes but look for Ultravision
modes.  Set it to 3 to look for both types of TSR's.  The default
value of 0 disables both types of add-on modes.

If both Ultravision and VESA TSR's are installed, the Ultravision TSR
takes precedence.  Epsilon only examines the value of this variable
when it starts up, so you must set it, use the write-state
command, and restart Epsilon for a new setting to take effect.

~far-pause	Preference

The find-delimiter and show-matching-delimiter commands pause
this many hundredths of a second, when they must reposition the
screen to a different part of the buffer to show the matching
delimiter.

~file-date-tolerance	Preference

Epsilon warns when a file has changed on disk.  Sometimes files on a
network will change their recorded times shortly after Epsilon writes
to them.  So Epsilon ignores very small changes in a file's time.
Set this variable to change the time difference in seconds that
Epsilon will ignore.

~filename	Buffer-specific

This variable holds the file name associated with the current buffer.

~fill-mode	Preference Buffer-specific

This variable controls auto filling.  If nonzero, Epsilon breaks text
into lines as you type it, by changing spaces into newline
characters.  See the variable c-auto-fill-mode for the equivalent
variable used in C mode buffers.

~final-macro-pause	System

Epsilon sets this variable to 1 when a keyboard macro ends with a
pause-macro command, to help it execute the macro correctly.

~find-lines-visible	Preference

Epsilon uses the find-lines-visible variable to help determine
where to position the find/replace dialog box.  It considers a
possible location acceptable if the top find-lines-visible lines
of the current window can be seen behind the dialog.  If fewer lines
are visible, Epsilon will move the dialog to another part of the
screen.

If you don't want Epsilon to ever reposition its find/replace dialog,
set this variable to zero.

~find-linked-file-ignores-angles	Preference

If this variable is nonzero, the find-linked-file command treats
the <> notation in a #include directive found in a C/C++/Java buffer
the same as the "" notation.  That is, Epsilon searches in the
original file's directory for the included file, before looking in
other directories. If this variable is zero, then only #include
directives that use the "" notation will cause Epsilon to search
locally.

~first-window-refresh	

Epsilon sets this variable prior to calling a when_displaying
function to indicate if this is the first window the current buffer
is displayed in.  If 0, Epsilon has already called the
when_displaying function for this buffer during the current
screen update.  Otherwise, this is the first window displaying this
buffer.

~font-dialog	Preference

This variable controls what font Epsilon for Windows uses for its
dialog windows.  See font-fixed for details on its format.  Use
the set-dialog-font command to set it.

~font-fixed	Preference

This variable controls what font Epsilon for Windows uses.  It
contains the name of the font, followed by several numbers separated
by commas.  The first number specifies a point size.  The second
specifies the width of the font in pixels, or 0 if any width is
acceptable.  A small number of fonts, such as Terminal, have multiple
widths for each height.  The third number specifies how bold the font
is.  A typical font uses a value of 400, while a bold font is usually
700.  The fourth number is nonzero to indicate an italic font.  The
fifth number indicates a character set; 1 means use the default
character set for the font, 0 means use ANSI, 255 means use OEM.

~font-printer	Preference

This variable controls what font Epsilon for Windows uses when
printing.  See font-fixed for details on its format.  Use the
set-printer-font command to set it.

~force-save-as	System Buffer-specific

Setting this variable nonzero instructs the save-file command to
ask for a file name before writing the file.  A setting of 1
(FSA_NEWFILE in EEL functions) indicates the buffer was created by
the new-file command.  A setting of 2 (FSA_READONLY) indicates
the file was marked read-only on disk, or the user checked the "Open
as read-only" box in the Open File dialog.

~ftp-ascii-transfers	Preference

When Epsilon uses FTP to read a file on a host computer, it normally
uses FTP's binary transfer mode, and examines the contents of the
file to determine the appropriate line translation.  On some kinds of
host computers (VMS systems, for example) this doesn't work.  If you
use such systems, set this variable nonzero.  In that case, you'll
need to tell Epsilon whenever you transfer a binary file.  Epsilon
will use FTP's ASCII transfer mode for all files except those where
you explicitly set the line transfer mode to binary (for example, by
typing Ctrl-U Ctrl-X Ctrl-F, and then pressing B at the line
translation prompt).

~ftp-compatible-dirs	Preference

When Epsilon uses FTP to access files on a host computer, it normally
assumes that the directory conventions of the host computer are
similar to those for Unix, Windows, DOS, and OS/2.  Some computers
(notably some VMS systems) use different rules for directories.
Setting this variable nonzero makes Epsilon access remote directories
in a way that's slower, but works on more systems.

~ftp-passive-transfers	Preference

This variable controls how Epsilon's FTP client transfers files.
Epsilon knows two methods, called "passive" and "active", and
normally tries them in that order.  Firewalls or broken FTP server
software can cause one or the other method to fail.  Set this
variable to zero to disable passive transfers.  Set it to two to make
Epsilon try active transfers first, then passive.  The default of one
makes Epsilon try passive, then active.

~full-redraw	

If nonzero, Epsilon rebuilds all mode lines, as well as any
precomputed information Epsilon may have on window borders, screen
colors, and so forth, on the next redisplay.  Epsilon then resets the
variable to zero.

~fwd-search-key	Preference

Inside a search command, Epsilon recognizes a key with this key code
as a synonym for Ctrl-S, for pulling in a default search string or
changing the search direction.

~gams-auto-show-delim-chars	

This variable holds the set of delimiter characters that should
trigger Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature in GAMS mode.  Epsilon
will search for and highlight the match to this delimiter.

~gams-files	Preference

The file extensions .inc, .map, and .dat are used in the GAMS
language for mathematical programming.  But they're also commonly
used to represent other things.  By default Epsilon assumes such
files are not GAMS files; set this variable nonzero if you want
Epsilon to assume they are GAMS files.

~goal-column	Buffer-specific

If the goal-column variable is non-negative, the up-line and
down-line commands always move to the goal column.  If
goal-column is negative, the commands try to remain in the same
column.

~got-bad-number	System

Several EEL functions that convert a character string into a number
set this variable to indicate whether the string held a valid number.

~grep-empties-buffer	Preference

By default, each invocation of grep appends its results to the
grep buffer.  If you set the variable grep-empties-buffer to a
nonzero value, grep will clear the grep buffer at the start of
each invocation.

~grep-ignore-file-extensions	Preference

This variable contains a list of file name extensions for Epsilon to
skip over during a grep or file-query-replace command.  Each
extension must appear surrounded by '|' characters.

~grep-keeps-files	Preference

If nonzero, the grep command reads each file matching the
supplied pattern using the find-file command.  If zero, Epsilon
reads each file into a temporary buffer and discards the buffer after
it finishes listing the matches.

~grep-prompt-with-buffer-directory	Preference

The grep-prompt-with-buffer-directory variable controls how the
grep and file-query-replace commands use the current
directory at file prompts.  It recognizes the same values as for
prompt-with-buffer-directory.

~gui-cursor-shape	System

This variable holds the current cursor shape code under Windows and
Unix's X windowing system.  Epsilon copies values from
overwrite-gui-cursor, normal-gui-cursor, or one of the other
cursor variables, as appropriate, into this variable whenever you
switch windows or buffers.  Set those variables instead of this one.
Epsilon only uses this variable under Windows and X.  See
cursor-shape for the non-graphical equivalent.

~gui-menu-file	Preference

This variable contains the name of the file Epsilon loads its menu
from at startup, in the Windows version.

~has-arg	

Epsilon indicates that a command has received a numeric argument by
setting this variable nonzero.  The value of the numeric argument is
in the iter variable.

~has-feature	

Epsilon runs under various operating systems.  Some OS versions of
Epsilon have a few features that others lack.  An EEL function may
test bits in this variable to check if certain features are available.

~html-auto-show-delim-chars	

This variable holds the set of delimiter characters that should
trigger Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature in HTML mode.  Epsilon
will search for and highlight the match to this delimiter.

~html-javascript-coloring	

Epsilon will syntax highlight Java scripts embedded in HTML documents
if this variable is nonzero.  Set this variable to zero if you want
Epsilon to use a single color for scripts embedded in HTML documents.

~idle-coloring-delay	Preference Buffer-specific

When Epsilon isn't busy acting on your keystrokes, it looks through
the current buffer and assigns colors to the individual regions of
text, so that Epsilon responds faster as you scroll through the
buffer.  For smoother performance, Epsilon doesn't begin to do this
until it's been idle for a certain period of time, specified by this
variable.  Set it to the number of hundredths of a second to wait
before computing more coloring information.  With its default value
of 100, Epsilon waits one second.  Set it to -1 to disable background
code coloring.

~idle-coloring-size	System Buffer-specific

While waiting for the next keystroke, Epsilon syntax-highlights the
rest of the current buffer to improve performance.  It highlights in
small sections.  This variable determines the size of each section.
Some language modes highlight faster when they can work with larger
sections.

~ignore-error	Preference

This variable holds a regular expression that commands like
next-error use to filter out any error messages Epsilon should
skip over, even if they match the error pattern.  For example, if
ignore-error contains the pattern ".*warning", Epsilon will skip
over any error messages that contain the word "warning".

~ignore-file-extensions	Preference

This variable contains a list of file name extensions for Epsilon to
ignore during file name completion.  Each extension must appear
surrounded by '|' characters.

~ignore-kbd-macro	

When the ignore-kbd-macro variable is nonzero, Epsilon suspends
any running keyboard macros and doesn't retrieve keys from them.
When zero (the default), Epsilon retrieves keys from a keyboard macro
before handling keys from the keyboard.

~ignoring-file-change	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon sets this variable nonzero when the user says to temporarily
ignore file date warnings.  See want-warn.

~in-echo-area	

The in-echo-area variable controls whether the cursor is
positioned at point in the buffer, or in the echo area at the bottom
of the screen.  The sayput() primitive sets this variable,
say() resets it, and it is reset after each command.

~in-perl-buffer	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon's C mode uses this to record if the current buffer is really
in Perl mode (which is implemented as a variant of C mode).

~in-shell-buffer	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon's Perl mode uses this to record if the current buffer is
really in Shell mode (which is implemented as a variant of Perl mode).

~include-directories	Preference

The find-linked-file command, in C/C++/Java buffers, edits the
file named by the #include directive on the current line.  Epsilon
knows a few standard places to look for #include files, but if
Epsilon doesn't find yours, set this variable to a list of
directories where Epsilon should look.  Separate the directory names
with colons under Unix, with semicolons elsewhere.

~indent-comment-as-code	Preference

If nonzero, commenting commands indent lines containing only a
comment to the same indentation as other text.

~indent-with-tabs	Preference Buffer-specific

If zero, Epsilon indents using only space characters, not tab
characters.

~indents-separate-paragraphs	Preference Buffer-specific

Blank lines and ^L characters always separate paragraphs.  If the
variable indents-separate-paragraphs has a nonzero value, then a
paragraph also begins at a nonblank line that starts with a tab or a
space.

~info-path-non-unix	Preference

Epsilon's info mode looks for Info files in each of the directories
named by this variable (but see info-path-unix for the Unix
equivalent).  Separate the directory names with semicolons.  The
sequence %x tells Epsilon to substitute the directory containing its
executable.

~info-path-unix	Preference

Under Unix, Epsilon's info mode looks for Info files in each of the
directories named by this variable.  (See info-path-non-unix for
the non-Unix equivalent).  Separate the directory names with colons.
The sequence %x tells Epsilon to substitute the directory containing
its executable.

~info-recovering	System

Epsilon's info mode uses this variable internally to record whether
it's currently recovering from failing to reach a missing node.

~initial-tag-file	Preference

This variable holds the name of the tag file Epsilon will search for.
If it holds a relative pathname, Epsilon will search for the file in
the current directory tree.  If initial-tag-file holds an
absolute pathname, Epsilon will always use that tag file.

~insert-default-response	Preference

If this variable is 1, at many prompts Epsilon will insert a default
response before you start typing.  The default response will be
highlighted, so typing any text will remove it.  If you turn off
typing-deletes-highlight, you may wish to set this variable to 0.

While prompting for text, Epsilon can temporarily set this variable
to other values.  A value of 2 makes Epsilon insert its default text
without highlighting it.  This means the text won't automatically be
deleted when you begin typing.  A value of 3 inserts the default
text, doesn't highlight it, and prepares to modify your file name
response as you type it.  See the description of
prompt-with-buffer-directory.

~invisible-window	System Window-specific

If nonzero, Epsilon won't display the text of the window (although it
will display the border, if the window has one).  Epsilon won't
modify the part of the screen that would ordinarily display the
window's text.

~is-current-window	System

An EEL program may set a highlighted region to be controlled by this
variable to signal that the region should only be displayed in the
current window, not in other windows that display the same buffer.

~is-gui	

The is-gui variable indicates whether a graphical version of
Epsilon is running.  In pure-text versions of Epsilon, this variable
is zero.  When the 32-bit Windows version of Epsilon runs under
Windows NT, it sets this variable to 2.  Under Windows 95/98, it sets
this variable to 3.  The variable is 1 when the 32-bit version runs
under Windows 3.1 using the Win32S package (though this is not
supported).  The 16-bit version of Epsilon for Windows 3.1 always
sets this variable to 4.

~is-unix	

This variable is nonzero if Epsilon for Unix is running.  It's set to
the constant IS_UNIX_XWIN if Epsilon is running as an X program,
or IS_UNIX_TERM if Epsilon is running as a curses program.

~is-win32	

This variable is nonzero if a version of Epsilon for Windows 95/98/NT
is running, either the GUI version or the Win32 console version.  The
constant IS_WIN32_GUI represents the former.  The constant
IS_WIN32_CONSOLE represents the latter.

~iter	

Epsilon indicates that a command has received a numeric argument by
setting the has-arg variable nonzero, and setting iter to the
value of the numeric argument.

~kbd-extended	

This variable tells whether the -ke flag was used to make the numeric
pad and cursor pad keys distinct.  Normally, both are treated the
same, and this variable is zero.  If you give the -ke flag, Epsilon
treats these as separate sets of keys, and makes the variable nonzero.

~key	

This holds the value of the last key pressed, or a special code
indicating a mouse event.

~key-code	

This variable contains the sixteen-bit BIOS encoding for the last key
that Epsilon received from the operating system.  Its ASCII code is
in the low eight bits and its scan code is in the high eight bits.
This variable is always 0 under Windows or Unix, when the key comes
from a macro, or (under DOS) when Epsilon translates a key without
using the BIOS.

~key-from-macro	

This variable is nonzero whenever the most recent key (or mouse
event) came from a keyboard macro, not an actual keypress.

~key-is-button	System

When you click on a button in a dialog, Epsilon returns a particular
fixed keystroke: Ctrl-M, the abort key specified by the abort-key
variable, or the help key specified by the HELPKEY macro.  To
distinguish actual keys from these buttons, Epsilon sets the
key_is_button variable to zero when returning normal keys, and to
1 when returning one of these button keys.

~key-repeat-rate	Preference

Under DOS and Windows, this variable controls the rate at which keys
repeat in Epsilon, in repeats per second.  Setting this variable to 0
lets the keyboard determine the repeat rate, as it does outside of
Epsilon.  Setting this variable to -1 makes keys repeat as fast as
possible.  Epsilon never lets repeated keys pile up; it automatically
ignores repeated keys when necessary.

~key-type	

This variable has a special code that identifies the type of key
pressed.  Epsilon uses the key type to implement its auto-quoting
facility.

~kill-buffers	Preference

This variable holds the maximum number of kill buffers, for holding
killed text.  Setting this variable to a new value makes Epsilon
throw away the contents of all the kill buffers the next time you
execute a command that uses kill buffers.

~last-index	

The do_command() primitive copies the name table index it
receives as a parameter into this variable, just before it executes
the indicated command, so the help system can find the name of the
current command (among other uses).

~last-show-spaces	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon records the previous value of the show-spaces variable
here, to detect changes to it.

~last-window-color-scheme	System

When Epsilon has been set to display its tiled windows without
borders (via the toggle-borders command), it uses this variable
to help assign separate color schemes to the individual windows.

~latex-2e-or-3	Preference

Set this variable to 0 if you want LaTeX mode commands like
tex-italic on Alt-i to insert a LaTeX 2.09 command, instead of a
LaTeX 2e/3 command.  (For example, tex-italic inserts \textit in
LaTeX 2e/3 mode, and \it otherwise.)

~leave-blank	

When Epsilon is about to exit, it normally redisplays each mode line
one last time just before exiting, but only if this variable is zero.

~line-in-window	

On each screen refresh, Epsilon sets this variable to the line of
point within the current window, counting from zero.  If you switch
windows or move point, Epsilon will not update this variable until
the next refresh.

~load-fail-ok	System

If Epsilon cannot autoload a called EEL function, it will report an
error.  An EEL subroutine may set this variable nonzero to make
Epsilon silently ignore such a function call.

~load-from-state	

Epsilon sets this variable to 1 if it loaded its functions from a
state file at startup, or 0 if it loaded only from bytecode files.

~locate-path-unix	Preference

Under Unix, the locate-file command uses this variable to decide
where to look for a file.  It contains part of an extended file
pattern that should match those directories where Epsilon should
look.  The specified file name will be appended to this value.  It's
a good idea to make sure special file systems like /proc are not
matched by the pattern.

~macro-runs-immediately	

When an EEL function says to run a keyboard macro, Epsilon can do it
two ways.  Normally Epsilon enters a recursive edit loop, and
executes keys from the macro.  When the macro ends, Epsilon exits the
recursive edit loop, and returns to the EEL function that said to run
the macro.  This makes keyboard macros behave like functions.

Epsilon can instead simply queue the macro's keys, without employing
any loop.  Then when an EEL function says to run a keyboard macro,
Epsilon just records the fact that it's running a macro and
immediately returns to the EEL function.  Later when Epsilon is ready
for more input (perhaps long after the original macro-queuing
function has returned), it begins to use the macro's keys.  An EEL
function can get this behavior by temporarily setting the
macro-runs-immediately variable to zero prior to executing a
keyboard macro.

~major-mode	System Buffer-specific

This variable holds the name of the current major mode for this
buffer.

~margin-right	Preference Buffer-specific

This variable holds the current fill column, or right margin.

~mark	Buffer-specific

This variable holds the buffer position of the mark.  Several
commands operate on the current region.  The text between the mark
and point specifies the region.

~mark-to-column	Window-specific

The window-specific mark-to-column variable lets you position the
mark in a part of a window where there are no characters.  Epsilon
uses this variable when it displays a region that runs to the mark's
position.  It's normally -1, so Epsilon highlights up to the actual
buffer position of the mark.  If it's non-negative in the current
window, Epsilon highlights up to the specified column instead.
Epsilon resets mark-to-column to -1 whenever the buffer changes,
or the mark moves from where it was when you last set
mark-to-column.  (Epsilon only checks these conditions when it
redisplays the window, so you can safely move the mark temporarily.)

~mark-unhighlights	Preference

When Epsilon is already displaying a highlighted region,
region-marking commands like mark-rectangle normally change the
type of the region.  For example, mark-rectangle will change a
highlighted line region into a rectangular region.  If this variable
is nonzero, such commands will instead remove the highlighting when
Epsilon is already displaying a highlighted region of the desired
type.  For example, mark-line-region will turn off highlighting
if Epsilon is displaying a line region.  If this variable is zero,
Epsilon does nothing when the correct type of highlighted region is
already being displayed.

~matchdelim	Preference

If nonzero, typing ), ], or } in C mode displays the corresponding (,
[, or { using the show-matching-delimiter command.

~matchend	

Most of Epsilon's searching primitives set this variable to the far
end of the match from the original buffer position.

~matchstart	

Most of Epsilon's searching primitives set this variable to the near
end of the match from the original buffer position.

~max-initial-windows	Preference

When you name several files on Epsilon's command line, Epsilon reads
all the named files.  But it only displays up to this many in
separate windows.

~mem-in-use	

This variable holds the amount of space Epsilon is now using for
miscellaneous storage (not including buffer text).

~mention-delay	Preference

The mention() primitive displays its message only after Epsilon
has paused waiting for user input for mention-delay tenths of a
second.  When Epsilon prompts for another key, it often displays its
prompt in this way.

~menu-bar-flashes	Preference

When you select an item on the menu bar, Epsilon flashes the selected
item.  This variable holds the number of flashes.  (DOS, OS/2, Unix
only.)

~menu-bindings	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon puts the key bindings of commands into its menu
bar.  (DOS, OS/2, Unix only.)

~menu-command	System

When the user selects an item from a menu or the tool bar, Epsilon
for Windows returns a special key code, WIN_MENU_SELECT, and sets
the menu_command variable to the name of the selected command.

~menu-file	Preference

Epsilon stores the name of the file it is using to display the menu
bar in this variable, in all environments except Windows.  Also see
gui-menu-file.

~menu-stays-after-click	Preference

By default, when you click on the menu bar but release the mouse
without selecting a command, Epsilon leaves the menu displayed until
you click again.  Set the menu-stays-after-click variable to zero
if you want Epsilon to remove the menu when this happens.  (DOS,
OS/2, Unix only.)

~menu-width	Preference

This variable contains the width of the pop-up window of matches that
Epsilon creates when you press '?' during completion.  (DOS, OS/2,
Unix only.)

~menu-window	System

This variable stores the window handle of the current menu bar, or
zero if there is none.  (DOS, OS/2, Unix only.)

~merge-diff-var	Preference

The merge-diff command stores the name of the #ifdef variable you
select here.

~minimal-coloring	Preference

Set the minimal-coloring variable to 1 to tell Epsilon to limit
the amount of coloring it does in order to make code coloring faster.
For C files, Epsilon will color all identifiers, keywords, numbers,
function calls and punctuation the same, using the c-ident color
class for all.  Epsilon will still uniquely color comments,
preprocessor lines, and strings.

~mode-end	Preference

This specifies the part of the mode line after the square brackets.
Epsilon substitutes various values for the following sequences in the
mode line, as follows:

%c The current column number, counting columns from 0.

%C The current column number, counting columns from 1.

%d The current display column, with a < before it, and a space after.
However, if the display column has a value of 0 (meaning horizontal
scrolling is enabled, but the window has not been scrolled), or -1
(meaning the window wraps long lines), Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%D The current display column, but if the display column is -1,
Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%f The name of the current function (in buffers where Epsilon can
determine this).

%l The current line number.

%m Epsilon substitutes the text " More ", but only if characters
exist past the end of the window.  If the last character in the
buffer appears in the window, Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%P Epsilon substitutes the percentage of point through the buffer,
followed by a percent sign.

%p Epsilon substitutes the percentage of point through the buffer,
followed by a percent sign.  However, if the bottom of the buffer
appears in the window, Epsilon displays Bot instead (or End if point
is at the very end of the buffer).  Epsilon displays Top if the top
of the buffer appears, and All if the entire buffer is visible.

%s Epsilon substitutes "* " if the buffer's modified flag has a
nonzero value, otherwise nothing.

%S Epsilon substitutes "*" if the buffer's modified flag has a
nonzero value, otherwise nothing.

%h Epsilon substitutes the current hour in the range 1 to 12.

%H Epsilon substitutes the current hour in military time in the range
0 to 23.

%n Epsilon substitutes the current minute in the range 0 to 59.

%e Epsilon substitutes the current second in the range 0 to 59.

%a Epsilon substitutes "am" or "pm" as appropriate.

Note: For the current time, use a sequence like %2h:%02n%a for "3:45
pm" or %02H:%02n:%02e for "15:45:21".

%% Epsilon substitutes a literal "%" character.

%< Indicates that redisplay may omit text to the left, if all of the
information will not fit.

%> Puts any following text as far to the right as possible.

For any numeric substitution, you may include a number between the %
and the letter code, giving the field width: the minimum number of
characters to print.  You can use the same kinds of field width
specifiers as C's printf() function.  The sequence %4c expands to
"<Space><Space><Space>9", %04c expands to "0009", and %-4c expands to
"9<Space><Space><Space>".

~mode-extra	System Buffer-specific

Epsilon displays this text at the end of the mode line.  Internet
commands use this to display transfer status via the
set_mode_message() subroutine.

~mode-line-at-top	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon puts each window's mode line above the
corresponding buffer text.

~mode-line-position	Preference

The mode-line-position variable specifies how to position the
title text in a tiled window.  To set it in an EEL function, use one
of the following macros defined in codes.h.  (These are the same as
those used by the window_title() primitive.)  The TITLELEFT(n)
macro, which is defined as (1 + (n)), positions the title n
characters from the left edge of the window.  The TITLERIGHT(n)
macro, defined as (-(1 + (n))), positions the title n characters from
the right edge of the window.  The TITLECENTER macro, defined as 0,
centers the title in the window.

~mode-line-shows-mode	Preference

If the variable mode-line-shows-mode is non-zero, when Epsilon
constructs a mode line for a tiled window, it will include the name
of the current major mode plus any minor modes in effect, and enclose
the result in an appropriate number of square bracket pairs (to
indicate the current recursion depth).  When this variable is zero,
Epsilon omits this information and just includes the file and/or
buffer name, plus the information specified by the mode_start and
mode_end variables.

~mode-start	Preference

This specifies the part of the mode line before the file or buffer
name.  Epsilon substitutes various values for the following sequences
in the mode line, as follows:

%c The current column number, counting columns from 0.

%C The current column number, counting columns from 1.

%d The current display column, with a < before it, and a space after.
However, if the display column has a value of 0 (meaning horizontal
scrolling is enabled, but the window has not been scrolled), or -1
(meaning the window wraps long lines), Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%D The current display column, but if the display column is -1,
Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%f The name of the current function (in buffers where Epsilon can
determine this).

%l The current line number.

%m Epsilon substitutes the text " More ", but only if characters
exist past the end of the window.  If the last character in the
buffer appears in the window, Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%P Epsilon substitutes the percentage of point through the buffer,
followed by a percent sign.

%p Epsilon substitutes the percentage of point through the buffer,
followed by a percent sign.  However, if the bottom of the buffer
appears in the window, Epsilon displays Bot instead (or End if point
is at the very end of the buffer).  Epsilon displays Top if the top
of the buffer appears, and All if the entire buffer is visible.

%s Epsilon substitutes "* " if the buffer's modified flag has a
nonzero value, otherwise nothing.

%S Epsilon substitutes "*" if the buffer's modified flag has a
nonzero value, otherwise nothing.

%h Epsilon substitutes the current hour in the range 1 to 12.

%H Epsilon substitutes the current hour in military time in the range
0 to 23.

%n Epsilon substitutes the current minute in the range 0 to 59.

%e Epsilon substitutes the current second in the range 0 to 59.

%a Epsilon substitutes "am" or "pm" as appropriate.

Note: For the current time, use a sequence like %2h:%02n%a for "3:45
pm" or %02H:%02n:%02e for "15:45:21".

%% Epsilon substitutes a literal "%" character.

%< Indicates that redisplay may omit text to the left, if all of the
information will not fit.

%> Puts any following text as far to the right as possible.

For any numeric substitution, you may include a number between the %
and the letter code, giving the field width: the minimum number of
characters to print.  You can use the same kinds of field width
specifiers as C's printf() function.  The sequence %4c expands to
"<Space><Space><Space>9", %04c expands to "0009", and %-4c expands to
"9<Space><Space><Space>".

~modified	Buffer-specific

If nonzero, the buffer has been modified since it was last read or
written.

~monochrome	

This variable is nonzero if Epsilon believes it is running on a
monochrome display.

~mouse-auto-off	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon automatically stops displaying the mouse cursor
when you start to type on the keyboard.

~mouse-auto-on	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon automatically displays the mouse cursor when it
detects mouse motion.

~mouse-center-yanks	Preference

This variable controls the action of the center mouse button, when
that button is bound to the mouse-center command as it usually
is.  A value of 0 means the button pans, by calling the mouse-pan
command.  A value of 1 means the button yanks text from a kill buffer
or clipboard by calling mouse-yank.  A value of 2, the default,
makes Epsilon yank under Unix, and pan in other environments.

~mouse-cursor-attr	

When Epsilon displays the mouse cursor as a reverse-highlighted
character cell (rather than a graphic arrow symbol), it toggles the
bits of the color attribute code of the underlying screen character
according to the value of this variable.  (DOS, OS/2 only.)

~mouse-cursor-char	

When Epsilon displays the mouse cursor as a reverse-highlighted
character cell (rather than a graphic arrow symbol), it replaces the
character under the mouse cursor with this character.  If zero,
Epsilon doesn't change the character, but merely highlights it
according to mouse-cursor-attr.  (DOS, OS/2 only.)

~mouse-dbl-selects	System Buffer-specific

This variable controls what double-clicking with a mouse button does
in a particular buffer.  If zero, double-clicking selects words.  If
nonzero, Epsilon instead runs the command bound to the <Newline> key.

~mouse-display	

If nonzero, Epsilon is now displaying a mouse cursor.  When Epsilon
turns on the mouse cursor automatically due to mouse movement, it
sets this variable to 2.

~mouse-goes-to-tag	Buffer-specific

If nonzero, double-clicking with the right mouse button on a
subroutine name in this buffer makes Epsilon for DOS or Epsilon for
OS/2 go to the definition of that subroutine using the pluck-tag
command.  (In Epsilon for Windows, use the right mouse button's
context menu to jump to a definition.)

~mouse-graphic-cursor	

If nonzero, Epsilon displays the mouse cursor as a graphic arrow
symbol (DOS only).  If zero, Epsilon uses a reverse-highlighted
character cell for the mouse cursor.  Epsilon sets this variable at
startup based on the operating environment and the presence of the
-kc flag.

~mouse-mask	

Only show mouse events that match bits in this variable.

0x01 MASK_MOVE

0x02 MASK_LEFT_DN

0x04 MASK_LEFT_UP

0x08 MASK_RIGHT_DN

0x10 MASK_RIGHT_UP

0x20 MASK_CENTER_DN

0x40 MASK_CENTER_UP

~mouse-panning	System

Epsilon uses this variable to help it autoscroll when you click the
middle mouse button (on three-button or wheeled mice).

~mouse-pixel-x	

This variable contains the horizontal mouse position, in the most
accurate form Epsilon provides.

~mouse-pixel-y	

This variable contains the vertical mouse position, in the most
accurate form Epsilon provides.

~mouse-screen	System

All keys that represent mouse movements or button activity set the
mouse_screen variable to indicate which screen their coordinates
refer to.  All tiled windows are on the main screen, screen 0.  When
Epsilon for Windows creates a dialog box containing one or more
Epsilon windows, each Epsilon window has its own screen number.

~mouse-selection-copies	Preference

When you select text with the mouse under Unix, Epsilon copies it to
a kill buffer (and the clipboard), like copy-region does.  Set
this variable to zero to change that behavior.  A value of 0 means
selecting text doesn't copy it.  A value of 1 means selecting text
copies it too.  A value of 2, the default, makes Epsilon copy under
Unix, but not in other environments.

~mouse-shift	

Bits in this variable indicate which shift keys were depressed at the
time the current mouse event was enqueued.

~mouse-x	

This variable contains the vertical mouse position as a line number
on the screen (counting from line zero at the top).

~mouse-y	

This variable contains the horizontal mouse position as a column
number on the screen (counting from column zero on the left).

~must-build-mode	Buffer-specific

Epsilon "precomputes" most of the text of each mode line, so it
doesn't have to figure out what to write each time it updates the
screen.  Setting this variable nonzero warns Epsilon that mode lines
must be rebuilt for all windows displaying this buffer.  Epsilon
resets the variable to zero after every screen update.

~narrow-end	Buffer-specific

Epsilon ignores the last narrow-end characters of the buffer,
neither displaying them nor allowing any other access to them.  But
Epsilon does include them when it writes the buffer to a file, and
counts them in the total size of the buffer.

~narrow-start	Buffer-specific

Epsilon ignores the first narrow-start characters of the buffer,
neither displaying them nor allowing any other access to them.  But
Epsilon does include them when it writes the buffer to a file, and
counts them in the total size of the buffer.

~near-pause	Preference

The find-delimiter and show-matching-delimiter commands pause
this many hundredths of a second, when they don't have to reposition
the screen to a different part of the buffer in order to show the
matching delimiter.

~need-rebuild-menu	System

Epsilon sets this nonzero to indicate that it must rebuild the
contents of its menu bar.

~new-buffer-translation-type	Preference

When you create a new buffer or file, Epsilon sets its
translation-type variable to this variable's value.  The
translation type determines how Epsilon writes or reads a buffer.

A value of 0 (FILETYPE_BINARY) makes Epsilon do no line
translation, 1 (FILETYPE_MSDOS) makes Epsilon strip <Return>
characters when reading and insert them when writing, 2
(FILETYPE_UNIX) makes Epsilon do no line translation, but
indicates that the file contains text, 3 (FILETYPE_MAC) makes
Epsilon replace <Return> characters with <Newline> characters when
reading, and replace <Newline> characters with <Return> characters
when writing.

The default, 5 (FILETYPE_AUTO), makes Epsilon use the usual type
for this operating system: Unix files under Unix, MS-DOS files
elsewhere.

Also see default-translation-type.

~new-c-comments	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon creates a comment in C mode using the // syntax,
rather than the /* */ syntax.  Changing this setting won't affect
buffers already in C mode; restarting Epsilon is one way to make the
change take effect.

~new-file-ext	Preference

The new-file command creates new buffers with an associated file
name that uses this extension.  Some modes look at the extension of a
buffer's file name to determine how to behave; for example, C mode's
syntax highlighting sets its list of keywords differently for C++
buffers than for C buffers.

~new-file-mode	Preference

The new-file command creates new buffers set to use this mode.
The specified mode-setting command will be run to initialize the
buffer.

~new-search-delay	Preference

In commands that present a list of choices and automatically search
through the list when you type text, Epsilon uses this variable to
determine how long a delay must transpire between keystrokes to
signal the start of new search text.  The delay is in .01 second
units.  For example, if you type "c", then immediately "o", Epsilon
will move to the first entry in the list that starts with "co".  But
if you pause for more than new-search-delay before typing "o",
Epsilon begins a new search string and goes to the first entry that
starts with "o".

Currently only the edit-variables command does this kind of
searching.

~normal-cursor	Preference

This variable holds the shape of the cursor in insert mode (as
opposed to overwrite mode).  It contains a code that specifies the
top and bottom edges of the cursor, such as 3006, which specifies a
cursor that begins on scan line 3 and extends to scan line 6 on a
character box.  The topmost scan line is scan line 0.

Scan lines above 50 in a cursor shape code are interpreted
differently.  A scan line number of 99 indicates the highest-numbered
valid scan line (just below the character), 98 indicates the line
above that, and so forth.  For example, a cursor shape like 1098
produces a cursor that extends from scan line 1 to the next-to-last
scan line, one scan line smaller at top and bottom than a full block
cursor.

See normal-gui-cursor for the Windows or X equivalent.

~normal-gui-cursor	Preference

This variable holds the shape of the caret (the text cursor) in
insert mode (as opposed to overwrite mode) in the Windows and X
versions of Epsilon.  It contains a code that specifies the height
and width of the caret, expressed as a percentage of the size of a
character in pixels.  For example, a width of 100 indicates a caret
just as wide as a character.  Values close to 0 or 100 are absolute
pixel counts, so a width of 98 is two pixels smaller than a
character.  A width of exactly zero means use the default width.  All
measurements are from the top left corner of the character.

In EEL programs, you can use the CURSOR_SHAPE() macro to combine
the height and width values into the appropriate code; it simply
multiplies the height by 1000 and adds it to the width.  So the
default caret shape of CURSOR_SHAPE(100, 2), which specifies a height
of 100% of the character size and a width of 2 pixels, is encoded as
the value 100,002.  The value 100100 represents a block cursor.

The X version of Windows can only change the cursor shape if you've
provided an Epsilon.cursorstyle:1 resource.

~only-file-extensions	System

If non-null, file name completion only finds files with extensions
from this list.  Each extension must include the . character and be
surrounded by | characters.

~opsys	

The opsys variable tells which operating system version of
Epsilon is running, using the following macros defined in codes.h.
OS_DOS, defined as 1, indicates the DOS version or one of the Windows
versions is running.  (See the is-gui variable to distinguish
these.)  OS_OS2, defined as 2, indicates the OS/2 version is running.
OS_UNIX, defined as 3, indicates the UNIX version is running.

~over-mode	Preference Buffer-specific

If nonzero, typing ordinary characters doesn't insert them between
existing characters, but overwrites the existing characters on the
line.

~overwrite-cursor	Preference

This variable holds the shape of the cursor in overwrite mode (as
opposed to insert mode).  See the description of normal-cursor
for details.  See overwrite-gui-cursor for the Windows or X
equivalent.

~overwrite-gui-cursor	Preference

This variable holds the shape of the caret (the text cursor) in
overwrite mode (as opposed to insert mode) in the Windows or X
versions of Epsilon.  See the description of normal-gui-cursor
for details.

~paging-centers-window	Preference

If the paging-centers-window variable is nonzero, the
next-page and previous-page commands will leave point on the
center line of the window when you move from one page to the next.
Set this variable to zero if you want Epsilon to try to keep point on
the same screen line as it pages.  When paging-centers-window is
zero, these commands won't position point at the start (end) of the
buffer when you page up (down) from the first (last) screenful of the
buffer, as they normally do.

~paging-retains-view	

If the paging-retains-view variable is nonzero when Epsilon
displays a buffer in a pop-up window, scrolling up or down past the
end of the buffer won't remove the pop-up window.  Epsilon will
ignore attempts to scroll too far.

~path-list-char	Preference

This variable contains the character separating the directory names
in a configuration variable like EPSPATH.

~path-sep	Preference

This variable contains the preferred character for separating
directory names.  It is normally '\'.  You may change it to '/' if
you prefer Unix-style file names.  Epsilon will then display file
names with '/' instead of with '\'.  (Epsilon for Windows 95/98/NT
currently ignores this setting.  So does Epsilon for DOS when running
under Windows 95/98.  Under Unix, this variable is normally set to
'/' and should not be changed.)

~perl-align-contin-lines	Preference

By default, the Perl indenter tries to align continuation lines under
parentheses and other syntactic items on prior lines.  If Epsilon
can't find anything on prior lines to align with, or if aligning the
continuation line would make it start past column
perl-align-contin-lines, Epsilon uses a fixed indentation: two
levels more than the original line, plus the value of the variable
perl-contin-offset (normally zero).

Set this variable to zero if you don't want Epsilon to ever try to
align continuation lines under syntactic features in previous lines.
If zero, Epsilon indents continuation lines by one level (normally
one tab stop), plus the value of the variable perl-contin-offset
(which may be negative).

~perl-auto-show-delim-chars	Preference

This variable holds the set of delimiter characters that should
trigger Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature in Perl mode.  Epsilon
will search for and highlight the match to this delimiter.

~perl-brace-offset	Preference

In Perl mode, Epsilon offsets the indentation of a left brace on its
own line by the value of this variable.  The perl-closeback
variable also helps to control this placement.

~perl-closeback	Preference

If nonzero, Perl mode aligns a right brace character that ends a
block with the line containing the matching left brace character.  If
zero, Perl mode aligns the right brace character with the first
statement inside the block.

~perl-contin-offset	Preference

In Perl mode, Epsilon offsets its usual indentation of continuation
lines by the value of this variable.  The variable only affects lines
that Epsilon can't line up under the text of previous lines.

~perl-indent	Preference Buffer-specific

Perl mode indents each additional level of nesting by this many
columns.  If the variable is less than or equal to zero, Epsilon uses
the value of tab-size instead.  Set this variable if you want
Epsilon to use one number for displaying tab characters, and a
different number for indenting Perl code.  (Epsilon will indent using
a combination of spaces and tabs, as necessary.)

~perl-label-indent	Preference

This variable provides the indentation of lines starting with labels
in Perl mode.  Normally, Epsilon moves labels to the left margin.

~perl-tab-override	Preference

If you want the width of a tab character in Perl mode buffers to be
different than in other buffers, set this variable to the desired
value.  Perl mode will change the buffer's tab size to the specified
number of columns.

~perl-top-braces	Preference

Epsilon indents the braces of the top-level block of a function by
the number of characters specified by this variable.  By default,
Epsilon puts such braces at the left margin.

~perl-top-contin	Preference

Epsilon indents continuation lines outside of any function body by
the number of characters specified by this variable, whenever it
cannot find any text on previous lines to align the continuation line
beneath.

~perl-top-struct	Preference

When a top-level definition appears over several lines, Epsilon
indents the later lines by the number of characters specified in this
variable, rather than the value of perl-top-contin.

~perl-topindent	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon indents top-level statements in a function.  If
zero, Epsilon keeps such statements at the left margin.

~permanent-menu	System

This variable records whether you want a permanent menu bar.  Set it
only with the toggle-menu-bar command.  (DOS, OS/2, Unix only.)

~permit-window-keys	System

Epsilon only recognizes user attempts to scroll by clicking on the
scroll bar, or to resize the window, when it waits for the first key
in a recursive edit level.  Within an EEL command, when an EEL
command requests a key, Epsilon normally ignores attempts to scroll,
and postpones acting on resize attempts.  An EEL command can set the
permit_window_keys variable to allow these things to happen
immediately, and possibly redraw the screen.  Bits in the variable
control these activities: set the PERMIT_SCROLL_KEY bit to permit
immediate scrolling, and set PERMIT_RESIZE_KEY to permit resizing.
Setting the PERMIT_WHEEL_KEY bit tells Epsilon to generate a
WIN_WHEEL_KEY key event after scrolling due to a wheel roll on a
Microsoft IntelliMouse.

~point	Buffer-specific

This variable stores the current editing position.  Its value denotes
the number of characters from the beginning of the buffer to the spot
at which insertions happen.

~postscript-auto-show-delim-chars	

This variable holds the set of delimiter characters that should
trigger Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature in PostScript mode.
Epsilon will search for and highlight the match to this delimiter.

~preserve-filename-case	Preference

Set this variable nonzero to tell Epsilon to use the case of file
names exactly as retrieved from the operating system.  By default,
Epsilon changes all-uppercase file names like WIN.INI to lower case
like win.ini, except on case-sensitive file systems.

~preserve-session	Preference

When this variable is 6, Epsilon writes a session file when it exits,
and reads one when it starts.  Set it to 2 to save the session every
time you exit, but not to restore the session by default.  Set it to
4 to restore the session normally (see the session-always-restore
variable) but not to save the session.  The value 0 does neither.
(The value 1 does both, like 6, for compatibility with previous
versions.)

~prev-cmd	

Some commands behave differently depending on what command preceded
them.  To get this behavior, the command acts differently if
prev-cmd is set to a certain value and sets this-cmd to that
value itself.  Epsilon copies the value in this-cmd to
prev-cmd and then clears this-cmd each time through the main
loop.

~print-color-scheme	Preference

When Epsilon for Windows prints on color printers, you can tell it to
use a different color scheme than it uses for on-screen display.  Put
the name of the color scheme in this variable.  If "", Epsilon uses
the same color scheme as for on-screen display.

~print-destination	Preference

For DOS or OS/2, Epsilon's printing commands record the device name
of your printer in this variable.  The printer device name is
typically something like LPT1 or COM2.

If the print-destination variable begins with the !  character,
Epsilon interprets the remainder of the value as a command line to
execute in order to print a file.  Epsilon substitutes the file to be
printed for any %f sequence in the command line.  For example, if
your system requires you to type "netprint filename" to print a file,
set print-destination to !netprint %f and Epsilon will run that
command, passing it the file name of the temporary file it generates
holding the text to print.  The print-destination can include any
of the file name template sequences, such as %p for the path to the
file to print.  (DOS, OS/2 only.)

~print-destination-unix	Preference

Under Unix, this variable tells Epsilon how to print.  If it names a
file, Epsilon will print by simply writing text to that file.  But if
it starts with a ! character (as is usual), Epsilon will interpret
the text after the ! as a command line to execute in order to print a
file.

Epsilon substitutes the file to be printed for any %f sequence in the
command line.  For example, if your system requires you to type
"netprint filename" to print a file, set print-destination to
!netprint %f and Epsilon will run that command, passing it the file
name of the temporary file it generates holding the text to print.
The print-destination can include any of the file name template
sequences, such as %p for the path to the file to print.

~print-heading	Preference

Epsilon for Windows prints a heading at the top of each page.  Set
this variable to control what it includes.  The value 1 makes Epsilon
include the file name, 2 makes Epsilon include a page number, and 4
makes Epsilon include the current date.  You can add these values
together; the default value of 7 includes all the above items.

~print-in-color	Preference

By default, Epsilon for Windows will print in color on color
printers, and in black & white on non-color printers.  You can set
the print-in-color variable to 0, if you don't want Epsilon to ever
print in color, or to 2 if you want Epsilon to attempt to use colors
even if the printer doesn't appear to be a color printer.  (Some
printers will substitute shades of grey.)  The value 1 produces color
printing only on color printers.

~print-line-numbers	Preference

Epsilon for Windows will include line numbers in printed output if
this variable is nonzero.

~print-long-lines-wrap	Preference

Epsilon for Windows will truncate long lines in printed output if
this variable is zero.  Otherwise they will be wrapped to the next
line.

~print-tabs	Preference

If the print-tabs variable is zero, Epsilon will make a copy of
any text to be printed and convert tab characters within it to
spaces, prior to sending it to the printer.  If you want Epsilon to
send the text to be printed without converting tabs first, set this
variable to one.

~process-current-directory	System

When you use a concurrent process, Epsilon stores its current
directory in this variable.  Setting this variable switches the
concurrent process to a different current directory.

To set the variable from EEL, use the syntax
process_current_directory = new value;.  Don't use strcpy(), for
example, to modify it.

The Windows 95/98 (and 3.1) versions of Epsilon only transmit current
directory information to or from the process when the process prompts
for input.  The DOS version transmits current directory information
immediately.  Under OS/2, Epsilon can't detect or set the concurrent
process's current directory, so setting this variable has no effect.
Under Unix, Epsilon tries to retrieve the process's current directory
whenever you access this variable, but setting it has no effect.
Under NT, Epsilon tries to detect the process's current directory
using a different method and doesn't use this variable.

When the variable use-process-current-directory is 1, the
default, Epsilon and the subprocess use the same current directory.
In this case, setting this variable is equivalent to changing the
current directory.

~process-enter-whole-line	Preference

If this variable is nonzero, <Enter> in the concurrent process buffer
moves to the end of the current line before sending it to the
process, but only when in a line that has not yet been sent to the
process.  If the process-enter-whole-line variable is two,
Epsilon copies the current line to the end of the buffer, making it
easier to repeat a command.

~process-exit-status	System

Epsilon sets this variable when a concurrent process exits, to
indicate its exit code.  Before the process exits, it contains the
value PROC_STATUS_RUNNING.

~process-output-to-window-bottom	Preference

When output arrives from the concurrent process, Epsilon scrolls the
text so the end of the output appears on the last line of the window,
if possible, like a traditional console window.  Set this variable to
zero to disable this feature.

~process-tab-size	Preference

Epsilon sets the displayed width of <Tab> characters in the process
buffer to this value.

~prompt-with-buffer-directory	Preference

The prompt-with-buffer-directory variable controls how Epsilon
uses the current directory at file prompts.  When this variable is 2,
the default, Epsilon inserts the current buffer's directory at many
file prompts.  This makes it easy to select another file in the same
directory.  You can edit the directory name, or you can begin typing
a new absolute pathname right after the inserted pathname.  Epsilon
will delete the inserted pathname when it notices your absolute
pathname.  This behavior is similar to Gnu Emacs's.

When prompt-with-buffer-directory is 1, Epsilon temporarily
changes to the current buffer's directory while prompting for a file
name, and interprets file names relative to the current directory.
This behavior is similar to the "pathname.e" extension available for
previous versions of Epsilon.

When prompt-with-buffer-directory is 0, Epsilon doesn't do
anything special at file prompts.  This was Epsilon's default
behavior in previous versions.

~push-cmd	Preference

This variable holds the default command line for running another
program.  The variable is a template based on the current file name,
so you can set it to automatically operate on the current file.
Epsilon substitutes pieces of the current file name for codes in the
template, as follows (examples are for the file c:\dos\read.me):

%p The current file's path (c:\dos\).

%b The base part of the current file name (read).

%e The extension of the current file name (.me).

%f The full name of the current file (c:\dos\read.me).

%r The name of the file relative to the current directory.  (read.me
if the current directory is c:\dos, dos\read.me if the current
directory is c:\, otherwise c:\dos\read.me).

%x The full pathname of the directory containing the Epsilon
executable.

%X The full pathname of the directory containing the Epsilon
executable, after converting all Windows 95/98/NT long file names to
their equivalent short name aliases.

~push-cmd-unix-interactive	Preference

When Epsilon for Unix runs as an X program, the push command
executes this command when it needs to start an interactive shell.

~readonly-pages	Preference

In a read-only buffer you can use the <Space> and <Backspace> keys to
page forward and back more conveniently.  Other inserting keys
display an error message.  Set this variable to zero if you want
these keys to display an error message, not page.

~readonly-warning	Preference

Bits in this variable control Epsilon's action when it reads a
read-only file:

ROWARN_MSG (1) Epsilon displays a warning message.

ROWARN_BUF_RO (2) Epsilon sets the buffer read-only.

ROWARN_BELL (4) Epsilon beeps.

ROWARN_GREP (8) Postpone the above actions during multi-file search.

Add these together to get multiple actions.

~recall-id	System

Epsilon's line input subroutines let you recall previous responses to
each prompt.  Epsilon normally keeps track of which responses go with
which prompts by recording the type of response (file name, buffer
name, etc.) and the name of the command that prompted for the text.
A command can tell Epsilon to use a different "handle" for a prompt
by setting the recall-id variable to a string containing the
handle.  For example, if you wrote three new EEL commands and wanted
them to share previous responses, you could include the line save_var
recall_id = "my_responses"; in each command prior to calling the
input function.

~recall-maximum-session	Preference

Epsilon saves previous responses to all prompts in its session file,
so you don't have to type them in again.  It uses up to
recall-maximum-session bytes in a session file for previous
responses, discarding the oldest unrecalled responses when necessary.

~recall-maximum-size	Preference

Epsilon saves previous responses to all prompts, so you don't have to
type them in again.  It retains up to recall-maximum-size bytes
of previous responses, discarding the oldest unrecalled responses
when necessary.

~recognize-password-prompt	Preference

In a Telnet buffer, Epsilon looks for a Password: prompt and
intercepts it to help hide your password.  Set this variable to zero
if you don't want this feature.

~recording-suspended	System

The pause-macro command sets this variable nonzero to indicate
that it has suspended recording of a keyboard macro.

~regex-first-end	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon's standard regular expression searching commands
find the match of the pattern that ends first, rather than the one
that begins first.

~regex-shortest	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon's standard regular expression searching commands
find the shortest match of the pattern, rather than the longest match.

~reindent-after-c-yank	Preference

When you yank text into a buffer in C mode, Epsilon automatically
reindents it.  This is similar to the "smart paste" feature in some
other editors.  Epsilon won't automatically reindent very large
blocks of text.  This variable specifies the size in characters of
the largest block that should automatically be reindented.  Set it to
0 to disable automatic reindent in C mode, or -1 to reindent all text
yanked in C mode.

~reindent-after-perl-yank	Preference

When you yank text into a buffer in Perl mode, Epsilon automatically
reindents it.  This is similar to the "smart paste" feature in some
other editors.  Epsilon won't automatically reindent very large
blocks of text.  This variable specifies the size in characters of
the largest block that should automatically be reindented.  Set it to
0 to disable automatic reindent in Perl mode, or -1 to reindent all
text yanked in Perl mode.

~reindent-after-yank	Preference

This variable controls whether Epsilon automatically reindents blocks
of text you yank into the current buffer.  This is similar to the
"smart paste" feature in some other editors.  This variable specifies
the size in characters of the largest block that should automatically
be reindented.  A value of 0 disables automatic reindent in this
buffer, and -1 removes any size limitation.  Mode-specific variables
like reindent-after-c-yank take precedence over this variable.

~reindent-c-comments	Preference

This variable controls how Epsilon indents lines that start a block
comment (those that begin with '/*') and lines that start inside a
block comment.  If 0, Epsilon never changes the indentation of these
lines in commands like indent-region.  If 1, Epsilon reindents
these lines, except when yanking a block of text and automatically
reindenting it.  If 2, Epsilon reindents in all cases.

~reindent-one-line-c-comments	Preference

This variable controls how Epsilon indents comment lines that start
with '//'.  If 0, Epsilon never changes the indentation of these
lines in commands like indent-region.  If 1, Epsilon reindents
these lines, except when yanking a block of text and automatically
reindenting it.  If 2, Epsilon reindents in all cases.

~replace-num-changed	System

The string_replace() subroutine sets the replace-num-changed
variable to the number of matches it changed.

~replace-num-found	System

The string_replace() subroutine sets the replace-num-found
variable to the number of matches it found.

~resize-menu-list	System

An EEL completion function can set this variable nonzero to indicate
that if the user tries to list possible completion choices, the
window displaying the choices should be widened if necessary to fit
the widest choice.  This variable has no effect on Epsilon windows
within GUI dialogs.

~restart-concurrent	Preference

When the push, make, or compile-buffer commands exit from
a concurrent process to run a command non-concurrently, they will
restart the concurrent process once the command finishes.  Set
restart-concurrent to zero if you don't want Epsilon to restart
the concurrent process in this case.

~restore-blinking-on-exit	Preference

Under DOS and OS/2, Epsilon normally sets the video mode on EGA/VGA
systems to display bright backgrounds in place of blinking
characters.  Set restore-blinking-on-exit nonzero if you want
Epsilon to reset back to blinking characters when it exits.

~restore-color-on-exit	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon for DOS tries to restore the screen color when
you exit.  If zero (and under OS/2), Epsilon tries to set the color
to the after-exiting color class, as specified with the set-color
command.  (Sometimes the operating system environment overrides this
and forces a particular color.  DOS, OS/2 only.)

~resynch-match-chars	Preference

If you invoke compare-windows again immediately after it has
found a difference, the command will try to resynchronize the windows
by moving forward in each window until it finds a match of at least
resynch-match-chars characters.

~return-raw-buttons	System

If you click a button in a dialog under Epsilon for Windows, Epsilon
represents the input with an ordinary key value, such as <Enter> when
you click an Ok button.  An EEL program can temporarily set this
variable to a nonzero value to retrieve button presses as distinct
keys.  All buttons will then appear with the key code WIN_BUTTON.
Use the key-is-button variable to distinguish one button from
another.

~rev-search-key	Preference

Inside a search command, Epsilon recognizes a key with this key code
as a synonym for Ctrl-R, for pulling in a default search string or
changing the search direction.

~run-by-mouse	System

If nonzero, this command was run by the mouse, via the menu bar or
tool bar.

~save-when-making	Preference

If zero, the make command doesn't warn about unsaved buffers
before running another program.  If one, the command automatically
saves all unsaved buffers without asking.  If two, Epsilon asks if
you want to save the unsaved buffers.

~screen-cols	System

This variable holds the number of columns on the screen.

~screen-lines	System

This variable holds the number of lines on the screen.

~screen-mode	

Under DOS, this variable holds the code for the current screen mode
at startup, according to the BIOS.  Under other operating systems,
Epsilon sets this variable to the BIOS value that most closely
matches the current screen mode.

~scroll-at-end	Preference

When you move past the top or bottom edge of the window via the
up-line or down-line commands, Epsilon scrolls the screen by
this many lines.  If scroll-at-end is zero, Epsilon instead
centers the new line in the window.

~scroll-bar-type	Preference

Epsilon for Windows 95/98/NT can display two types of scroll bars.
By default scroll-bar-type is 1, and Epsilon uses a line-based
approach, with a "thumb" size that varies to reflect the number of
lines visible in the window relative to the number of lines in the
buffer.  On extremely large buffers, this could be slow, so you can
set the variable to 0 and Epsilon will use a fixed-size thumb as in
previous versions.

~scroll-init-delay	Preference

Epsilon delays scroll-init-delay hundredths of a second after its
first scroll due to a mouse click on the scroll bar, before it begins
repeatedly scrolling at scroll-rate lines per second.

~scroll-rate	Preference

Epsilon scrolls by this many lines per second when scrolling due to
mouse movements.

~search-in-menu	Preference

This variable controls what Epsilon does when you press '?' during
completion and then continue typing a response.  If zero, Epsilon
moves from the pop-up list of responses back to the prompt area, and
editing keys like <Left> navigate in the response.  If nonzero,
Epsilon moves in the pop-up menu of names to the first name that
matches what you've typed, and stays in the pop-up window.  (If it
can't find a match, Epsilon moves back to the prompt as before.)

~search-wraps	Preference

By default, when an incremental search fails, pressing Ctrl-S or
Ctrl-R to continue the search in the same direction makes Epsilon
wrap to the other end of the buffer and continue searching from
there.  Set this variable to zero to disable this behavior.

~see-delay	Preference

Epsilon displays most messages in the echo area for at least
see-delay hundredths of a second before replacing them with new
messages.

~selectable-colors	

This variable contains the maximum number of color combinations the
set-color command lets you select from.

~selected-color-scheme	

Epsilon keeps the name table index of the current color scheme in
this variable.

~session-always-restore	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon reads a session file when starting even if its
command line contains file names.  If zero, Epsilon only restores the
previous session when no files are specified.

~session-default-directory	Preference

If Epsilon finds no session file by searching the current directory
tree, it uses a session file in this directory.  But if
session-default-directory is empty, Epsilon uses the EPSPATH
configuration variable, if there is one, or the root directory.

~session-file-name	Preference

If this variable is nonempty, it provides the name of the session
file Epsilon should use.  If the name isn't an absolute pathname,
Epsilon can search for files by that name in the current directory
hierarchy.

~session-restore-directory	Preference

When Epsilon reads a session file, it can restore the current
directory named in that file.  If session-restore-directory is 1,
it always does this.  If 0, it never restores the current directory.
If 2, the default, it restores the current directory only if the -w1
flag was specified.

~session-restore-files	Preference

If 0, when Epsilon restores a session, it won't load any files named
in the session, only settings like previous search strings and
command history.  If 1, Epsilon will restore previous files as well
as other settings.  If 2, Epsilon will restore previous files only if
there were no files specified on Epsilon's command line.

~session-restore-max-files	Preference

When Epsilon restores a session, it will only reload up to this
number of files.  Files are prioritized by time of access in Epsilon,
so Epsilon by default restores the 30 files you've most recently
edited.

~session-tree-root	Preference

If nonempty, when Epsilon searches for a session file in the current
directory tree, it only examines directories that are children of
this directory.  For example, if session-tree-root holds
\joe\proj, and the current directory is \joe\proj\src, Epsilon will
search in \joe\proj\src, then \joe\proj, for a session file.  If the
current directory is \joe\misc, on the other hand, Epsilon won't
search at all (since \joe\misc isn't a child of \joe\proj), but will
use the rules in the previous paragraph.  By default,
session-tree-root is set to an impossible absolute pathname, so
searching is disabled.

~shell-auto-show-delim-chars	Preference

This variable holds the set of delimiter characters that should
trigger Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature in Shell mode.
Epsilon will search for and highlight the match to this delimiter.

~shell-shrinks	Preference

Under DOS, this variable helps to determine the amount of memory
available to any subprocess you run.  If zero, Epsilon and the
process share the available memory.  If nonzero, Epsilon unloads
itself from memory until you exit from the process, leaving only a
small section of itself behind.  When your program exits, Epsilon
reloads itself, leaving you in exactly the same state as before the
shrinking occurred.

~shell-tab-override	Preference

If you want the width of a tab character in Shell script buffers to
be different than in other buffers, set this variable to the desired
value.  Shell mode will change the buffer's tab size to the specified
number of columns.

~shift-selecting	System

Epsilon uses this variable to keep track of whether the currently
highlighted selection was begun by pressing an arrow key while
holding down the Shift key.  If so, pressing an arrow key without
holding down the Shift key will turn off highlighting.

~shift-selects	Preference

If this variable is nonzero, you can select text by using the arrow
keys, <Home>, <End>, <PageUp>, or <PageDown> while holding down the
Shift key.

~show-all-variables	System

If zero, commands that offer completion on variable names will only
recognize user variables, those marked with the user keyword.  If
nonzero, such commands also list system variables.

~show-mouse-choices	System

If nonzero, commands that provide completion immediately display a
list of possible choices, when run via the mouse.

~show-spaces	Preference Buffer-specific

Set this variable nonzero to make Epsilon display special symbols on
the screen for each <Space>, <Tab>, or <Newline> character in the
buffer, to make them easily visible.  Set it back to zero to restore
the normal display.

~show-tag-line	Preference

When Epsilon jumps to a tag, it positions the window so the first
line of the definition appears this many lines from the top of the
window.

~show-when-idle	Preference

You can set Epsilon to display text in the echo area whenever it's
idle.  The show-when-idle variable holds the text to display.  It
can include any of the following sequences, and Epsilon will
substitute the indicated value for that sequence:

%c Epsilon substitutes the current column number, counting columns
from 0.

%C Epsilon substitutes the current column number, counting columns
from 1.

%d Epsilon substitutes the current display column, with a < before
it, and a space after.  However, if the display column has a value of
0 (meaning horizontal scrolling is enabled, but the window has not
been scrolled), or -1 (meaning the window wraps long lines), Epsilon
substitutes nothing.

%D Epsilon substitutes the current display column, but if the display
column is -1, Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%f The name of the current function (in buffers where Epsilon can
determine this).

%l Epsilon substitutes the current line number.

%m Epsilon substitutes the text " More ", but only if characters
exist past the end of the window.  If the last character in the
buffer appears in the window, Epsilon substitutes nothing.

%P Epsilon substitutes the percentage of point through the buffer,
followed by a percent sign.

%p Epsilon substitutes the percentage of point through the buffer,
followed by a percent sign.  However, if the bottom of the buffer
appears in the window, Epsilon displays Bot instead (or End if point
is at the very end of the buffer).  Epsilon displays Top if the top
of the buffer appears, and All if the entire buffer is visible.

%s Epsilon substitutes "* " if the buffer's modified flag has a
nonzero value, otherwise nothing.

%S Epsilon substitutes "*" if the buffer's modified flag has a
nonzero value, otherwise nothing.

%h Epsilon substitutes the current hour in the range 1 to 12.

%H Epsilon substitutes the current hour in military time in the range
0 to 23.

%n Epsilon substitutes the current minute in the range 0 to 59.

%e Epsilon substitutes the current second in the range 0 to 59.

%a Epsilon substitutes "am" or "pm" as appropriate.

Note: For the current time, use a sequence like %2h:%02n %a for "3:45
pm" or %02H:%02n:%02e for "15:45:21".

%% Epsilon substitutes a literal "%" character.

For any numeric substitution, you may include a number between the %
and the letter code, giving the field width: the minimum number of
characters to print.  You can use the same kinds of field width
specifiers as C's printf() function.  The sequence %4c expands to
"<Space><Space><Space>9", %04c expands to "0009", and %-4c expands to
"9<Space><Space><Space>".

~show-when-idle-column	Preference

You can set Epsilon to display text in the echo area whenever it's
idle.  Epsilon positions the text show-when-idle-column columns
from the left edge of the screen.  Set this variable to a negative
number to make Epsilon count columns from the right edge of the
screen instead.  For example, set show-when-idle-column to -10 to
make Epsilon position the text 10 columns from the right edge.

~sort-case-fold	Preference Buffer-specific

When comparing lines of text during sorting, Epsilon folds lower case
letters to upper case before comparison, if the sort-case-fold
variable is 1.  If the sort-case-fold variable is 0, Epsilon
compares characters as-is.  If sort-case-fold is 2, Epsilon
instead folds characters only if the case-fold variable is
nonzero.

~sort-status	

If nonzero, Epsilon displays progress messages as it sorts.
Otherwise, no status messages appear.

~start-make-in-buffer-directory	Preference

The start-make-in-buffer-directory variable controls which
directory becomes current when you run the make command.  Set the
variable to 0 if you want each subprocess to begin with its current
directory set to match Epsilon's.  Set the variable to 2 if you want
each subprocess to begin in the current buffer's directory.  Set the
variable to 1 if you want each subprocess to begin in the current
buffer's directory, and you also want Epsilon to change its own
current directory to match, whenever you start a process.  Also see
the start-process-in-buffer-directory variable.

~start-process-in-buffer-directory	Preference

The start-process-in-buffer-directory variable controls which
directory becomes current when you start a process.  Set the variable
to 0 if you want each subprocess to begin with its current directory
set to match Epsilon's.  Set the variable to 2 if you want each
subprocess to begin in the current buffer's directory.  Set the
variable to 1 if you want each subprocess to begin in the current
buffer's directory, and you also want Epsilon to change its own
current directory to match, whenever you start a process.  Also see
the start-make-in-buffer-directory variable.

~state-extension	System

This variable holds the correct extension of state files in this
version of Epsilon.

~state-file-backup-name	Preference

When you write a new state file, Epsilon makes a copy of the old one
if the variable want-state-file-backups is nonzero.  Epsilon
constructs the backup file name from the original using the file name
template in this variable.

~system-window	System Window-specific

If nonzero in a window, user commands that switch windows will skip
over this window.

~tab-size	Preference Buffer-specific

This variable holds the number of columns from one tab stop to the
next.  Epsilon expands tab characters in the buffer to reach the next
tab stop.  By default, Epsilon also indents in units of the tab size.

~table-count	System

This variable counts the number of prefix keys like Ctrl-X you've
typed so far in the current command.

~tag-ask-before-retagging	Preference

If zero, when a tag's line has changed within a file, Epsilon retags
the file automatically and then searches again.  Similarly, when
Epsilon can't find a tag at all, it tries tagging the current file.
If nonzero, Epsilon asks before doing either of these things.

~tag-batch-mode	System

Epsilon's tag facility uses this variable to decide if it should
report an error immediately, or just log it to a buffer.

~tag-by-text	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon includes the entire line that defined a tag in
the tag file, so it can search for the line when the buffer has been
modified since tagging.  If zero, Epsilon only includes the offset,
saving space in the tag file for files that rarely change.

~tag-case-sensitive	Preference

Set this variable nonzero if you want tagging to consider MAIN, Main
and main to be distinct tags.  By default, typing main will find any
of these.

~tag-declarations	Preference

The tag-declarations variable lets you set whether the tagger
will tag function or variable declarations (as opposed to
definitions, which Epsilon always tags).  If zero (the default),
Epsilon only tags definitions.  If one, Epsilon tags function
declarations as well.  If two, Epsilon tags variable declarations
(which use the extern keyword).  If three, Epsilon tags both types of
declarations.  You may wish to use this setting to tag the .h header
files of library functions.

~tag-extern-decl	System

The C tagger uses this variable to decide if it's found a variable
definition, or just a declaration.

~tag-list-exact-only	System

Epsilon's tag facility uses this variable internally to decide if tag
matching should include prefix matches or only exact matches.

~tag-pattern-c	System

The pluck-tag command searches using this regular expression to
locate the current tag in C/C++/Java buffers.

~tag-pattern-default	System

The pluck-tag command searches using this regular expression to
locate the current tag in buffers without a mode-specific tag pattern.

~tag-pattern-perl	System

The pluck-tag command searches using this regular expression to
locate the current tag in Perl buffers.

~tag-relative	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon stores relative pathnames in the tag file
whenever it can.  If zero, Epsilon uses only absolute pathnames.

~tag-show-percent	System

If nonzero, Epsilon displays a percentage status report while tagging
instead of mentioning each tag it finds.  Commands that use tagging
to parse a buffer without really generating tags can set this.

~tex-auto-fill-mode	

If nonzero, Epsilon breaks long lines in TeX/LaTeX files using
auto-fill mode.  If zero, it doesn't.

~tex-auto-show-delim-chars	

This variable holds the set of delimiter characters that should
trigger Epsilon's auto-show-delimiters feature in TeX mode.  Epsilon
will search for and highlight the match to this delimiter.

~tex-environment-name	

The tex-environment command uses this variable to hold the name
of the last environment you inserted in TeX mode.

~tex-force-latex	Preference Buffer-specific

Some TeX mode commands are slightly different in LaTeX than in pure
TeX.  Set tex-force-latex to 1 if all your documents are LaTeX, 0
if all your documents are TeX, or 2 if Epsilon should determine this
on a document-by-document basis.  In that case, Epsilon will assume a
document is LaTeX if it contains a \begin{document} statement or if
it's in a file with an .ltx extension.

~tex-look-back	Preference

TeX syntax highlighting sometimes needs to look back in the buffer to
locate the start of a paragraph.  Long stretches of text without
paragraph breaks can make it slow.  Set this variable lower if you
want Epsilon to give up sooner and incorrectly color some rare cases.

~tex-paragraphs	Preference Buffer-specific

If nonzero, then Epsilon will not consider as part of a paragraph any
sequence of lines that each start with at sign or period, if that
sequence appears next to a blank line.  And lines starting with
\begin or \end will also delimit paragraphs.

~tex-save-new-environments	Preference

The tex-environment command lets you easily create a new
environment, inserting begin/end pairs.  When it prompts for an
environment name, you can type the name of a new environment, and
Epsilon will remember it for the rest of the editing session,
offering it for completion.  Set this variable nonzero and Epsilon
will also save the new environment name for future sessions.

~text-color	Window-specific

This variable contains the color class of normal text in the current
window.

~this-cmd	

Some commands behave differently depending on what command preceded
them.  To get this behavior, the command acts differently if
prev-cmd is set to a certain value and sets this-cmd to that
value itself.  Epsilon copies the value in this-cmd to
prev-cmd and then clears this-cmd each time through the main
loop.

~tiled-border	Preference

This variable holds the border codes Epsilon uses for putting borders
at the edges of a tiled window.

~tiled-scroll-bar	System

If nonzero, Epsilon constantly displays a scroll bar on tiled
windows.  Set this with the toggle-scroll-bar command.

~topindent	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon indents top-level statements in a function.  If
zero, Epsilon keeps such statements at the left margin.

~translation-type	Buffer-specific

Epsilon uses this variable to record the type of line translation
used by the current buffer.  The set-line-translate command sets
this variable.  To read a new file in a mode other than the default,
type Ctrl-U Ctrl-X Ctrl-F to run the find-file command with a
numeric argument.

~type-point	Buffer-specific

This variable holds the position within the process buffer where
Epsilon inserts new text from the process.  Epsilon retrieves any
text after the type point and sends it as input to the process.  The
variable serves a similar purpose in Telnet buffers and buffers
involved in FTP transfers.

~typing-deletes-highlight	Preference

If this variable is nonzero, pressing a self-inserting key like "j"
while text is highlighted deletes the highlighted selection,
replacing it with the key.  Pressing <Backspace> simply deletes the
text.

If you set this variable to zero, you may wish to set the
insert-default-response variable to zero also.  Then Epsilon
won't automatically insert and highlight your previous response at
various prompts.

~undo-flag	Buffer-specific

In addition to buffer changes and movements, Epsilon can record other
information in its list of undoable operations.  Each time you set
this variable, Epsilon inserts a "flag" in its undo list with the
particular value you specify.  When Epsilon is undoing or redoing and
encounters a flag, it immediately ends the current group of undo
operations, returns a special code, and puts the value of the flag it
encountered back into the undo_flag variable.

~undo-keeps-narrowing	System Buffer-specific

If you use the narrow-to-region command to hide part of the
buffer, and then use the undo command to undo a change in a
hidden part of the buffer, undo removes the narrowing.  Some
modes set this variable nonzero to prevent that behavior.

~undo-size	Preference Buffer-specific

Epsilon retains at most this many characters of deleted or changed
text in this buffer's undo information.

~ungot-key	

If this variable is set to some value other than its usual value of
-1, Epsilon uses that value when it next tries to read a key and sets
ungot-key to -1 again.

~use-default	System

If nonzero, every time Epsilon refers to a buffer- or window-specific
variable, it uses the default value instead of the current value.

~use-process-current-directory	Preference

If the use-process-current-directory variable is 1, the default,
Epsilon for Windows 95/98 (or Windows 3.1) and its concurrent process
will share a common current directory.  Changing the current
directory in Epsilon will change the current directory for the
process, and vice versa.  If the variable is 0, Epsilon and its
concurrent process will use independent current directories.

This variable only modifies the behavior of Epsilon for Windows.
Epsilon for DOS always shares the current directory with its process.
Under OS/2, Epsilon always uses independent current directories.
Under NT and Unix, Epsilon tries to retrieve the process's current
directory and use it as the default directory for the process buffer,
but it doesn't affect Epsilon's current directory (set with Alt-x
cd), and Epsilon never tries to set the process's current
directory.

~user-abort	

Epsilon sets this nonzero when you press the abort key.  Commands
check this variable and abort if it's nonzero.

~version	

This variable holds the current version number of Epsilon in text
form, as recorded in the executable file.

~versioned-file-string	System

This variable holds Epsilon's version number, formatted so that it
can be part of a directory name.  Epsilon for Unix looks for its
configuration files in a directory whose name is built from this
string; it also checks this against the variable eel-version to
detect version mismatches between an Epsilon executable and its state
file commands.

~vga43	Preference

Under DOS on a VGA board, Epsilon only recognizes 80x43 mode if this
variable is nonzero.

~virtual-insert-cursor	Preference

Epsilon uses the cursor shape code specified by this variable
whenever the cursor is in virtual space (between characters) and
Epsilon's overwrite mode is off.  See the description of
normal-cursor for details.  See virtual-insert-gui-cursor for
the Windows or X equivalent.

~virtual-insert-gui-cursor	Preference

Epsilon for Windows or X uses the cursor shape code specified by this
variable whenever the cursor is in virtual space (between characters)
and Epsilon's overwrite mode is off.  See the description of
normal-gui-cursor for details.

~virtual-overwrite-cursor	Preference

Epsilon uses the cursor shape code specified by this variable
whenever the cursor is in virtual space (between characters) and
Epsilon's overwrite mode is on.  See the description of
normal-cursor for details.  See virtual-overwrite-gui-cursor
for the Windows or X equivalent.

~virtual-overwrite-gui-cursor	Preference

Epsilon for Windows or X uses the cursor shape code specified by this
variable whenever the cursor is in virtual space (between characters)
and Epsilon's overwrite mode is off.  See the description of
normal-gui-cursor for details.

~virtual-space	Preference Buffer-specific

If zero, Epsilon commands only position to places on the screen where
there is actual buffer text.  If one, the <Up> and <Down> keys will
stay in the same column, even if no text exists there.  If two, in
addition to <Up> and <Down>, the <Right> and <Left> keys will move
into places where no text exists.

~w-bottom	System

Mouse commands store the bottom edge of the selected window here.

~w-left	System

Mouse commands store the left edge of the selected window here.

~w-right	System

Mouse commands store the right edge of the selected window here.

~w-top	System

Mouse commands store the top edge of the selected window here.

~want-auto-save	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon periodically saves a copy of each unsaved file.

~want-backups	Preference Buffer-specific

If 2, Epsilon makes a backup whenever it saves a file.  If 1, Epsilon
makes a backup the first time it saves a file in a session.

~want-bell	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon beeps to warn you of certain conditions.
Variables starting with bell-on- permit finer control over just when
Epsilon beeps.

~want-code-coloring	Preference Buffer-specific

If this buffer-specific variable is non-zero, Epsilon tries to do
code coloring (syntax highlighting) in the current buffer.

~want-cols	System

This variable holds the value the user specified through the -vc
switch, or 0 if the user did not explicitly specify the number of
columns to display via this flag.

~want-common-file-dialog	Preference

In Epsilon for Windows, some commands that prompt for files can use
the Windows Common File Dialog.  By default, these commands use the
dialog if you invoke them from the menu or tool bar, but not if you
invoke them from the keyboard using their bindings.  Set this
variable to 2 if you want Epsilon to use the Common File Dialog
whenever it can.  Set the variable to 0 to prevent Epsilon from ever
using this dialog.  The default value of 1 produces the behavior
described above.

~want-display-host-name	Preference

Set this variable to 0 to keep Epsilon from displaying the computer's
configured host name in the window title.

~want-gui-help	Preference

If this variable is zero, most of the help commands in Epsilon for
Windows will avoid using WinHelp to deliver help, and will instead
retrieve help from the text-only edoc file, like non-Windows versions
of Epsilon.

~want-gui-help-console	Preference

If this variable is zero, most of the help commands in Epsilon for
the Win32 console will avoid using WinHelp to deliver help, and will
instead retrieve help from the text-only edoc file, like non-Windows
versions of Epsilon.

~want-gui-menu	System

Epsilon for Windows sets this variable to indicate whether it should
display a menu bar.

~want-gui-printing	Preference

If this variable is zero, printing commands in Epsilon for Windows
won't use standard Windows printing features, but instead will print
via the print-destination variable.  If you want Epsilon to run
an external command to print a file, set this variable to zero.

~want-gui-prompts	Preference

If this variable is zero, Epsilon for Windows will avoid using
Windows dialogs in many commands, and will draw text boxes instead,
similar to the non-Windows versions of Epsilon.

~want-lines	System

This variable holds the value the user specified through the -vl
switch, or 0 if the user did not explicitly specify the number of
lines to display via this flag.

~want-sorted-tags	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon displays its list of tags alphabetically.  If
zero, the order depends on the order in which you tagged the files.

~want-state-file-backups	Preference

If nonzero, Epsilon makes a backup whenever you write a new state
file.

~want-toolbar	Preference

Epsilon uses this variable to remember if the user wants a tool bar
displayed, in versions of Epsilon which support this.  Use the
toggle-toolbar command to change this setting.

~want-warn	Preference Buffer-specific

If nonzero, before Epsilon saves a file, it checks the time and date
of the copy of the file already on disk (to see if anyone has
modified it since you read it into Epsilon), and warns you if the
file has been modified.  Epsilon also checks the file each time you
switch to a buffer or window displaying that file, and before you
read or write the file.

~want-window-borders	Preference

The toggle-borders command uses this variable to record whether
or not you want borders between tiled windows.  Without borders,
Epsilon assigns separate color schemes to each window.

~warn-before-overwrite	Preference

Commands like write-region that write to a user-specified file
ask for confirmation if the file already exists.  To make Epsilon
write over such files without asking, set this variable to 0.

~was-quoted	System

Epsilon makes this variable nonzero if the last file name you typed
included the " character.  Epsilon treats some files patterns
differently in this case.

~wheel-click-lines	Preference

Rolling the wheel on a Microsoft IntelliMouse under Windows scrolls
by this many lines at once.  A value of 0 means scroll by pages.  A
value of -1 means use the value set in the IntelliMouse control panel.

~window-bufnum	System Window-specific

This variable holds the buffer number of the buffer Epsilon should
display in the current window.

~window-caption	Preference

Epsilon for Windows or X sets its caption to this text when the
current buffer is not associated with a file.

~window-caption-file	Preference

Epsilon for Windows or X sets its caption to this text when the
current buffer is associated with a file.  The %s in the text is
replaced by the file name.

~window-color-scheme	System Window-specific

If the window-specific variable window_color_scheme is non-zero
in a window, Epsilon uses its value in place of the
selected_color_scheme variable when displaying that window.

~window-end	Window-specific

On each screen refresh, Epsilon sets this variable to the last buffer
position displayed in the window.

~window-handle	

This variable holds the current window's window handle, a code that
uniquely identifies the window.  Setting it switches windows.

~window-height	Window-specific

This variable contains the height of the current window in lines,
including any mode line or borders.  Setting it changes the size of
the window.

~window-left	Window-specific

This variable holds the screen coordinate of the left edge of the
current window.  If the current window is a pop-window, you can set
this variable to move the window around.

~window-number	

This variable holds a number that denotes the current window's
position in the window order.  Tiled windows are numbered from the
upper-left window, which is numbered zero, to the lower-right window.
Pop-up windows always come after tiled windows in this order, with
the most recently created pop-up window last.

~window-overlap	Preference

When scrolling by pages, Epsilon leaves this many lines of overlap
between one window of text and the next (or previous).  A negative
value for window-overlap represents a percentage of overlap,
instead of the number of screen lines.

~window-start	Window-specific

This variable holds the buffer position of the first character
displayed in the current window.

~window-top	Window-specific

This variable holds the screen coordinate of the top edge of the
current window.  If the current window is a pop-window, you can set
this variable to move the window around.

~window-width	Window-specific

This variable contains the width of the current window in characters,
including any borders.  Setting it changes the size of the window.

~winhelp-display-contents	Preference

If winhelp-display-contents is nonzero, help file menu items
created by the select-help-files command will display the
contents page of their help file if you select one without first
highlighting a keyword.  If zero, Epsilon will display the keyword
index of the help file.

~word-pattern	Buffer-specific

This variable points to the regular-expression pattern Epsilon uses
to move forward or backward by a word in the current buffer.  Set the
variable default-word instead to change the pattern for all
buffers, or to change it permanently.  (Epsilon for DOS and Epsilon
for OS/2 use default-oem-word instead of default-word.)

